Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4547.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court
assembled, and by the authority of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 14 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding
the following section:-
Section 14. (a} There shall be a tax expenditure commission that shall
examine, evaluate and report on the administration, effectiveness and fiscal
impact of tax expenditures, as defined in section 1 of chapter 29, and as
presented with the governor1s proposed budget under paragraph 3 of section SB
of said chapter 29.
(b} The commission shall be comprised of: the commissioner of revenue or
1
the commissioner s designee, who shall serve as chair; the state auditor or
the auditor's designee; the state treasurer or the state treasurer's designee;
the chair of the house committee on ways and means or the chair's designee;
1
the chair of the senate committee on ways and means or the chair s designee;
the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on revenue or their
respective designees; the minority leader of the house of representatives or
the house minority leader's designee; the minority leader of the senate or the
senate minority leader's designee; and 3 members to be appointed by the
governor, who shall have expertise in economics or tax policy. The 3 members
appointed by the governor shall each serve 4-year terms.
(c} The commission shall use best practices and standardized criteria to
evaluate: (i} the purpose, intent and goal of each tax expenditure and whether
the expenditure is an effective means of accomplishing those ends; (ii) the
fiscal impact of each tax expenditure on state and local taxing authorities,
including past fiscal impacts and expected future fiscal impacts; (iii) the
economic impact of each tax expenditure including, but not limited to, revenue
loss compared to economic gain and jobs created, retained or lost as a result
of the tax expenditure; (iv} the return on the investment made by the tax
expenditure and the extent to which the tax expenditure is a cost effective
Page 11 of 367

Appendix A: Chapter 207 of the Acts of 2018
H 4820
use of resources; and (v) similar tax expenditures, if any, offered by other
states and the impact of the tax expenditure on regional and national economic
competitiveness.
(d) The commission shall establish a schedule to review tax expenditures
so that each tax expenditure shall be reviewed at least once every s years.
The review schedule may group tax expenditures by those benefitting from the
tax expenditures, the objectives of the tax expenditures or the policy
rationale for the tax expenditures. The commission's review of each tax
expenditure shall include the date the tax expenditure was enacted and the
statutory or legal citation.
(e) Biennially, not later than March 1, the commission shall file a
report of its findings and its recommendations to the clerks of the house of
representatives and senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on revenue. The report
shall include all information required to be reviewed by this section and
recommendations. The report shall be made available electronically and
prominently displayed on the official website of the department of revenue.
(f} The commission shall have access to information, including aggregate
tax return information and related documents maintained by the department of
revenue, necessary for the performance of the commission's duties under this
section but excluding information provided to the commonwealth by other
federal and state tax agencies where such access is prohibited by law;
provided, however, that tax returns and related documents shall not include a
taxpayer's personal identifying information and such returns and documents
shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure as a public record under
section 7 of chapter 4 and under chapter 66. The commission, in collaboration
with the department of revenue, shall adopt policies and procedures to ensure
taxpayer confidentiality.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of July 1, 2018.
,;L
House of Representatives, August , 2018.
Preamble adopted, Speaker.
GL.
In Senate, Augu.st , 2018.
Preamble adopted, , President.
2
Page 12 of 367

Appendix A: Chapter 207 of the Acts of 2018
H 4820
·z..
House of Representatives, August , 2018.
Bill passed to be re-enacted,
, Speaker.
2._
In Senate, August , 2018.
0,
Bill passed to be re-enacted,
President.
'1 ,
; rf:,
2018.
I Approved,
at o'clock and L./~inutes, . M.
Governor.
3
Page 13 of 367

Appendix B
Members of the Tax Expenditure Review Commission
Rebecca Forter, Massachusetts Department of Revenue, Chairperson
Diana DiZoglio, Massachusetts State Auditor, Member
Lindsay Janeczek, Massachusetts State Auditor, Designee
Deb Goldberg, Massachusetts State Treasurer and Receiver General, Member
Sue Perez, Massachusetts State Treasurer and Receiver General, Designee
Representative Mark J. Cusack, Joint Committee on Revenue, House Chairperson,
Member
Ryan Sterling, Joint Committee on Revenue, House Chairperson, Designee
Senator Susan L. Moran, Joint Committee on Revenue, Senate Chairperson,
Member
Stephen Maher and Nicole Manfredi, Joint Committee on Revenue, Senate
Designees
Senator Michael J. Rodrigues, Chairperson, Senate Ways and Means
Amar Patel and Katie Verra, Senate Ways and Means, Designees
Representative Aaron Michlewitz, Chairperson, House Ways and Means
Committee, Member
Tim Sheridan, Chairperson, House Ways and Means Committee, Designee
Representative Bradley H. Jones, House Minority Leader, Member
Page 14 of 367

Representative Michael J. Soter, House Minority Leader, Designee
Senator Bruce E. Tarr, Senate Minority Leader, Member
Chris Carlozzi, Senate Minority Leader, Designee
Professor Natasha Varyani, Roger Williams University School of Law, Member,
Appointed by Governor Maura Healey
Professor Thomas Downes, Tufts University, Member, Appointed by Governor
Maura Healey
Additional Participants
Cole Doherty-Crestin, Massachusetts Department of Revenue
Professor Michelle Hanlon, Massachusetts Institute of Technology
Professor Matthew Weinzierl, Harvard Business School
Page 15 of 367

Appendix C
Template for Review of Tax
Expenditures
Page 16 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: I Annual cost: I Year of adoption: I Sunset date:
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □ □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☐ No
Page 17 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 18 of 367

Appendix C
Template for Review of Tax Expenditures
The review template for each tax expenditure is the vehicle chosen by the Commission to achieve
standardized criteria for review of tax expenditures. As a process matter, a draft of the template was
completed for each tax expenditure by one or more Commission members assigned by the Chair. The
assigned member or members offered a draft rating that was then discussed by all TERC members in a
public meeting. The Commission voted on the ratings of each tax expenditure reviewed. For final
evaluation rating templates and tax expenditure summaries see Appendix D. TERC meeting minutes are
attached at Appendix E.
In addition to fields for basic background information, the template is structured in three parts: (i) goals;
(ii) measurement and effectiveness ratings; and (iii) comments.
1. Goals: Few tax expenditures have stated policy goals in their authorizing legislation, and the
Commission has been left to infer policy goals in most cases, based upon the structure of the
expenditure and its beneficiaries. The template lists both business-related goals, such as job-
creation and competitiveness, and non-business goals, often related to individuals, such as relief
of poverty and access to opportunity. Some commonly applicable goals are identified, with a
space to identify other goals as well. The Commission has found that more than one goal often
seems relevant to a single tax expenditure. Identification of goals is a necessary step in
examining the effectiveness of a tax expenditure.
2. Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings: The second section of the template contains a series
of statements, some of which are descriptive and some of which attempt to rate the
effectiveness of a tax expenditure in benefitting the policy goal(s) identified for that tax
expenditure. Each statement receives a TERC rating on a scale running from “Strongly Agree” to
“Strongly Disagree.”
The descriptive statements relate to the beneficiaries of the expenditure, identifying the degree
to which the tax expenditure is broadly used, and the degree to which it benefits small
businesses or low-income taxpayers.
The effectiveness ratings begin with a statement as to the degree to which the impact of a tax
expenditure on achieving its identified goals is measurable. There are then effectiveness
statements relating to different aspects of effectiveness: the degree, in the Commission’s
judgment, to which the benefit of the tax expenditure justifies its cost; the degree to which the
tax expenditure is claimed by its intended beneficiaries; the degree to which the incentive that a
tax expenditure creates is meaningful to taxpayers claiming the benefit of the expenditure; and
the degree to which the tax expenditure remains relevant today. Finally, this section of the
template has a statement as to the ease of administration of the tax expenditure.
Page 19 of 367

The effectiveness ratings represent the judgment of the Commission members in light of the
information available. Based on the uncertainties expressed by Commission members in
discussion of various ratings, differences of one level in an evaluation such as, for example, the
difference between a “strongly agree” rating and a “somewhat agree” rating, may not be highly
meaningful. However, ratings of “strongly agree” and “strongly disagree” generally represent a
consensus on a rating among the TERC members and are meaningful as to the statement. It is
notable that, to date, the Commission has successfully operated on a consensus basis; there has
not been significant disagreement among Commission members as to particular tax expenditure
ratings.
One of the statutory directives in TERC’s enabling legislation directs the Commission to evaluate
“the return on the investment made by the tax expenditure and the extent to which the tax
expenditure is a cost-effective use of resources.” The Commission interprets this directive as an
instruction to rate the extent to which the benefit of an expenditure justifies its cost, and TERC
has found its cost/benefit evaluative statement to be the most difficult to rate. The rating is
particularly problematic, of course, to the extent that the benefit is difficult to measure.
However, even though there are prominent tax expenditures such as the Investment Tax Credit
or the Research & Development credit where research data on economic impact of comparable
federal credits or credits in other states may be available, economic data are seldom sufficient
to determine the extent to which a tax expenditure may incent activity that would not
otherwise have occurred, as opposed to merely reducing the tax burden for a desired activity,
whether or not that activity would have occurred without the tax expenditure. TERC generally
concluded that benefits of expenditures justified the costs in situations where the policy goals
were reasonably inferred, and the tax expenditure reasonably related to these goals, particularly
if the tax expenditure was available in other states.
In many cases the Commission judged interstate competitiveness to be a goal of a business tax
expenditure and tax expenditures matching similar tax benefits in other states were often found
to be responsive to this goal, thus justifying their cost on this basis. TERC found such tax
expenditures to justify their cost even where dynamic analysis of the tax expenditure using the
REMI model did not show growth in jobs from a tax expenditure, given the uncertainty in
application of such models and the impact of the economic assumptions necessary to such
modeling. Information regarding the application of the REMI model is available at Appendix F.
3. Comments: The final section of the template is a comments section to allow members to
explain “Strongly Disagree” or “Somewhat Disagree” ratings and other considerations to be
highlighted, such as policy proposals
Page 20 of 367

Appendix D
Evaluation Rating Templates &
Tax Expenditure Summaries
Page 21 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.007 Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits Annual cost: $1.4 - Year of adoption: 1985 Sunset date: None
I I I
$1.6 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 22 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 23 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.007
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(H)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1985
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $1.4 - $1.6 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT 1,757 – 1,807 per year during FY22-FY26.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE $☐7 82 – $891 ☒per benefiting individual.
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
T ier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits are The statute does not state the purpose of the
e W x h cl a u t d a e r d e f r t o h m e pMoalsiscayc g h o u a se ls tt o s f g t r h o e s s income. tAarxe e txhpeerned oittuhreer. states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax Most states allow an exclusion or exemption
expenditure is to provide tax relief to for the full amount of Tier 1 Railroad
recipients of Railroad Retirement benefits, who Retirement benefits, as Massachusetts does.
include retired railroad workers and their States that do so include California,
spouses, surviving dependents of deceased Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island,
r ailroad workers, and disabled railroad and Vermont.
workers.
Page 24 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Railroad Retirement benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income for personal
income tax purposes. Railroad retirement benefits are paid in two parts: Tier 1, which is
analogous to Social Security, and Tier 2, which is analogous to a pension plan. Neither Tier
1 nor Tier 2 benefits are included in Massachusetts gross income.
The Massachusetts exclusion for Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits is effectuated by a
modification to federal gross income, upon which the personal income tax is generally
based. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(H). A portion of Tier 1 benefits is included in federal
gross income if the recipient’s income exceeds certain levels set out in Internal Revenue
Code (Code) § 86. Note that the inclusion rule under Code § 86 applies to both Social
Security and Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits. Up to 85% of Tier 1 Railroad Retirement
benefits may be includable in federal gross income under the Code. Due to the
Massachusetts modification, Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits are excluded from
Massachusetts gross income entirely.
The Massachusetts exclusion for Tier 2 Railroad Retirement benefits is the result of a
federal law prohibiting states from taxing such benefits. See 45 USC, § 231m. Because the
exemption for Tier 2 Railroad Retirement benefits is not the result of any Massachusetts
general or special law, it is not considered a tax expenditure and therefore is not evaluated
in this report.
Railroad Retirement benefits are generally paid to retired railroad workers and their
spouses, surviving dependents of deceased railroad workers, and disabled railroad
workers. In the absence of the exclusion, such recipients would be required to include Tier
1 Railroad Retirement benefits in their Massachusetts gross income to the same extent that
the benefits are included in federal gross income. The personal income tax revenue
forgone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a Massachusetts tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax expenditure is to provide tax relief to
recipients of Railroad Retirement benefits, who include retired railroad workers and their
spouses, surviving dependents of deceased railroad workers, and disabled railroad
workers.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The personal income tax exclusion for Railroad Retirement benefits does not impose any
special challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR) or taxpayers. Tier 1 benefits are
subject to federal reporting rules. Thus, the benefits are easily distinguishable from other
types of income.
Page 25 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $1.4 - $1.6 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $1.4 $1.4 $1.5 $1.5 $1.6
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on data from the Railroad
1
Retirement Board (RRB) , which is an independent agency in the executive branch of the
Federal Government. The RRB provides retirement data by state and by federal fiscal year,
including the number of railroad retirees and survivors and monthly retirement payment.
The RRB’s data have been adjusted for the differences between the federal and state fiscal
2
year.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct benefit of this tax expenditure is the reduction of the tax burden on former
railroad workers, thus encouraging these individuals to continue to reside in
Massachusetts during retirement, and to offer an incentive for other railroad retirees to
retire to Massachusetts.
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the qualified retired individuals and
survivors of railroad retirees. They can exclude their railroad retirement and survivor
benefit payments from Part B income. Table 2 below shows the estimated number of direct
beneficiariesand the resulting tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 1,807 1,794 1,782 1,770 1,757
Average Tax Benefit $782 $808 $835 $862 $891
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from
the RRB’s annual Retirement and Survivors Benefit report.
1
The Railroad Retirement Board is an independent agency in the executive branch of the Federal
Government. The primary function of the RRB’s is administration of thhett pres:t/i/rwemwwen.rtr-bs.ugrovvi/v or and
unemployment-sickness benefit programs provided to the nation’s railroad workers and their families, under
the Railroad Retirement and Railroad Unemployment Insurance Acts.
2
Note that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year, while the
Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 26 of 367

EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance this exclusion) and direct benefits of
this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
personal income tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct
benefits afforded by the tax expenditure tothe taxpayers who benefit from this tax
expenditure.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
exclusion. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states allow an exclusion or exemption for the full amount of Tier 1 Railroad
.
Retirement benefits, as Massachusetts does. States that do so include California,
Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont
Page 27 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.009 Exemption of Social Security Benefits Annual cost: $483.7 - Year of adoption: 1985 Sunset date: None
$658.9 million during
FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☒ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □ □X
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Page 28 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Members agreed to flag this tax expenditure for legislative review due to its significant revenue impact.
Page 29 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption of Social Security Benefits
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.009
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 2 (a)(2)(H)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1985
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $482.3 - $658.9 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 531,780 – 713,384 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
Estimated $907 - $1,014 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE t☐ax p ayer. ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
S ocial Security benefits are excluded from The statute does not state the purpose of the
M W a h s a s t a c a h r u e s t e h t e ts p goroliscsy i n g c o o a m ls e o . f the tAarxe e txhpeerned oittuhreer. states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax Most states allow an exclusion or exemption
expenditure is to provide tax relief to for the entire amount of Social Security
recipients of Social Security benefits, who benefits. States that do so include California,
include retired workers and their spouses, Maine, and New York. Other states exclude or
s urviving dependents of deceased workers, exempt all or a portion of Social Security
and disabled workers. benefits only if the taxpayer’s income is under
a particular threshold. States that adopt this
limited approach include Connecticut, Rhode
Island, and Vermont.
Page 30 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Social Security benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income for personal income
tax purposes. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(H). The exclusion is effectuated by a modification
to federal gross income, upon which the personal income tax is generally based. A portion
of such benefits is included in federal gross income if the recipient’s income exceeds certain
levels set out in Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 86. Up to 85% of Social Security benefits
may be includable in federal gross income under the Code. Due to the Massachusetts
modification, Social Security benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income
entirely. The tax expenditure covered in this report is the exclusion of the amount of Social
Security benefits that is otherwise includable in federal gross income, not the amount that
is excluded for federal purposes.
Social Security benefits are generally paid to retired workers and their spouses, surviving
dependents of deceased workers, and disabled workers. In the absence of the exclusion,
such recipients would be required to include Social Security benefits in their Massachusetts
gross income to the same extent that the benefits are included in federal gross income. The
personal income tax revenue forgone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a
Massachusetts tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax expenditure is to provide tax relief to
recipients of Social Security benefits, who include retired workers and their spouses,
surviving dependents of deceased workers, and disabled workers.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The personal income tax exclusion for Social Security benefits does not impose any special
challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR) or taxpayers. Social Security benefits are
reported as such to taxpayers on Form SSA-1099 and are easily distinguishable from other
types of income.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $482.3 - $658.9
million per year during FY22-FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Social Security Benefits
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $482.3 $526.3 $589.5 $626.2 $658.9
Page 31 of 367

Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are mostly based on data from the Internal
1
Revenue Service (IRS) . More specifically, DOR used the data on federally taxable social
security benefits reported by Massachusetts residents on their federal tax returns. Without
this tax expenditure, such benefits would have also been taxable in Massachusetts.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are recipients of Social Security benefits,
who include retired workers and their spouses, surviving dependents of deceased workers,
and disabled workers, and whose benefits exceed the exemption provided by the IRC. As
such, they can exclude such payments from gross income for Massachusetts tax purposes.
2
Table 2 below shows the estimated number of beneficiaries and average tax benefit per
beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 531,780 547,827 581,380 635,045 713,384
Average Tax Benefit $907 $961 $1,014 $986 $924
Source: Internal Revenue Service (IRS); Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and the data limitations present in this instance.
1
Internal Revenue Service (IRS). https://www.irs.gov/
2
Please note that, the estimated number of beneficiaries reported in Table 2 is the estimated number of
Massachusetts taxpayers who will report taxable social security benefits on their federal tax return. Given
that joint filers may have two recipients of social security benefits, the number of beneficiaries reported in
Table 2 may be underestimated while the average tax benefit per beneficiary may be overestimated.
Page 32 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
The majority of states allow an exclusion or exemption for the entire amount of Social
Security benefits. States that do so include California, Maine, and New York. Other states
exclude or exempt a portion of Social Security benefits, depending upon the taxpayer’s
income. States that adopt this approach include Connecticut, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 33 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.011 Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses Annual cost: $5.0 – Year of adoption: 1981 Sunset date: None
I I I
$5.7 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 34 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Somewhat disagree on the idea that this tax expenditure is primarily beneficial to low-income taxpayers because the exemption is generally
available to any taxpayer with employer-provided dependent care assistance.
Page 35 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.011
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1(c), 1(d), 2(a); Internal Code §
129
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1N9o8n1e
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Tax loss of $5.0 - $5.7 million per year during
FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT 25,021 – 28,190 taxpayers per year during FY22
- FY26.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE $202 - $203 per benefiting taxpayer.
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not explicitly state the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of purpose of this tax expenditure.
determining income, dependent care
assistance provided by employers to
employees is excluded from Massachusetts
Wgrohsast ianrceo mthee. p o licy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the goal of the All states that conform to the Code for income
expenditure is to help taxpayers defray the tax purposes provide an exclusion for
cost of dependent care so that they are better dependent care assistance unless they have
able to maintain their employment while specifically decoupled from the Code with
caring for a dependent. regard to the exclusion. The Commission is not
aware of any states that have decoupled. The
actual amount of the exclusion in each state may
vary depending on the Code conformity date in
that state.
Page 36 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
1
determining income, dependent care assistance provided by employers to employees is
excluded from Massachusetts gross income for personal income tax purposes. Specifically,
Massachusetts adopts Code § 129, which excludes dependent care assistance from
employees’ gross income.
Dependent care assistance consists of the value of an employer’s provision of, or payment
for, the care of employees’ qualifying dependents, which enables those employees to work.
Qualifying dependents include dependent children under the age of thirteen, certain
disabled dependents, and certain disabled spouses.
For the exclusion to apply, the dependent care assistance must be paid pursuant to a plan
that meets the administrative requirements set out in the Code. The amount of the
exclusion under Code § 129 may not exceed $5,000 ($2,500 for married filing separately)
during a taxable year. Further, the amount excluded may not exceed the earned income of
the employee or, if the employee is married, the lesser of the earned income of the
employee or the spouse for the taxable year.
In the absence of the exclusion, employees would be required to pay Massachusetts
personal income tax on amounts they receive from their employers as dependent care
assistance. Personal income tax revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a
tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the goal of the expenditure is to help taxpayers defray the
cost of dependent care so that taxpayers are better able to maintain their employment
while caring for a dependent.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion from employees’ gross income of employer-provided
dependent care assistance does not present any special challenges for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). Dependent care assistance is identified as such on employees’ W-2s.
Conformity with the federal exclusion simplifies tax compliance and administration by
allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal
1
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to Code § 129 as
amended on January 1, 2022, and in effect for the taxable year, with certain exceptions not relevant to this
report. M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c).
Page 37 of 367

purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the
compliance burden for employers and employees.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $5.0 - $5.7 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $5.0 $5.2 $5.4 $5.6 $5.7
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on the estimates of excluded or
deductible dependent care benefits reported on federal tax returns by the Internal Revenue
2
Service (IRS) , adjusted for the level of Massachusetts employment relative to the national
employment.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of the exemption of dependent care expenses are workers with
3
employer-provided dependent care benefits. Workers can exclude up to $5,000 from
gross income when they receive employer-provided dependent care benefits. By claiming
the exemption, taxpayers can reduce their taxable income and potentially lower their
overall tax liability.
Based on IRS data, DOR estimates that, during FY22 - FY26, 25,021 - 28,190 Massachusetts
taxpayers benefit from the exemption with an average tax savings of $202 - $203 per
taxpayer. See Table 2.
Table 2. Estimated Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Direct Bene�iciaries 25,021 25,778 26,558 27,362 28,190
Average Tax Benefit $202 $202 $203 $203 $203
Source: Internal Revenue Service (IRS); Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
2
https://www.irs.gov/statistics/soi-tax-stats-individual-income-tax-returns-line-item-estimates-publication-
4801
3
Dependent care benefits from employers include direct payments by employers to a childcare or adult day
care provider, on-site child and dependent care offered by employers, employers’ reimbursement of
employee child and dependent care costs, and flexible spending arrangements (FSAs). FSAs allow employees
to deposit pre-tax money into an account to pay for qualifying dependent care expenses.
Page 38 of 367

EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models to quantify the
indirect and induced costs and benefits given the models’ complexity and data limitations
present in this instance. Instead, qualitative description of some major indirect or induced
impacts is presented below.
Dependent care providers such as childcare centers, daycare providers, in-home
caregivers, and other types of dependent care providers that provide care for dependents
benefit indirectly from the exemption. The exemption encourages families to seek and
utilize formal care services, which can help support the dependent care industry and
potentially create employment opportunities in this sector.
Employers that provide free or subsidized daycare to their employees at work sites also
benefit indirectly from the exemption. Employers are likely to attract and retain
4
employees, particularly those with dependents at home. Employers are also likely to see
less worker-absenteeism associated with dependent care needs, increasing employees’
productivity at work as employees with employer-provided childcare services at work sites
may be able to balance their work and family responsibilities more effectively. One study
reported that “higher childcare subsidy expenditures significantly increase labor force
5
participation and employment rates of low-income mothers in the United States”.
More data related to the dependent care benefits are provided in the Appendix.
Incentivizing Employer-Supported Childcare in Massachusetts
4
“ ” by Massachusetts Taxpayer Association,,
httTphse:/ E/fwfewctws o.mf Cashsiltda xcpaarey eSrusb.osirdgi/essi toens /Mdaetfearunlat/l fLilaebso/rp Fuobrliccea Ptiaorntsic/i2p0a2ti3o-n in the United States
07/Employer%20Supported%20Care%20Paper%20Final_0.pdf
5
" " by Kimberly
Burge s s, Nina Chien, Maria Enchautegui, Department of Health and Human Services, December 2016,
https://aspe.hhs.gov/sites/default/files/migrated_legacy_files//171051/EffectsCCSubsidiesMaternalLFPBri
ef.pdf
Page 39 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that conform to the Code for personal income tax provide an exclusion for
dependent care assistance, unless they have specifically decoupled from Code with regard
to the exclusion. The Commission is not aware of any states that have decoupled. The
actual amount of the exclusion in each state may vary depending on the Code conformity
d ate in that state.
Page 40 of 367

APPENDIX
In this appendix, we provide data on workers that may potentially benefit from the
eExsetimmpattioens ooff dCeivpielinadnesn At cgaerde 1b6e+ne wfiittsh. Access to Workplace-Funded Childcare in
Massachusetts, 2023
Annually, the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) publishes National Compensation Survey
data on various types of employee compensation, including workplace-funded childcare,
access to Flexible Spending Account (FSAs), etc. The employee compensation data is
published for the U.S., the four regions, and the nine geographic regions. For the U.S.,
compensation data is estimated by selected major industry and occupation, establishment
size, employees’ full-time/part-time status, union status, and wage percentile categories.
Note that BLS does not publish data at the state level.
DOR estimated the number of Massachusetts workers with access to employer-provided
childcare using BLS regional data for New England. During 2021 -2023, about 14% of
workers in the New England region had access to workplace-funded childcare.
Government sector employees were more likely to have access to workplace-funded
childcare than private sector employees (17.7% versus 13.3%, respectively). Assuming
that the workplace-funded childcare access rate for Massachusetts is consistent with that of
the New England region, DOR estimated that 502,485 workers (both private and
governments sectors) had access to workforce-funded childcare from their employers in
the state in 202T3.a bSelee AT-a1b.l eE sAt-i1m. ates of Civilians Aged 16+ with Access to
Workplace-Funded Childcare in Massachusetts, 2023:
Sector (A) Employment (B) (C)=(A)*(B)
in 2023* % of Employees with Numbers of Employed
Workplace-Funded in MA with Workplace-
Childcare in New England Funded childcare
Region, 2021-2023
Averages
Private Sector 3,198,424 13.3% 426,457
Government Sector 430,347 17.7% 76,028
Total 3,628,771 13.8% 502,485
Note: *January-September 2023 averages.
Source: (i). Employment data- Quarterly Census of Employment and Wages Program (QCEW), U.S. Bureau of Labor
Statistics, https://data.bls.gov/cgi-bin/dsrv?nb (ii). Workplace-funded childcare data- National Compensation Survey-
B enefits, U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, https://data.bls.gov/cgi-bin/dsrv?nb (iii) Massachusetts Department of Revenue
(DOR)
Page 41 of 367

Estimates of Civilians Aged 16+ with Access to Dependent Care Flexible Spending
Account (FSAs) from Employers in Massachusetts, 2023
Employers are more likely to offer their workers dependent care Flexible Spending
Accounts (FSAs) than to provide access to workplace-funded childcare. During 2021 -
2023, 45.4% of workers in New England had access to employer provided FSAs.
Government sector employees were more likely to have access to FSAs than private sector
employees (53.0% versus 44.3%, respectively). Assuming the employer-provided FSA
access rate for Massachusetts is consistent with the New England region, DOR estimated
that about 1.6 million employees (both private and governments sectors) had access to
emTpalbolyee Ar--p2r.o Evsidtiemda FtSeAss o ifn C tihveil siatantse Aing 2ed02 136. + S ewei tTha bAlcec Ae-s2s. to Dependent Care Flexible
Spending Account (FSAs) from Employers in Massachusetts, 2023:
(B) (C)=(A)*(B)
% of Employees with Numbers of
Access to Dependent Employed in MA
Care Flexible Spending with Access to
(A) Account in New England Dependent Care
Employment in Region, 2021-2022- Flexible Spending
Sector 2023* 2023 Averages Account
Private Sector 3,198,424 44.3% 1,417,968
Government Sector 430,347 53.0% 228,084
Total 3,628,771 45.4% 1,645,052
Note: *January-September 2023 averages.
Source: (i). Employment data- Quarterly Census of Employment and Wages Program (QCEW), U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics,
https://data.bls.gov/cgi-bin/dsrv?nb (ii). Workplace-funded childcare data- National Compensation Survey-Benefits, U.S. Bureau of
Labor Statistics, https://data.bls.gov/cgi-bin/dsrv?nb (iii) Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
Numbers of Households with Children < 13 Where At least One Household Member Was
Employed or Households with Disabled Persons (Physical/Mental) Persons with No Earnings
or Earnings < $4,700, Massachusetts, 2018-2022
6
Based on the estimates from the 2018 - 2022 American Community Survey (ACS) , 597,691
households in Massachusetts had children under 13 years old or disabled person with no
7
earnings or earnings below $ 4,700 annually. About 998,350 persons (16 and older) living
6
The American Community Survey (ACS) is conducted by the U.S. Census Bureau throughout the year. The
Bureau selects about 3.5 million households each year for the survey. The ACS replaced the long form in the
2010 Decennial Census. In Massachusetts, 179,700 housing units were interviewed during 2018 - 2022.
Detailed information on ACS can be found at the U.S. Census Bureau’s Web site,
https://www.census.gov/programs-surveys/acs/about.html
7
According to the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), qualifying persons for dependent care include child under
age 13 whom can be claimed as a dependent, any disabled persons in household who lived in the households
Page 42 of 367

in such households were employed during 2018 – 2022. See Table A-3. These households
are Tthaeb pleo tAe-n3t.i aNlu bmenbeefrisc ioafr Hieosu osfe ehmolpdlso wyeitrh p Crhoivliddreedn d<e 1p3e nWdheenrte c Aarte l eeaxsetm Opntei oHno. u sehold
Member Was Employed or Households with Disabled Persons (Physical/Mental) Persons
with No Earnings or Earnings < $4,700, Massachusetts, 2018-2022:
Household Type Number of Households Number of Total Total
with Children < 13 Employed Persons Households Employed
Where At least One Living in
Household Member Households with
Was Employed or Children < 13 or
Households with Households with
Disabled Persons Disabled Persons
(Physical/Mental) (Physical/Mental)
Persons with No Persons with no
Earnings of Earnings < Earnings or
$4,700 Earnings < $4,700
1. Married couple household 420,102 753,497 1,270,215 2,136,714
2. Other family household: Male
householder, no spouse present 46,839 71,585 125,104 197,889
3. Other family household:
Female householder, no spouse
present 129,750 173,256 318,334 448,083
Total 596,691 998,338 1,713,653 2,782,686
Source: 2018-2022 American Community Survey (ACS), U.S. Census Bureau, public use files, calculation by Massachusetts Department of
Revenue (DOR). ACS public use data file can be accessed from https://www.census.gov/programs-surveys/acs/microdata/access.html
for more than half the year with no earnings or earnings below $4,700 annually. For more detail, see:
https://www.irs.gov/instructions/i2441
Page 43 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.013 Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners Annual cost: Year of adoption: 1972 Sunset date: None
I I I
Exemption <$50,000
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□x □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ x □ □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □x □ □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □x □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 44 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: This exemption is very targeted to a very specific worker. The exemption cost seems to shrink annually as the number of workers in the coal
mining industry diminishes. The cost is negligible and now under $50,000 per year.
Page 45 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.013
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC § 104(a)(1); Rev. Rul. 72-400
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1972
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Negligible
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Negligible
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☒e g ligible ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, amounts received by coal
miners or their survivors as compensation for
disability or death from black lung disease are
e W x h cl a u t d a e r d e f r t o h m e pMoalsiscayc g h o u a se ls tt o s f g t r h o e s s income. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that conform to the Code for income
expenditure is to prevent amounts paid to coal tax purposes provide an exclusion for amounts
miners or their survivors as compensation for paid to coal miners or their survivors as
disability or death from black lung disease compensation for disability or death from
from being diminished by subjecting the black lung disease, unless they decouple from
compensation to income tax. the Code with regard to the exclusion. The
Commission is not aware of any state that has
decoupled.
Page 46 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, amounts received by coal miners or their survivors as compensation
for disability or death from black lung disease are excluded from Massachusetts gross
12
income. Such compensation is payable under the federal Black Lung Benefits Act of 1972.
Code § 104 provides that gross income does not include “amounts received under
workman’s compensation acts as compensation for personal injuries or sickness.” In
Revenue Ruling 72-400, the Internal Revenue Service ruled that compensation received by
coal miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung
disease is excludable from gross income under Code § 104(a)(1). Note that the general
exclusion for workers’ compensation benefits is a separate tax expenditure (see tax
expenditure number 1.010).
In the absence of the exclusion, amounts paid to coal miners or their survivors as
compensation for disability or death from black lung disease would be subject to personal
income tax. The revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to prevent the amounts paid to coal
miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung disease
from being diminished by subjecting the compensation to income tax.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the income exclusion for amounts received by coal miners or their
survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung disease does not present
any special challenges for the Department of Revenue. Such compensation is not reported
as taxable income to the recipients on Form 1099 or any similar form. Conformity with the
federal exclusion simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same
general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The
Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden
for taxpayers.
1 30 USC §§ 901-945.
2The federal Black Lung Program provides cash benefits to miners totally disabled due to black lung disease and to
the survivors of miners who die from black lung disease. Part B of the federal Black Lung Benefits Act of 1972 refers
to cases filed on or before December 31, 1973 and Part C refers to all cases filed thereafter. Amounts received under
Part B or Part C are excluded from Massachusetts gross income.
Page 47 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be negligible, or less
than $50,000 per year, during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners
from Massachusetts Personal Income Tax
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible
Note: "Negligible" means that the estimate is less than $50,000 but greater than zero.
According to the U.S. Energy Information Administration and the U.S. Mine Safety and
Health Administration, there are no coal mines in Massachusetts or the surrounding states.
There is the possibility of coal miners or their survivors moving to Massachusetts from
other states, but the numbers are likely very small. As shown in Table 2 below, from 2019
to 2023 black lung benefits under part C of the Black Lung Benefits Act were paid to less
than 10 Massachusetts residents each year, in an amount less than $100,000 in total each
year.
Federally, this tax expenditure has been categorized as a “quantitatively di minimis tax
expenditure”, a category with revenue loss impact of less than $50 million a year.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the individuals who receive
compensation after being diagnosed with black lung disease or the survivors of individuals
who died of black lung disease. These individuals can exclude such compensation from
3
gross income for Massachusetts tax purposes.
The distribution of black lung disease claims and disbursements in Massachusetts and the
U.S. is shown in Table 2 below.
3 The federal government pays benefits to coal miners affected by coal workers’ pneumoconiosis (CWP, commonly
referred to as black lung disease) and other lung diseases linked to coal mining in cases where responsible mine
operators are not able to pay.4 For 2024, the monthly benefit rate for a primary beneficiary with no dependent is $772.
Benefits can be as much as $1,545 per month for a primary beneficiary with three or more dependents.5 Medical
benefits are provided separately from disability benefits.
Page 48 of 367

Table 2. Distribution of Black Lung Disease Claims and Disbursements
in Massachusetts and U.S.
Federal Massachusetts U.S. U.S.
(1) (1) (1)
Fiscal (under Part C of BLBA ) (under Part C of BLBA ) (under Part B of BLBA )
Year Claims in (3) Claims in (3) Claims in
(2) Dollar Paid (2) Dollar Paid Dollar Paid
Payment Payment Payment
2019 8 $71,481 18,643 $166,577,570 7,444 $65,635,521
2020 7 $62,866 18,075 $162,329,144 6,452 $58,310,145
2021 6 $51,645 17,347 $149,315,171 5,539 $50,596,435
2022 5 $42,043 16,662 $140,103,909 4,690 $43,541,476
2023 5 $41,761 16,358 $136,624,745 3,998 $38,582,863
S((21o)) urce: U.S. Department of Labor, Division of Coal Mine Workers’ Compensation
Black Lung Benefits Act
Active claims in pay status as of the end of the federal fiscal year. Includes Trust Fund (TF), interim and responsible coal mine operator
l(3ia) bility (RO) pay claims.
Disbursements of income and medical benefits for all Part C claims, including claims paid by the Trust Fund and claims in interim pay
status, during each federal fiscal year. Does not include benefits paid by responsible coal mine operators and insurers.
4
According to Table 2, there were only 5 Part C Black Lung Disease claims in Massachusetts
with a total claim amount of $41,761 in 2023, while in all states, including foreign
countries, there were 16,358 claims with a total claim amount of $136.6 million in 2023.
5
For claims under Part B of the Black Lung Benefits Act, no data could be found for
Massachusetts. Nationally, 3,998 primary beneficiaries were paid $38.6 million under Part
B of the Black Lung Benefits Act.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
4
claims approved by the U.S. Department of Labor
5
claims originally approved by the Social Security Administration
Page 49 of 367

complexity and data limitations present in this instance. However, since the direct costs
and benefits of the exemption of payments made to coal miners are negligible, the indirect
and induced costs and benefits are also negligible.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exclusion for
amounts paid to coal miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from
black lung disease. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled from the
exclusion in the Code.
Page 50 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.015 Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and Tuition Annual cost: $43 - Year of adoption: 1954 Sunset date: None
I I I
Reductions $55 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 51 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Portion of benefit goes to higher-education institutions, institutions with higher tuitions more likely to benefit, lower income taxpayers less
likely to benefit both because they are less likely to attend and because the exemption is less likely to matter for them, benefit of linking state tax code to
federal
Page 52 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Tuition Reductions
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGOR Y 1.015
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REF ERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED Internal Revenue Code § 117(a), (d)
REPEAL/EXPIRA TION DATE 1954
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $43.0 - $55.0 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 – FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of t ax expenditure.
determining income, qualifying scholarships,
fellowship grants, and tuition reductions are
excluded from Massachusetts gross income.
What are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that adopt the Code for individual
expenditure is to incentivize formal education income tax purposes allow an exclusion for
by helping students defray its costs. qualifying scholarships, fellowship grants, and
tuition reductions unless they have specifically
decoupled from the Code in that regard. The
Page 53 of 367

Commission is not aware of any state that has
decoupled.
Page 54 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, certain scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions are
excluded from Massachusetts gross income. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code §
117(a), which excludes from gross income amounts received as a qualified scholarship by
1
an individual who is a candidate for a degree at a non-profit educational organization
2
described in Code § 170(b)(1)(A)(ii). Additionally, Massachusetts adopts Code § 117(d),
3
which excludes from gross income amounts received as a qualified tuition reduction.
A qualified scholarship is “any amount received by an individual as a scholarship or
fellowship grant to the extent the individual establishes that, in accordance with the
conditions of the grant, such amount was used for qualified tuition and related expenses.”
Code § 170(b). Qualified tuition and related expenses generally include tuition and course-
related expenses. Such expenses do not include room, board, or travel expenses. Code
§ 170(b)(2). With certain limited exceptions, the exclusion does not apply to any amounts
received as payment for teaching, research, or other services required as a condition of
receiving the qualifying scholarship. Code § 170(c).
Under Code § 117(d), amounts of any qualified tuition reduction are also excluded from
gross income. A qualified tuition reduction is the amount of any reduction in tuition
provided to an employee of a qualified, non-profit educational organization for the
education of the employee or the employee’s spouse or dependents at a qualified, non-
profit educational organization. The exclusion is generally available for tuition below the
graduate level.
In the absence of the exclusion, qualifying scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition
reductions would be included in Massachusetts gross income. The personal income tax
revenue forgone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a Massachusetts tax expenditure.
1
The term “candidate for degree” is not defined by statute or promulgated regulation. Under proposed
regulations, 26 CFR 1.117-6, a candidate for a degree is a student at a primary or secondary school, or an
undergraduate or graduate student at a college or university who is pursuing studies or conducting research
to meet the requirements for an academic or professional degree. A candidate for a degree also includes full-
time and part-time students at an educational institution that either offers credits toward a graduate or
undergraduate degree or offers training in a recognized occupation and is accredited by a nationally recognized
accreditation agency.
2
Pursuant to Code § 170(b)(1)(A)(ii), an educational organization is one “which normally maintains a regular
faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly enrolled body of pupils or students in attendance at the
place where its educational activities are regularly carried on.”
3
Effective for tax years beg inning on or after January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to Code § 117(a), (d)
as amended on January 1, 2022, and in effect for the taxable year, with certain exceptions not relevant to this
report. M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c).
Page 55 of 367

POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize formal education by
helping students defray its costs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exclusion does not present any special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). Educational institutions must provide most students with
IRS Form 1098-T (tuition statement), which includes a box for scholarships or fellowship
grants. Taxpayers are instructed to include taxable portions of scholarships, fellowship
grants, and tuition reductions in federal gross income. The Internal Revenue Service (IRS)
uses this information to monitor compliance with Code § 117(a) and (d) and shares the
results with the DOR.
The Commission assumes that the consistency of treatment of qualifying scholarships,
fellowship grants, and tuition reductions for federal and Massachusetts purposes also eases
the compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $43 - $55 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships,
and Tuition Reductions
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $43 $45 $47 $49 $55
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based on estimates prepared by the federal Joint
4
Committee on Taxation (“JCT”). The JCT reports the impact on federal tax collections
resulting from the corresponding federal exclusion of scholarships, fellowships, and tuition
reductions. To share down the federal estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR
5
adjusted the federal estimates for the differences between federal and state fiscal years ,
effective tax rates, and size of tax base. Given the use of external data and the lack of state
specific data, the revenue loss estimates are uncertain. Therefore, estimates reported in
Table 1 should be used with caution.
4
The JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue
Act of 1926. Among other tasks, the JCT provides revenue estimates for federal tax expenditures and tax
legislation considered by the Congress. The most recent JCT tax expenditure report can be found on the JCT’s
website: https://www.jct.gov/getattachment/4bb6796c-df84-4179-9226-8cce61c7c4b5/x-59-23.pdf
5
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 56 of 367

DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are recipients of scholarships, fellowship
grants, and tuition reductions that qualify for the exclusion. The exclusion reduces net cost
of education for such beneficiaries.
Generally, students enrolled in schools with higher tuition receive a larger benefit from the
expenditure in comparison to those enrolled in schools with lower tuition. Also, taxpayers
with higher marginal tax rates benefit more from such exclusion than taxpayers with lower
Some students with very low incomes may
marginal tax rates. A Congressional Research Service report prepared for the use of the
not benefit at all from this [federal] exclusion, as they could reduce their taxable income to
Senate Committee on the Budget indicates that, “
zero by claiming the standard deduction regardless. However, the exclusion’s benefit may be
substantial for students with other income or married postsecondary students who file joint
returns with their employed spouses
6
”.
There are no direct data on the number of beneficiaries of this tax expenditure. In the
appendix, DOR reports an estimate of the number of students enrolled in Massachusetts
who received certain type of financial aid. But, as discussed in the appendix, such students
may not necessarily benefit from this tax expenditure. For example, some students who
are Massachusetts filers are enrolled in out-of-state institutions.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
Tax Expenditures: Compendium of Background Material on Individual
6Provisions
See Senate Committee on the Budget,
, Section 117, page 721-724 (December 2022), CPRT-117SPRT49569.pdf (govinfo.gov)
Page 57 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow an exclusion for
qualifying scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions unless they have
specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled.
Page 58 of 367

APPENDIX
In this section, DOR reports an estimate of the number of students enrolled in
Massachusetts’ institutions who received a certain type of financial aid. Student financial
aid can be classified as grants, loans, work-study, and other. The type of financial aid that is
most likely covered by this tax expenditure is “grants”, which include scholarships, tuition
waivers, employer tuition reimbursements, and federal grants such as Pell Grants. DOR
examined publicly available data on enrollment and financial aid for post-secondary
7
institutions in Massachusetts from the U.S. Department of Education. Table A-1 displays
the estimated number and percentage of students (undergraduates and graduates
combined) in Massachusetts with any grant aid awarded from the federal government, a
state or local government, institution, and other sources known by the institution for years
from 2016 - 2022. During that period, 257,000 - 280,000, or 54 - 55% of students enrolled
in degree-granting institutions in Massachusetts received some type of grant.
Table A-1. Estimates of Number of College Students in Massachusetts
with Some Type of Grant Aid, 2016 - 2022
Year Total Number of Number of % of Students
Students Students with with Grant Aid
(Undergraduate Grant Aid
and Graduate)
2016 511,794 279,881 54.7%
2017 507,149 276,745 54.6%
2018 504,805 275,014 54.5%
2019 494,729 268,942 54.4%
2020 492,689 267,736 54.3%
2021 479,487 258,708 54.0%
2022 476,178 257,100 54.0%
Note: The most current data on enrollment are available for 2022.
However, the numbers reflected in Table A-1 do not necessarily reflect the beneficiaries of
this tax expenditure, for several reasons. First, some students enrolled in Massachusetts
institutions are not Massachusetts residents and may not be required to file a
Massachusetts tax return. On the other hand, some students who are Massachusetts filers
are enrolled in out-of-state institutions. In addition, as mentioned in the report, some
students with low incomes may not benefit at all from this tax expenditure, as they could
reduce their taxable Massachusetts income to zero by claiming personal exemption or no
7
As required by the Higher Education Act (1965), the U.S. Department of Education’s National Center for
Education Statiscs (NCES) Integrated Post Secondary Education Data System (IPEDS) survey collect data on
student financial aid and the net price from each post-secondary institutions. For more information on
financial component of IPEDS survey, see, https://nces.ed.gov/ipeds/survey-components/12
Page 59 of 367

tax status. Finally, some types of “grant aid” may be taxable in Massachusetts, such as
scholarships or fellowships used to pay room and board.
Page 60 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.016 Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards Annual cost: $3 - $4 Year of adoption: 1954 Sunset date: None
I I I
million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Incentive certain religious, charitable, scientific, educational,
artistic, literary, civic, employment, or athletic achievement
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). L J
□ X □ □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ X □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□X □ □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 61 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Seems unlikely that most individuals who receive these prizes are engaging in these activities because of the availability of the prizes, benefit
of linking state tax code to federal, complicated to administer and monitor because many of the prizes and awards are not reported
Page 62 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.016
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC § 74
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1954
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $3 - $4 million per year during FY22
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☒o t available☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal T he statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, prizes for achievements
in specified fields and certain cash payments
received for participating in the Olympics or
Paralympics are excluded from Massachusetts
g W ro h s a s t i a n r c e o m th e e . p olicy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that adopt the Code for individual
expenditure is to avoid having taxes diminish income tax purposes allow the federal
the value of certain prizes and awards. exclusion for achievement prizes, unless they
have specifically decoupled from the Code in
that regard. The Commission is not aware of
any state that has decoupled.
Page 63 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, certain prizes and awards are excluded from Massachusetts gross
income. The exclusion also applies to certain cash payments received for participating in
1
the Olympics or Paralympics. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 74 , which
excludes certain prizes and awards from gross income including (i) prizes and awards
made primarily in recognition of religious, charitable, scientific, educational, artistic,
literary, or civic achievement, (ii) certain employee achievement awards, and (iii) Olympic
2
and Paralympic medals and prizes.
Awards and prizes for religious, charitable, scientific, educational, artistic, literary, or civic
achievement are excludable if: (i) the recipient is selected without any action on his or her
part to enter the contest or proceeding under which the prize is awarded; (ii) the recipient
is not required to render substantial future services as a condition to receiving the prize;
and (iii) the prize or award is transferred by the payer to a qualified governmental unit or
charitable organization pursuant to a designation made by the recipient. Code §74(b).
Noncash prizes for employee achievement are excludable if they are awarded by an
employer to an employee for length of service achievement or safety achievement as part
of a meaningful presentation under conditions that indicate the payment is not disguised
compensation. Code §§ 74(c)(1), 274(j). In general, the amount of the exclusion for an
employee achievement award is limited to the employer's cost for the award and cannot be
more than $1,600 in the taxable year for any employee.
The value of Olympic and Paralympic medals is excluded from income. In addition, prize
money awarded by the United States Olympic Committee (USOC) on account of competition
in the Olympic Games or Paralympic Games is excludable. The exclusion for Olympic and
Paralympic medals and cash prizes does not apply to any taxpayer with adjusted gross
income, determined without regard to the exclusion, exceeding $1,000,000 for the tax year
($500,000 for a married individual filing a separate return). Code § 74(d)(2).
In the absence of the exclusion, prizes for charitable, scientific, educational, artistic,
literary, or civic (such as Nobel prizes) achievement, employee achievement awards, and
1
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to Code § 74 as
amended on January 1, 2022, and in effect for the taxable year, with certain exceptions not relevant to this
report. M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c).
2
Code § 74(a) provides that, pursuant to Code § 117, qualified scholarships are also excluded from gross
income. See report on tax expenditure 1.015 for more information about the exclusion for qualified
scholarships.
Page 64 of 367

Olympic and Paralympic medals and prize money would be taxable. Personal income tax
revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to avoid having taxes diminish the
value of certain prizes and awards.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exclusion presents some challenges for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). Olympic and Paralympic medals and prizes are required to be reported by
the payor on Form 1099-Misc, but it is not necessarily the case that the value of other
prizes will be reported on 1099s or W-2s. Individual audits may be required to monitor
the exclusion. However, conformity with the federal exclusion simplifies tax compliance
and administration of the exclusion by allowing the same general rules and definitions to
be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. Further, such conformity allows the DOR
to use audit results shared by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) to monitor the exclusion.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $3 - $4 million per
year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1: Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Certain Prizes and Awards
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $3 $3 $4 $4 $4
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based mostly on estimates prepared by the
3
federal Joint Committee on Taxation (“JCT”). The JCT reports the impact on federal tax
collections resulting from the corresponding federal exclusion of certain employee
4
awards. To share down the federal estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted
5
the federal estimates for the differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective
tax rates, and size of tax base. JCT’s estimates do not include the exclusion of Olympic and
Paralympic medals and USOC prize money, for which DOR used the IRS’s individual income
3
The JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue
Act of 1926. Among other tasks, the JCT provides revenue estimates for federal tax expenditures and tax
legislation considered by the Congress. The most recent JCT tax expenditure report can be found on the JCT’s
website: https://www.jct.gov/getattachment/4bb6796c-df84-4179-9226-8cce61c7c4b5/x-59-23.pdf
4
JCT’s estimates for exclusion of employee awards cover exclusions allowed under Code §74(b) & (c).
5
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 65 of 367

6
tax return line-item estimates. The IRS’s estimates are for the entire country and were
apportioned to Massachusetts using limited online information on Massachusetts’ share of
7
U.S. Olympic and Paralympic medals. Given the use of external data and the lack of state-
specific data, the revenue loss estimates are uncertain. Therefore, estimates reported in
Table 1 should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are individuals that receive (i) prizes and
awards made primarily in recognition of religious, charitable, scientific, educational,
artistic, literary, or civic achievement, (ii) certain employee achievement awards, and (iii)
Olympic and Paralympic medals and prizes.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal
exclusion for achievement prizes, unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code in
that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
6
https://www.irs.gov/statistics/soi-tax-stats-individual-income-tax-returns-line-item-estimates-
publications-4801-and-5385.
7
According to IRS estimates, for tax year 2021, about 3,003 tax filers reported non-taxable Olympic and
Paralympic medals and USOC prize money with the non-taxable amount totaling about $9 million. However,
IRS does not decompose the above estimates by state.
Page 66 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.017 Exclusion of Payments Received Under Government Annual cost: ~$0.4m Year of adoption: 1978 Sunset date: None
Conservation, Reclamation and Restoration Programs (previously Exemption of per annum
Cost-Sharing Payments)
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □x
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □x □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □x □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 67 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Administrability for the DOR (Federal conformity) is simplified by the existence of this code section. Providing an incentive for sustainable environmental
practices is a worthy goal. It may be worth continuing to keep track of the taxpayer types that take advantage of this (individual / corporate).
Page 68 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
T AX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exclusion of Payments Received Under
Government Conservation, Reclamation and
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Restoration Programs
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.017
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED Code § 126
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1978
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $0.4 million for personal income tax
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS filers annually during FY 22 - FY 26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
Description of the Tax Expen diture: Is
Y
t
E
h
S
e p u r po s
N
e
O
d efined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not explicitly state the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of purpose of this tax expenditure.
determining income, property owners may
exclude from income certain payments they
receive for participating in designated
conservation, reclamation, and restoration
p W r h og a r t a a m re s. t h e policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the goal of the All states that conform to the Code for income
expenditure is to enco u r age taxpayers to tax purposes provide an exclusion for
participate in conservation, reclamation and payments received under government
restoration programs. conservation, reclamation, and restoration
programs, unless they specifically decouple
Page 69 of 367

from the Code in that regard. The Commission
is not aware of any states that have decoupled.
Page 70 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, property owners may exclude from income certain payments they
receive for participating in designated conservation, reclamation and restoration
1
programs. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 126. That section allows an
exclusion for payments made by federal and state government agencies to offset the costs
that property owners incur to conserve soil and water, protect or restore the environment,
2
improve forests, or provide a habitat for wildlife. Payments are not eligible for the
exclusion if they result in a substantial increase in the annual income derived from the
3
property by the owner.
In the absence of the exclusion, property owners would be required to pay Massachusetts
personal income tax on amounts they receive from government conservation, reclamation
and restoration programs. Personal income tax revenue foregone as a result of the
exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to
participate in conservation, reclamation and restoration programs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for payments from government conservation,
reclamation and restoration programs does not present any special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DO R). Conformity with the federal exclusion simplifies tax
1
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to Code § 126 as
amended on January 1, 2022, and in effect for the taxable year, with certain exceptions not relevant to this
report. M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c).
2
Qualifying government programs include (i) the rural clean water program authorized by section 208(j) of
the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1288(j)), (ii) the rural abandoned mine program
authorized by section 406 of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. 1236), (iii)
the water bank program authorized by the Water Bank Act (16 U.S.C. 1301 et seq.), (iv) the emergency
conservation measures program authorized by title IV of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1978, (v) the
agricultural conservation program authorized by the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act (16 U.S.C.
590a), (vi) the resource conservation and development program authorized by the Bankhead-Jones Farm
Tenant Act and by the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act (7 U.S.C. 1010; 16 U.S.C. 590a et seq.),
(vii) any small watershed program administered by the Secretary of Agriculture which is determined by the
Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate to be substantially similar to the type of programs described in
paragraphs (1) through (8), or (viii) any program of a State, possession of the United States, a political
subdivision of any of the foregoing, or the District of Columbia under which payments are made to individuals
primarily for the purpose of conserving soil, protecting or restoring the environment, improving forests, or
providing a habitat for wildlife.
3
An increase in annual income is considered substantial if it exceeds the greater o f: (1) 10% of the average
annual income derived from the affected property prior to receipt of the improvement, or (2) an amount
equal to $2.50 times the number of affected acres. Temporary Reg. § 16A.126-1).
Page 71 of 367

compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be
used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for employers and employees.
DIRECT COSTS
Revenue loss estimates resulting from this tax expenditure are based on estimates for the
corresponding federal exclusion provided by the Joint Committee on Taxation, Congress of
4
the United States (JCT) in the most recent federal tax expenditure report. To share down
the federal estimates to Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for
5
the differences between federal and state fiscal years, effective tax rates, and size of tax
base. Table 1 provides revenue loss estimates resulting from this tax expenditure during
the FY22 - FY26 period, which are $0.4 million per year.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exclusion of Payments Received Under
Government Conservation, Reclamation and Restoration Programs
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Revenue Loss ($ Million) $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4
DIRECT BENEFITS
Property owners (e.g., farmers) participating in the various designated conservation,
6
reclamation and restoration programs are the direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure.
Looking at Table 2, as of 2022, there were 582 farms in Massachusetts that received
payments for various government programs, according to the data from the U.S.
Department of Agriculture (USDA). 136 of the 582 farms were owned by corporations and
337 were individual or family owned. The total value of government payments was
approximately $14 million. It is not clear from this data if the entirety of these payments
would be within the scope of this tax expenditure.
4
JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue Act
of 1926. Among other tasks, JCT provides revenue estimates for federal tax expenditures and tax legislation
considered by the Congress. See https://www.jct.gov/about-us/overview/.
5 st th
Note that the federal fiscal year runs from
st
October 1
th
to September 30 of the following year, while the
Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1 to June 30 of the following year.
6
Visit https://www.fsa.usda.gov/programs-and-services/conservation-programs/index
Page 72 of 367

Table 2. Statistics for Potential Beneficiaries of Exclusion of Payments Received
Under Government Conservation, Reclamation
and Restoration Programs (Year 2022) - Massachusetts
Value of Government
Type of Organization Number of Farms
Payments ($000) *
Family or individual 337 6,087
Partnership 92 3,181
Corporation 136 4,390
Other 17 383
Total 582 14,041
Source: USDA (2022). See the reference for full source information.
* It includes all government programs, not specific for the tax incentive.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exclusion for
payments received under government conservation, reclamation and restoration programs
unless they specifically decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not
aware of any states that have decoupled.
Page 73 of 367

References
Estimates Of Federal Tax Expenditures For
Fiscal Years 2023-2027.
Joint Committe on Taxation. (2023, December 7).
Retrieved from The Joint Committe on Taxation:
https://www.jct.gov/publications/2023/jcx-5290-2232/ C ensus of Agriculture - State
Data (Massachusetts).
USDA, National Agriculture Statistics Service. (2022).
Table 74. Retrieved from
https://www.nass.usda.gov/Publications/AgCensus/2022/Full_Report/Volume_1,_
Chapter_1_State_Level/Massachusetts/
Page 74 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.024 Exemption of Benefits, Allowances, and Combat Annual cost: $14.2 - Year of adoption: 1954 Sunset date: None
Zone Pay to Armed Forces Personnel $17.4M per year
during FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 75 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 76 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Benefits, Allowances, and
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Combat Zone Pay to Armed Forces Personnel
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.024
TAX TYPE Exclusions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED Code §§ 112, 134
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1954
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $14.2 - $17.4 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 13,306 – 14,377 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
Estimated $985 – $1,309 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE individual.
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue The statute does not state the purpose of the
Code (Code) for purposes of determining tax expenditure.
income, Massachusetts excludes from gross
income several benefits to members of the
armed services, including, under Code § 112,
(i) compensation earned by members of the
Armed Forces serving in a combat zone and
(ii) income received by such individuals who
were hospitalized as a result of injury incurred
while serving in a combat zone, and under
Code § 134, certain qualified military benefits,
such as certain medical and disability benefits,
m oving allowances, dependent care assistance,
and certain travel benefits.
Page 77 of 367

What are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that impose an income tax adopt the
exclusion is to provide tax relief to members of federal exclusion for income received for
the Armed Forces for their services generally, serving in a combat zone or during
and also to those who (i) serve in a combat hospitalization as a result of injuries incurred
z one, or (ii) were hospitalized as a result of during such service, as well as the exclusion for
injury incurred while serving in a combat zone. certain benefits to the members of the armed
forces, unless those states decouple from the
Code in that regard. The Commission is not
aware of any state that has decoupled. States
that adopt the exclusion include California,
Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island,
and Vermont.
Page 78 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Members of the Armed Forces are granted exclusions from gross income under the Internal
Revenue Code (Code). Code § 112 applies specifically to those who serve in a combat zone,
or who are hospitalized as a result of injuries received during such service and excludes
from income certain pay attributable to their service. Combat zones are designated by the
President by Executive Order. The exemption for those hospitalized continues for two
years after the end of combatant activities.
Code § 134 applies more broadly to all members of the armed forces and excludes from
income qualified benefits that are attributable to the member’s service. Examples of
qualifying benefits are veterans’ and medical benefits, disability benefits, moving
allowances, certain dependent care assistance, and certain travel benefits. If a state
provides bonus payments to a current or former uniformed services member, these
payments are also excludable from income. Note that some of these benefits, such as
certain employer-provided health benefits, might be generally excludable under other Code
provisions even in the absence of these statutory sections.
1
Massachusetts adopts the federal exclusions under Code §§ 112, 134.
In the absence of the exclusion, Armed Forces members would be required to pay
Massachusetts personal income tax on the income they receive for service in a combat zone
or during hospitalization for injuries incurred in a combat zone, and also for certain fringe
benefits received that would not be generally excluded under another Code provision.
The revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the exclusion is to provide tax relief to members of
the Armed Forces generally, and specifically to those who (i) serve in a combat zone, or (ii)
were hospitalized as a result of injury incurred while serving in a combat zone.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for qualifying benefits and for income received by
Armed Forces members for serving in a combat zone or during hospitalization as a result of
injuries incurred during such service does not present special challenges for DOR. Payors
of such income will identify it as excludable on Form W-2. Conformity with the federal
exclusion based on the 2024 Code simplifies tax compliance and administration by
1 Effective for tax years beginning on after January 1, 2024, Massachusetts conforms to Code § 117(a) as amended
on January 1, 2024, and in effect for the taxable year, with certain exceptions not relevant to this report. M.G.L. c.
62, § 1(c).
Page 79 of 367

allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal
purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the
compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $14.2 - $17.4 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Benefits, Allowances, and
Combat Zone Pay to Armed Forces Personnel
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $14.2 $15.3 $16.2 $16.6 $17.4
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the Joint
2 3
Committee on Taxation (JCT) , the Defense Manpower Data Center (DMDC) , and the
4
United States Census Bureau . The JCT reports the impact on federal tax collections
resulting from the corresponding exemption at the federal level. To share down the federal
estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the
5
differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the individuals who receive certain
military compensation, benefits, and allowances eligible for the exclusion. Table 2 below
shows the estimated number of direct beneficiariesand the resulting tax savings per
beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 14,377 14,052 13,720 13,511 13,306
Average Tax Benefit $985 $1,089 $1,183 $1,226 $1,309
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from the Defense Manpower
Data Center (DMDC) and the U.S. Census Bureau.
In general, the number of beneficiaries is believed to be very small and likely reflected in
tax expenditure 1.025Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability Compensation and G.I.
2
The Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT). https://www.jct.gov/
3
The Defense Manpower Data Center. https://dwp.dmdc.osd.mil/dwp/app/dod-data-reports/workforce-
reports
4
The United States Census Bureau. https://www.census.gov/
5
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 80 of 367

Benefits. Due to the data limitations, estimates in Table 1 and 2 should be used with
caution.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an income tax adopt the federal exclusion for income received for
serving in a combat zone or were hospitalized as a result of injuries incurred during such
service, and for all armed services members for certain benefits attributable to their
service, unless those states decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not
aware of any state that has decoupled. States that adopt the exclusion include California,
C onnecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 81 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.025 Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability Annual cost: $49.7 - Year of adoption: 1958 Sunset date: None
Compensation and G.I. Benefits I $69.5 million I I
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☒ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □ □X
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 82 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 83 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Compensation and G.I. Benefits
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.025
TAX TYPE Exclusions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED 38 U.S.C. § 5301
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1958
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $49.7 - $69.5 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 81,240 – 81,384 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
Estimated $610 – $856 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE individual.
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Federal law provides that amounts received as Federal law prevents the taxation of veterans'
veterans' disability pensions, disability disability pensions, disability compensation
compensation and G.I. benefits are exempt and G.I. benefits. There is no provision in the
from federal and state taxation. Massachusetts Internal Revenue Code (Code) or the
is thus not permitted to tax such amounts. M assachusetts statute adopting the tax
What are the policy goals of the eAxrpee tnhdeirtuer oet. her states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Federal law prevents the federal government
federal law exempting veterans' disability or any state from imposing an income tax on
pensions, disability compensation and G.I. veterans’ disability pensions, disability
benefits from taxation is to prevent such compensation, and G.I. benefits.
Page 84 of 367

b enefits from being diminished by subjecting
them to income tax.
Page 85 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Federal law provides that “[p]payments of benefits due or to become due under any law
administered by the Secretary [of Veterans Affairs] . . . made to, or on account of, a
beneficiary shall be exempt from taxation.” 38 U.S.C. 5301(a)(1). The preemption applies
for both federal and state tax purposes. As a result of this preemption, Massachusetts is not
permitted to impose income tax on veterans’ disability pensions, disability compensation,
and G.I. benefits. Note that the exemption does not apply to ordinary pensions received for
serving in the military. There is no provision in the Internal Revenue Code (Code) or the
Massachusetts General Laws specifically adopting the federal preemption.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the federal preemption is to prevent amounts
received as veterans' disability pensions, disability compensation and G.I. benefits from
being diminished by subjecting them to income tax.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for military disability income does not present special
challenges for DOR. Such income is not reported as taxable on Forms W-2 or 1099 for
either federal or state purposes and is therefore distinguishable from other income.
Conformity with the federal preemption simplifies tax compliance and administration by
allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal
purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the
compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $49.7 - $69.5
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Veterans' Pensions,
Disability Compensation and G.I. Benefits
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $49.7 $57.4 $61.0 $63.9 $69.5
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on data from the Joint Committee
1 2
on Taxation (JCT) and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) . The VA provides
benefits to military veterans and their dependents, while the JCT reports the impact on
federal tax collections resulting from the corresponding exemption of such benefits at the
1 The Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT). https://www.jct.gov/
2 The U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs (VA). https://department.va.gov/
Page 86 of 367

federal level. To share down the federal estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR
3
adjusted the federal estimates for the differences between federal and state fiscal years ,
effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct benefits of this tax expenditure are the tax savings from the exemption of
benefits administered by the VA.
Military veterans and their dependents who receive disability pensions, disability
compensation, and G.I. benefits are the direct beneficiaries of this exemption. The
exemption allows these taxpayers to exclude the benefit payment(s) received from their
gross income subject to tax. Table 2 below shows the estimated number of direct
beneficiariesand the resulting tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 81,384 81,348 81,312 81,276 81,240
Average Tax Benefit $610 $705 $750 $786 $856
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from the Department
of Veterans Affairs.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
3
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 87 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
F ederal law prevents the federal government or any state from imposing an income tax on
vet erans’ pensions, disability compensation, and G.I. benefits.
Page 88 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.026 Exemption of Military Disability Pensions Annual cost: $0.6 - Year of adoption: 1971 Sunset date: none
$0.8 million per year
during FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Gratitude/incentive for military service
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □ □X
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □X □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 89 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 90 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption of Military Disability Pensions
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.026
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c); IRC §§ 104(a)(4) and (5),
YEAR ENACTED and IRC §§ 104 (b)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1971
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $0.6 - $0.8 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 3,015 – 3,161 per year during FY22-
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY26.
Estimated $198 – $243 per benefiting
individual.
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, amounts received as
m ilitary disability pensions are excluded from
g W ro h s a s t i a n r c e o m th e e . policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that impose an income tax adopt the
expenditure is to prevent amounts received a s exclusion for military disability pensions
military disability pensions from being unless they decouple from the Code in that
diminished by subjecting them to income tax. regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled. States that adopt the
exclusion include California, Connecticut,
Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 91 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts adopts federal gross income as the starting point for determining income
subject to the personal income tax. Massachusetts uses the definition of federal gross
income as determined under the Internal Revenue Code (Code) as it appeared on January 1,
2022. As a result, Massachusetts adopts the federal income exclusion for “amounts
received as a pension, annuity, or similar allowance for personal injuries or sickness
resulting from active service in the armed forces or as a result of certain terrorist attacks.”
1
See Code §§ 104(a)(4),(5) (b). To qualify for the exclusion under Code §§ 104(a)(4), a
payment generally must be made because of a combat-related injury. This report refers to
payments that are excludable from federal and Massachusetts income under Code § 104 as
military disability pensions. The revenue foregone by not taxing these amounts constitutes
a tax expenditure.
Note that there is a different exemption for military retirement payments that are
unrelated to personal injury or sickness resulting from active service. Please see TERC
Report 1.029.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to prevent amounts received as
military disability pensions from being diminished by subjecting them to income tax.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for military disability retirement income does not
present special challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal exclusion based on the
2022 Code simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules
and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
Note, however, that changes to the federal rules in the future could complicate
administration of the exclusion if Massachusetts law is not updated to conform to those
changes.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $0.6 - $0.8 million
per year during FY22-FY26. See Table 1.
1
The exclusion applies to service in any country’s military and also to service in the National Oceanic and
Atmospheric Administration, the Public Health Service, or the Foreign Service.
Page 92 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Military Disability Benefits
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $0.6 $0.6 $0.6 $0.7 $0.8
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the Joint
2 3
Committee on Taxation (JCT) and data from the Office of the Actuary (OACT) , an agency
of the United States Department of Defense (DoD). The JCT reports the impact on federal
tax collections resulting from the corresponding exemption at the federal level. To share
down the federal estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal
4
estimates for the differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective tax rates, and
size of tax base using the DoD data.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the individuals who receive military
disability retirement payments eligible for the exclusion. As such, they can exclude their
federal government disability pension payments received from Massachusetts Part B
income. Table 2 below shows the estimated number of direct beneficiariesand the
resulting tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 3,015 3,051 3,087 3,124 3,161
Average Tax Benefit $21 5 $206 $198 $238 $243
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from the DoD’s an nual
“Statistical Report on the Military Retirement System”
Disability payments from the DoD are computed by two separate methods, the years-of-
service or the percentage-of-disability. Payments determined by the number of years of
service are taxable under the Code. From their annual report, the DoD data does not
distinguish between disability payments that are taxable and those that are non-taxable
but rather reports all payments in the aggregate. Due to this, the number of beneficiaries in
Table 2 may be overstated as it may include recipients of taxable disability benefits.
Disability benefits that are taxable under the Code may still be exempt under
Massachusetts law as reflect ed in Tax Expenditure item 1.029.
2 https://www.jct.gov/
3
The Office of the Actuary fulfils the statutory requirements for the actuarial reporting of the Military
Retirement System, Military Health System, Education Benefits Fund, and the Voluntary Separation Incentive
Fund. https://actuary.defense.gov/
4
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 93 of 367

This tax expenditure may also include certain Department of Veteran Affairs (VA) benefits.
However, it is not possible to determine the breakout between the DoD and VA payments
for this tax expenditure as DOR’s estimates are derived from that of the JCT. In addition,
DOR does not have data to estimate the number of VA payment recipients or the number of
recipients of other disability retirement payments, who are also the beneficiaries of this tax
5
expenditure.
Lastly, the estimates also include federal income tax exemption IRC §§ 104(a)(5) which
provides for the exclusion of disability payments stemming from injuries sustained from a
terrorist attack, while on official duties, outside of the U.S.A. before 2001. The total number
of beneficiaries is believed to be very small, with an even smaller number of those
individuals currently residing in Massachusetts.
Due to the data limitations discussed above, estimates in Table 2 should be used with
caution.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an income tax adopt the exclusion for military disability pensions
unless they decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled. States that adopt the exclusion include California, Connecticut,
Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
5
In general, disability compensation provided by VA is non-taxable. See tax expenditure item 1.025 for V.A.
benefits and beneficiaries.
Page 94 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.027 Exemption of Compensation to Massachusetts-Based Annual cost: $10.6 - Year of adoption: Sunset date: None
Nonresident Military Personnel $12.8 million per year 1973
during FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Aligning Massachusetts law with federal law,
recognizing/rewarding military service.
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □ □X
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □X □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □ □X
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□X □ □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □X □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 95 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: While the exemption is challenging to administer because identifying beneficiaries is “a fact-intensive determination which requires a case-by-
case analysis,” eliminating the exemption would have no impact since federal law does not allow states to tax the compensation of non-resident service
members. Commission discussed the possibility of removing this from the list of tax expenditures, since the Commonwealth is not able to tax non-resident
military personnel, making this more of an unfunded mandate than an expenditure. We also noted that keeping this on the list does mean that, if there is
a change in federal law that enables the state to tax non-resident military personnel, we would have a record of reviews of what would then be a tax
expenditure.
Page 96 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Compensation to Massachusetts-
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Based Nonresident Military Personnel
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.027
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1973
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $10.6 - $12.8 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 3,231 – 3,377 per year during FY22
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT - FY26.
Estimated $3,279 – $3,807 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE i☐nd ividual. ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Nonresident servicemembers are not subject to T he statue does not state the purpose of the
personal income tax on compensation for personal income tax exemption.
active-duty military service, even if the service
W is p h e a r t f a o r rm e t e h d e i np Molaicssya g ch o u a s ls e t o ts f . t h e Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Most states exempt nonresident
expenditure is to ensure that nonresident servicemembers’ military compensation from
servicemembers do not become subject to income tax. However, even if a state does not
personal income tax by reason of their explicitly do so by statute, federal law imposes
assignments to military posts in Massachusetts. such an exemption.
Page 97 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Nonresident servicemembers are not subject to personal income tax on compensation for
active-duty military service, even if the service is performed in Massachusetts. In general,
nonresidents are subject to personal income tax on income from Massachusetts sources,
including employment in the Commonwealth. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(a). However,
Massachusetts provides an exception to the general rule with regard to compensation
received by nonresidents for active-duty military service. The exception is implemented by
M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c), which deems such compensation “to be from sources other than
sources within the Commonwealth.” Further, days spent in the Commonwealth while on
active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States do not count toward the183-day
1
residency rule. See M.G.L c. 62, § 1(f).
Note that federal law imposes the same rule as M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c) by providing that
compensation for active-duty military service may not be sourced to a state in which a
nonresident servicemember is serving in compliance with military orders. See 50 U.S.C.A. §
4001(b). The federal exemption also applies to certain income earned by spouses of
nonresident servicemembers. See 50 U.S.C.A. § 4001(c). Massachusetts follows the federal
exemption for military spouses even though spouses are not referenced in M.G.L. c. 62, §
5A(c). The federal exemption, including for military spouses, applies regardless of whether
Massachusetts imposes its own exemption under M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c).
Personal income tax revenue foregone as a result of exempting nonresident
servicemembers’ military compensation constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to ensure that nonresident
servicemembers do not become subject to personal income tax by reason of their
assignments to military posts in Massachusetts.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exemption for nonresident servicemembers’ military
compensation presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR). Such
compensation is taxable if received by resident service members. Thus, to monitor
eligibility for the exemption the DOR must distinguish between resident and nonresident
servicemembers. Residency is a fact-intensive determination, which requires a case-by-
case analysis. Administratio n is relatively simple for nonresident servicemembers as they
1
The 183-day residency rule is codified in G.L. c. 62, § 1(f), which defines the term “resident” to include a
person who “who maintains a permanent place of abode in the commonwealth and spends in the aggregate
more than one hundred and eighty-three days in the commonwealth.” A “nonresident” is “any natural person
who is not a resident or inhabitant.” G.L. c. 62, § 1(f).
Page 98 of 367

are not required to provide any documentation of their residency status to the DOR in
order to claim the exemption and are not required to file returns reporting exempt income.
Nonresident servicemembers are required to provide such information if they are
subjected to an audit.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $10.6 - $12.8
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Compensation to
Massachusetts-based Non-resident members of the Uniformed Services
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $10.6 $11.1 $11.9 $12.5 $12.8
2
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based mostly on data from the Defense
3
Manpower Data Center (DMDC) , which serves under the Office of the Secretary of Defense
(OSD), to provide data for the United States Department of Defense (DoD). The DMDC
provides monthly military personnel data by state.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the active-duty members of the U.S.
armed forces who are temporarily stationed in Massachusetts but are not residents of the
Commonwealth. As such, they can exclude their federal government pay from Part B
income. Table 2 below shows the estimated number of direct beneficiariesand the average
tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 3,231 3,304 3,377 3,369 3,361
Average Tax Benefit $3,279 $3,368 $3,522 $3,706 $3,807
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from the Defense
Manpower Data Center.
2
DOR does not have data on the amount of exempt income earned by spouses of nonresident
servicemembers. Therefore, the revenue loss due to the exemption of such income is not reflected in the
estimates in Table 1.
3
The Defense Manpower Data Center collates personnel, manpower, training, financial, and other data for the
Department of Defense (DoD). https://dwp.dmdc.osd.mil/dwp/app/dod-data-reports/workforce-reports.
Page 99 of 367

EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states exempt nonresident servicemembers’ military compensation from income tax.
However, even if a state does not explicitly do so by statute, federal law imposes such an
e xemption.
Page 100 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.028 Exemption of Income Received by Persons Killed in Annual cost: Year of adoption: 1988 Sunset date: None
Military Action or Terrorist Activity <$50,000 (Kill in Military); 2002
(Terrorist Activity)
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□X □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □ □X
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□X □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 101 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
• Strongly disagree that the TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers, as the average number of taxpayers eligible to claim this benefit is less than
5.
• Strongly disagree that the TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers because the TE is broadly available without any income
considerations.
Page 102 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Income Received by Persons
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Killed in Military Action or Terrorist Activity
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.028
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 25; IRC, § 692.
1988 for deaths in active military service; 2002
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE for deaths related to certain terrorist acts.
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT N/A
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Negligible
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Negligible
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐e g ligible ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Certain individuals that died as a result of The statute does not state the purpose of the tax
injuries sustained in (i) military service in a expenditure.
combat zone, (ii) military or civilian service in
a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii)
specified terrorist attacks on civilians are
exempted from the Massachusetts personal
income tax, subject to certain limitations. The
Massachusetts exemption parallels a similar
f W ed h e a r t a a l r e e x e t m he p tpioonli. c y goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Many states provide a similar exemption from
expenditure is to provide tax relief to the income taxes, including California, Connecticut,
families of taxpayers that die as a result of Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
injuries sustained in (i) military service in a
Page 103 of 367

combat zone, (ii) military or civilian service in The Commission is not aware of any state
a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii) without a similar exemption.
specified terrorist attacks.
Page 104 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Certain individuals that died as a result of injuries sustained in (i) military service in a
combat zone, (ii) military or civilian service in a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii)
specified terrorist attacks on civilians are exempted from the Massachusetts personal
income tax, subject to certain limitations. M.G.L. c. 62, § 25. Section 25 is a Massachusetts-
specific exemption, but it generally follows the same rules and definitions as are used in a
similar federal exemption set out in Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 692. See Technical
Information Release (TIR) 02-19.
The Massachusetts and federal exemptions from personal income tax apply only to eligible
tax years. For deaths resulting from injuries sustained in military service in a combat zone,
eligible tax years are the tax year in which the death occurred and all immediately
preceding tax years starting with the tax year in which the decedent first served in the
combat zone. M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(b); Code § 692(a). For other deaths, the exemption applies
to the year of death and all immediately preceding tax years starting with the year
immediately preceding the year the injury occurred. M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(b); Code § 692(c),
(d). Note that the exemption for civilian victims of terrorist attacks who were not
employees of the United States applies only to individuals who died: (i) of wounds or injury
incurred as a result of the terrorist attacks against the United States on April 19, 1995, or
September 11, 2001, or (ii) of illness incurred as a result of an attack involving anthrax
occurring on or after September 11, 2001 and before January 1, 2002.
Combat zones are designated by the President by Executive Order. A military action is
defined as any military action involving the US armed forces and resulting from violence or
aggression against the US or any of its allies (or threat thereof). See M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(b),
referring to Code § 692(c)(2)(B). Terrorist attacks are limited to the Oklahoma City
bombing of April 1995, the World Trade Center attack of September 2001, and attacks
involving anthrax occurring on or after September 11, 2001, and before January 1, 2002.
See M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(c)(4); 26 USC, see also Code § 692(d)(4).
In the absence of the exemption, individuals who die as a result of service in combat zones,
military actions, or specified terrorist attacks would be required to pay Massachusetts
personal income tax on all of their income. The revenue foregone as a result of the
exemption constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to provide tax relief to the families
of taxpayers that die as a result of injuries sustained in (i) military service in a combat zone,
Page 105 of 367

(ii) military or civilian service in a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii) specified
terrorist attacks.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exemption does not present special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). The exemption conforms to an analogous federal
exemption. This simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same
general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be negligible, or less
than $50,000 per year, during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for Taxpayers Killed in Military
Action or by Terrorist Activity
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible
Note: "Negligible" means that the estimate is less than $50,000.
1
According to data from the Defense Manpower Data Center , there were 2,857,681 active-
duty military, national guard/reserve, and appropriated fund (APF) Department of Defense
(DOD) civilian personnel in the United States including those posted in foreign countries as
of September 30, 2023. Massachusetts’ share is estimated to be about 0.9%, or
approximately 26,000 personnel.
2
Similarly, based on data from the Defense Casualty Analysis System , DOR estimated that
there were about 460 active-duty military and civilian death in calendar 2022. Assuming
Massachusetts’s share of military and civilian death is also 0.9% as estimated above, and
assuming $50,000 as an average annual income of the deceased personnel eligible for the
tax expenditure, and the average number of eligible tax years for each deceased personnel
is less than 5, the annual revenue impact of this tax expenditure is estimated to be less than
$50,000, or negligible.
1
https://dwp.dmdc.osd.mil/dwp/app/dod-data-reports/workforce-reports
2
https://dcas.dmdc.osd.mil/dcas/app/summaryData/deaths/byYearManner
Page 106 of 367

DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct benefits of this exemption are to provide tax relief to individuals who have lost a
family member to service during a military action or a terrorist attack. No direct data on
these direct beneficiaries has been found except for the estimates provided in the previous
section.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance. However, since the direct costs
and benefits of this exemption are negligible, the indirect and induced costs and benefits
are also negligible.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Many states provide a similar exemption from income tax, including California,
Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. The Commission is not aware
of any state without a similar exemption.
Page 107 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.031 & 1.422 Health Savings Accounts (exemption & Annual cost: $36.0 - Year of adoption: 2005 Sunset date: None
I I I
deduction) $68.5 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □x
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 108 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Because the report does not cover the business contributions, we completed this form for the individual taxpayer only. But the business benefits as well
via lower premiums as well as no income tax, and no payroll taxes on the employer contributions.
Page 109 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMB ER H ealth Savings Accounts (exemption & deduction)
1.031 (earnings and distributions) & 1.422
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY (contributions)
Exclusions From Gross Income & Deductions from
TAX TYPE Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REF ERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1(c), 1(d), and 2(d)(1); IRC § 223
REPEAL/EXPIRA TION DATE 2005
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $36.0 - $68.5 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 – FY26.
1.422: 43,621 – 57,600 taxpayers per year during
FY22 - FY26
1.031: 537,200 – 681,413 funded HSA accounts
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT per year during FY22 - FY26
$121 - $129 per benefiting taxpayer during FY22-
FY26 for 1.422; $35-$90 per funded HSA account
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE during FY22-FY26
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not explicitly state the purpose of
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of this tax expenditure.
determining income, eligible contributions to,
earnings in, and qualified distributions from
health savings accounts (HSAs) are not subject
tWo hthaet apreers tohnea pl ionlciocym geo taalxs. o f the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that conform to the Code for income tax
expenditure is to incentivize individuals with purposes provide an exemption, deduction, or
Page 110 of 367

high deductible health care plans to sav e for exclusion for eligible contributions to, earnings in,
medical expenses that they may incur before and qualified distributions from HSAs, unless they
meeting their plan’s annual deductible. have specifically decoupled from the Code in that
regard. Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode
Island, and Vermont follow the federal treatment
of HSAs. California has decoupled from the
federal treatment and taxes both employee and
employer contributions to HSAs.
Page 111 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income and Massachusetts’ adoption of the deductions included in Code § 62,
eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from health savings
accounts (HSAs) are not subject to the personal income tax. Specifically, Massachusetts
adopts Code § 223, which sets out the federal tax treatment of HSAs. Code § 223 allows
employees a deduction for eligible contributions to an HSA. Employer contributions may
be excluded from employee income under Code § 106. (The exclusion for employer
contributions is described in Tax Expenditure Report 1.004). In addition, Code § 223
allows earnings to accumulate in an HSA free of tax. Code § 223 also allows an exclusion
from income for qualified distributions. Massachusetts adopts Code § 223 as currently in
1
effect.
An HSA is a tax-exempt trust created for the purpose of paying a taxpayer’s qualified
e.g.
medical expenses. An HSA may receive cash contributions from the taxpayer or any other
person ( , a family member or employer) on behalf of the taxpayer. Contributions other
than those from an employer may be deductible from the taxpayer’s gross income.
To qualify for the deduction for contributions in a taxable year, the taxpayer must be an
“eligible individual” for any month in that tax year. In general, to be eligible for a given
month a person must: (i) be covered under a high deductible health plan on the first day of
the month, (ii) have no other health coverage (except for coverage that is expressly
permitted by Code § 223, such as coverage for dental care or workers’ compensation
claims) for that month, (iii) not be enrolled in Medicare for that month, and (iv) not be
claimed as a dependent on someone else’s return for that tax year.
Contributions to an HSA are subject to federal limitations, which are adjusted annually for
inflation. For calendar year 2024, the deduction limit is $4,150 for an individual and
$8,300 for a family. The limit is increased by $1,000 for individuals who are age 55 or
older. The limit is reduced by the amount of any contributions to an Archer Medical
Savings Account (Archer MSA). (Archer MSAs are described in Tax Expenditure Reports
1.040 and 1.420). The limit may also be lower depending on the taxpayer’s: (i) type of high
deductible health plan, (ii) age, and (iii) number of months of eligibility during the taxable
year.
Interest and any other earnings in an HSA accrue on a tax-free basis.
1
M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1(c) (stating that when used in chapter 62, “Code shall mean the Code as amended and in
effect for the taxable year for sections . . . 223”); M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(d) (stating that when used in chapter 62, the
term “Federal gross income” shall mean “gross income as defined under the Code.”)
Page 112 of 367

Qualified distributions from HSAs are excluded from gross income. To qualify,
distributions must be used for “qualified medical expenses.” In general, qualified medical
expenses are medical expenses that are not reimbursed by an individual’s high deductible
health plan because the beneficiary has not yet reached the deductible amount. Qualified
medical expenses may be incurred by the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s spouse or
dependents. Distributions that are not used for qualified medical expenses are included in
the taxpayer’s income and will be subject to a 20 percent federal penalty unless a penalty
2
exemption applies.
In the absence of the special treatment of HSAs described above, taxpayer contributions to
HSAs, HSA earnings, and HSA distributions would be subject to personal income tax. The
revenue foregone as a result of such special treatment constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize individuals with high
deductible health care plans to save for medical expenses that they may incur before
meeting their plan’s annual deductible.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exclusion and deduction does not present special challenges for
the Department of Revenue (DOR). Administrators of HSAs report account activity,
including gross distributions and “prohibited transactions” on Form 1099-SA, which must
be provided to the taxpayer, Internal Revenue Service (IRS), and DOR. The prohibited
transaction information indicates a potential taxable distribution. This information
provides a means for the IRS and DOR to monitor compliance with the distribution
rules. Conformity with federal treatment of HSAs simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
3
The revenue loss resulting from the exemption of earnings in the HSA accounts is
estimated to be $30.7 - $61.1 million per year during FY22 - FY26. The revenue loss
resulting from the deduction for contributions to HAS accounts is estimated to be $5.3 -
2 See
In general, states do not impose such a penalty. The federal penalty does not affect federal taxable
income. Rather, it is an addition to the federal tax. Code § 223(f)(4)(A).
3
To avoid double counting of tax benefits, exemption of HSA distribution is not covered in the estimates of
1.031 since the exempt distribution has already been either exempted as earnings or deducted as
contribution before distribution.
Page 113 of 367

$7.4 million per year for the same period. The combined total revenue loss for the period is
estimTataebdl eto 1 b. Te a$x3 6R.0e v- e$n6u8e.5 L. oSsese ETsatbimle a1t ebse lfoowr .H ealth Savings Accounts ($Million)
Fiscal Year FY2022 FY2023 FY2024 FY2025 FY2026
1.422 (Deduction of Contributions *) $5.3 $5.3 $5.9 $6.4 $7.4
1.031 (Exemption of Earnings) $30.7 $19.6 $25.8 $52.7 $61.1
Total $36.0 $25.1 $32.6 $62.2 $74.1
* Excluding employer contributions
To estimate the revenue loss resulting from the deduction for contributions to HAS
accounts, DOR’s personal income tax return data on the HSA deduction amounts was
￼
employed on personal income tax returns. The deduction amounts were multiplied by the
4
personal income tax rate (5%) to arrive at the revenue loss
To estimate the revenue loss resulting from the exemption for earning, DOR relied on data
from Devenir Research, a leading provider of investment solutions for HSAs. Devenir
Research regularly publishes reports and data on HSA market trends. Looking at Figure 1
from Devenir (2023), the total balance of HSA assets in the U.S. has grown exponentially,
especially for HSA investment assets. According to Devenir (2022), as of 2022, the total
balance of HSA assets for Massachusetts was about 2.5% of that for the U.S. Multiplying
that balance by the Massachusetts personal income tax rate (5%) and by a weighted
5 ￼
average yield for HSA assets produced estimates of revenue loss resulting from the
6
exemption of earnings in the HSA accounts
4
Further minor adjustments, such as growth for future years, qualified HSA funding distributions (not
included in deduction but is not taxable), were incorporated to arrive at the final estimates.
5
There is no reliable data on this yield, and so we had to assume a certain percent after examining general
economic trends and statistics.
6
Given the use of external data and the assumption needed for weighted average yield for HSA assets, the
estimates for 1.031 are more uncertain than the estimates for 1.422 and should be used with more caution.
Page 114 of 367

Figure 1. Total HSA Assets by Type for the U.S.
$168.3
Total HSA Assets (in billions)
■ Investments
■ Deposits
2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
(est) (est) (est)
Source: Devenir (2023). Please see the reference for a full citation.
DIRECT BENEFITS
7
Direct beneficiaries of the tax expenditure are individuals with health savings accounts.
Since not all health saving accounts receive employee contributions for a given year, the
number of direct beneficiaries for 1.422 (deduction component) is smaller than that for
1.031 (exemption component). The direct beneficiaries for the deduction and exemption
components of this tax expenditure are discussed separately.
Table 2 shows the distribution of the deduction by income brackets for tax year 2022.
44,091 personal income taxpayers (1.1% of all tax filers) claimed a total of $104.2 million
8
in health savings account deduction for tax year 2022. The average deduction amount per
taxpayer was $2,363 resulting in an average tax saving of $118.
7
Health savings account holders’ spouses and dependents may also benefit from this tax expenditure. For tax
year 2022, on average each taxpayer who claimed the deduction on the return represents 2.3 persons,
including the taxpayer (a joint filer is counted as two persons) and the taxpayer’s dependents.
8
Note that the deduction reported in Table 2 does not include exclusion of employer contributions (including
employee payroll contributions through a cafeteria plan) from employee income, which is covered by tax
expenditure 1.004.
Page 115 of 367

Table 2. Health Savings Accounts Deduction by Income Bracket, Tax Year 2022
Health Savings Accounts Deduction
Average
(For claimants with tax liability)
Massachusetts Net Claimant
Count of Average Income
Adjusted Gross Income Tax
All Filers Number Deduction Group's
(AGI) Savings (at
of Amount per % of Total
a 5% rate)
claimants Deducted Claimant Deduction
Under $50,000 1,994,190 8,368 $6,155,784 $736 5.9% $37
$50,000 under $100,000 922,323 9,961 $15,209,120 $1,527 14.6% $76
$100,000 under $150,000 409,770 6,786 $14,717,687 $2,169 14.1% $108
$150,000 under $200,000 224,101 4,588 $12,190,007 $2,657 11.7% $133
$200,000 under $500,000 332,666 9,900 $33,113,649 $3,345 31.8% $167
$500,000 under $1,000,000 62,272 2,650 $12,282,444 $4,635 11.8% $232
$1,000,000 or Over 30,351 1,838 $10,500,878 $5,713 10.1% $286
Total 3,975,673 44,091 $104,169,569 $2,363 100.0% $118
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, 2022 individual income tax return data, preliminary and subject to change
Note: Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is the sum of Earned Income, Interest and Dividends,
Short-Term Capital Gains and Long-Term Capital Gains.
Massachusetts taxpayers with a net AGI higher than $1 million constituted a smaller
proportion of taxpayers (1,838 or 4% of all taxpayers claiming this deduction) than those
in other income brackets. On the other hand, this income bracket had the highest average
deduction per taxpayer ($5,713) and average tax saving ($286) among all income brackets.
In contrast, Massachusetts taxpayers with a net AGI under $50,000 had 8,368 claiments
with the lowest average deduction per taxpayer ($736) and average tax saving ($37). In
addition, this income bracket claimed only 5.9% of the total deduction amount, although
19% (=8,368/44,091) of claiments are represented in this income bracket. Massachusetts
taxpayers with net AGI from $200,000 to $500,000 claimed the highest percentage of the
total deduction amount (31.8%) with a total of 9,900 taxpayers and $33.1 million in
deductions, which was the highest among all income brackets. Table 2 also shows that the
average deduction and average tax saving increase with income indicating that taxpayers
with higher income are more likely to make more contributions to their health savings
accounts than taxpayers with lower income.
Although this report does not cover employer contributions to health savings accounts,
interested readers can find the distribution of employer contributions by income vs the
distribution of employee or individual contributions by income in the appendix.
For the deduction (1.422), table 3 shows DOR’s projection of the number of taxpayers who
will claim the health savings account deduction in future years and their average tax
9
saving.
9
Different from Table 2, average tax saving in Table 3 includes tax saving resulting from qualified HSA
funding distributions, which are also not taxed.
Page 116 of 367

Table 3. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit for Deduction
Component (1.422)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 43,621 44,091 47,455 50,932 57,600
Average Tax Benefit $121 $121 $124 $126 $129
Source: Internal Revenue Service (IRS); Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
For the exemption (1.031), table 4 shows DOR’s projection of the number of funded HSA
accounts in future years and average tax saving per such account. DOR created projections
using data from Devenir (2022) and Devenir (2023). Please note that a person may hold
multiple health savings accounts, therefore Table 4 does not show the number of
accountholders and average tax savings per accountholder. DOR estimated that each
funded HSA account may cover 2.53 persons on average, including accountholders and
their spouses and dependents.
Table 4. Number of Funded HSA Accounts & Average Tax Benefit per Such Account
Due to Exemption of Earnings in These Account (1.031)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Funded HSA Accounts 537,200 553,000 592,862 635,597 681,413
Average Tax Benefit per Such Account $57 $35 $44 $83 $90
Source: Devenir Research; Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exemption, deduction
or exclusion for eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from
Page 117 of 367

HSAs, unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. Connecticut,
Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont follow the federal treatment of
HSAs. California has decoupled from the federal treatment and taxes both employer and
e mployee contributions to HSAs.
Page 118 of 367

REFERENCES
Devenir (2023). Devenir Research: 2023 Year-End HSA Market Statistics & Trends
(Executive Summary). Retrieved from https://www.devenir.com/wp-
content/uploads/2023-Year-End-Devenir-HSA-Research-Report-Executive-
Summary.pdf
Devenir (2022). Devenir Research: 2022 Devenir & HSA Council Demographic Survey.
Retrieved from https://www.devenir.com/wp-content/uploads/2022-Devenir-and-
HSA-CounciEl-xDpeamndoignrga pHheiacl-tRhe Spaovritn.pgds fA ccounts Would Boost Tax Shelters, Not Access
to Care.
Lukens, G. (2023).
Washington: Center on Budget and Polcy Priorities. Retrieved from
https://www.cbpp.org/sites/default/files/5-2-23health.pdf
IRS (Internal Revenue Service). (2021). Statistics of Income, Individual Income Tax
Returns, Line Item Estimates, 2021, Publication 4801 (Rev. 2–2024). Retrieved from
https://www.irs.gov/pub/irs-pdf/p4801.pdf
Page 119 of 367

APPENDIX
Figure A1 below, taken from a report published by the Center on Budget and Policy
Priorities, shows that (i) employer contributions are much larger than individual
contributions to HSAs, (ii) HSAs benefit high income people, (iii) tax returns reporting
more than $500,000 in adjusted gross income were most likely to report individual HSA
contributions, and (iv) tax returns reporting between $200,000 and $1 million in income
were most likely to report employer HSA contributions. As of January 2022, total HSA
assets exceeded $100 billion, with HSA investment assets, such as stocks and bonds,
comprising a significant and rapidly growing portion of those assets.
Figure A1. Percentage of tax returns reporting
Health Savings Account(HAS) contributions
18%
15 Individual contributions
12 ■ Employer contributions
9
6
3
o----- --
Less than S10,000- $25,000- $50,000- $75,000- $100,000- $200,000- $500,000- $1,000,000
$10,000 $24,999 $49,999 $74,999 $99,999 $199,999 $499,999 $999,999 or more
Note: Income is measured as adjusted gross income.
Source: Congressional Research Service analysis of Internal Revenue Ser,lce data for tax yea, 2017
CENTER ON BUDGET AND POLICY PRIORITIES I CBPP ORG
Source: Lukens, G. (2023). Please see the references for a full citation.
Page 120 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.032 Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance Annual cost: Under Year of adoption: 2022 Sunset date: None
I I I
$50,000
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Ease the financial burden on
taxpayers who adopt children by excluding employer-provided adoption
benefits from gross income
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □X □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 121 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Claimed by about 90 taxpayers each year, cost is negligible, individuals with access to such employee benefits are likely to be higher income,
but benefit phases out for taxpayers with high annual incomes (phase out starts at $252,150). Due to conformity.
Page 122 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.032
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC § 137, M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1, 2(a)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE Massachusetts conformed to the federal
expenditure as of 2022
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Negligible (under $50,000)
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Estimated about 90 annually
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE E☒s ti mated abo☐ut $300 annually
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue T he statute does not state the purpose of the
Code (Code) for purposes of determining gross tax expenditure.
income for personal income tax purposes,
Massachusetts allows an exclusion for amounts
received by employees through employer-
s W p h on a s t o a r r e e d t a h d e o ppotiloinc ya s g s o is a t l a s n o c f e t p h r e o grams. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the goal of the States that conform to the Internal Revenue
exclusion is to ease the financial burden on Code for individual income tax purposes adopt
taxpayers who adopt children by excluding the exclusion for employer-provided adoption
employer-provided adoption benefits from benefits, unless they have specifically
gross income. decoupled from the Code. The Commission is
not aware of any state that has decoupled.
Page 123 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, amounts received by employees through employer-sponsored
adoption assistance programs are excluded from Massachusetts gross income. Specifically,
Massachusetts adopts Code § 137 (as amended and in effect for the 2024 tax year), which
allows the exclusion for federal tax purposes. M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1, 2(a). The maximum
amount of employer-provided adoption benefits that can be excluded is $16,810 per child,
with higher amounts excluded for the adoption of children with special needs. The
exclusion amount begins to phase out for taxpayers with income in excess of $252,150 and
is completely phased out when income reaches $292,150. The limitation amounts are
adjusted annually for inflation. See Code § 137(f). The exclusion applies to amounts used
for reasonable and necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees, and certain other
1
expenses. Adoption expenses related to surrogacy, or the adoption of a spouse’s child are
2
ineligible for the exclusion.
In the absence of the tax expenditure, qualified adoption expenses paid by an employer
through an adoption assistance program would be included in an employee’s taxable
income. The revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the goal of the exclusion is to ease the financial burden on
taxpayers who adopt children by excluding employer-provided adoption benefits from
gross income.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for employer-provided adoption assistance does not
present any special challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment simplifies
tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be
used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers and employers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be very small or
negligible (under $50,000) during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
1
Un d e r Code § 137 allowable expenses are defined by reference to Code § 23(d), which by its terms excludes
surrogacy and the adoption of a spouse’s child.
2
Id.
Page 124 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance
Fiscal Year FY2022 FY2023 FY2024 FY2025 FY2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) Not Active Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible
Note: "Negligible" means that the estimate is less than $50,000 but greater than zero.
There are no direct statistics on employer-provided adoption benefits excluded from
Massachusetts gross income. However, taxpayers need to file IRS Form 8839 to claim the
exclusion of employer-provided adoption benefits and/or adoption credits for federal tax
purposes. The IRS publishes estimates for the number of returns and amounts for selected
3
lines in Form 8839 for each tax year.
For tax year 2018, the IRS estimated that 5,995 taxpayers reported a total receipt of $45.3
million in employer-provided adoption benefits. 4,578 out of 5,995 taxpayers (76%)
reported a total of $43.9 million in benefits eligible for the exclusion (97% of the total
4
receipt). Note that for many other tax years, the IRS only provided estimates for the total
receipt of employer-provided adoption benefits and did not provide a breakdown of
benefits eligible for the exclusion.
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based on the IRS’ estimates. DOR adjusted the
IRS’ 2018 estimates to arrive at estimates of excluded benefits for all tax years. DOR then
applied Massachusetts’ share of U.S. employment (~2.4%) and Massachusetts’ part-B
income tax rate to those adjusted estimates of excluded benefits to estimate Massachusetts’
revenue loss. The estimates are volatile and less than $50,000 for most years.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are those employees who adopt children,
and the children themselves. Taxpayers with employer provided adoption benefits do not
pay taxes on some or all of the value of the adoption benefit. Note that the exclusion is
capped and begins to phase out for taxpayers with income in excess of certain level. Based
on the IRS’ 2018 estimates, DOR estimated that about 90 Massachusetts taxpayers claim
the exclusion annually with an average tax benefit of about $300 per taxpayer. Please note
5
that these numbers do not take into account of the number of adopted children.
3
https://www.irs.gov/statistics/soi-tax-stats-individual-income-tax-returns-line-item-estimates-
publications-4801-and-5385
4
For the same year, IRS estimated that 76,127 taxpayers claimed $384.6 million adoption credit.
5
According to the FY23 annual report released by the Massachusetts Department of Children and Families
(DCF) (https://www.mass.gov/doc/fy2023-dcf-annual-report/download, Table/Figure 34), 720-934
adoptions were legalized annually during FY19-FY23. However, these numbers include all adopted children
for whom the taxpayers claimed either adoption credit or exclusion. IRS’ estimates of selected Form 8839
lines indicate that much more taxpayers claimed adoption credit than exclusion.
Page 125 of 367

EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Internal Revenue Code for individual income tax purposes adopt
the exclusion for employer-provided adoption benefits, unless they have specifically
decoupled from the Code. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
Page 126 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.033 Employer-Provided Education Assistance Annual cost: $13.7- Year of adoption: 1979 Sunset date: None
I $14.8 million I I
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 127 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: This credit acts as an incentive for Massachusetts employers to offer education assistance to their workers.
Page 128 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Employer-Provided Education Assistance
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.033
TAX TYPE Exclusions From Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c); Code §§ 127 and 132(j)(8)
Massachusetts has conformed to Code § 127
1
since 1979, and has conformed to Code §
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 132(j)(8) since 1998.
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $13.7-$14.8 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 – FY26
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☒o t available☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, certain employer
payments for employee education and training
assistance are excluded from employee gross
i W nc h o a m t e a . r e the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that impose an income tax adopt the
expenditure is to encourage employees to take federal exclusion for employer-provided
education and training assistance unless they
1
Massachusetts conformity to Code § 127 has not been continuous because the federal exclusion has expired
several times and Massachusetts irregularly updates its conformity to the Code.
Page 129 of 367

advantage of employer-provided education and decouple from the Code in that regard. States
training assistance programs. that adopt the federal exclusion include
Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island,
and Vermont. California has its own state-
specific exclusion for education and training
assistance.
Page 130 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts adopts the Internal Revenue Code (Code) definition of gross income as it
appears in the Code as of January 1, 2022 for personal income tax purposes. Under the
2022 Code, certain amounts paid by an employer for employee education or training are
excluded from employee gross income.
Specifically, under Code § 127, employees can annually exclude up to $5,250 of employer
payments made pursuant to an “educational assistance program.” Code § 127(a). An
“educational assistance program” is a written plan created by an employer to provide
employees with educational assistance. Code § 127(b)(1). The plan must meet various
non-discrimination requirements. Code § 127(b)(2). Employer assistance may include
payments for an employee’s tuition, fees, textbooks, or other similar expenses. It may also
include payments towards an employee’s qualified student loan principal or interest after
2
March 27, 2020 and before 2026. Employer assistance does not include payments for
lodging, meals, transportation, tools, or supplies. An employee’s education or training does
not need to be related to their employment unless the education or training pertains to
sports, games, or hobbies. Code § 127(c)(1).
e.g.
Code § 132(j)(8) supplements Code § 127 by allowing employees to exclude employer-
provided education assistance that is not covered by Code § 127 ( , assistance above
$5,250 or assistance unrelated to an educational assistance plan.). The § 132(j)(8)
exclusion is only available if the education assistance benefit constitutes a “working
condition fringe.” In this context, the term “working condition fringe” means an employer-
provided benefit that the employee would be allowed to deduct as a trade or business
expense under Code § 162 if the employee had paid for the benefit directly.
Note that employees cannot claim a tax deduction or credit for amounts excluded under
Code §§ 127 or 132(j)(8).
Because of the Commonwealth’s reliance on the Code for purposes of determining income,
employer-provided education assistance is not included in employee gross income for
2
Beginning in tax year 2023, G.L. c. 62, § 3(B)(a)(20) allows taxpayers to deduct payments by their employer
of principal or interest with respect to the employee’s qualified education loan, as defined by Code § 221,
when those payments are not otherwise excluded from gross income under Code § 127, The parameters of
the deduction are substantially identical to the federal exclusion from gross income provided by Code §
127(c)(1). However, while Code § 127(c)(1) is limited to $5,250 per employee and applies only to employer
payments made by January 1, 2026, the new Massachusetts deduction is not subject to a dollar limit, nor does
it have a sunset date. Therefore, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, G.L. c. 62 taxpayers
will be able to deduct employer payments of principal or interest for qualified education loans pursuant to
G.L. c. 62, § 3(B)(a)(20) that are not otherwise excluded from gross income under Code § 127, including the
amount of such payments that exceeds $5,250.
Page 131 of 367

Massachusetts tax purposes. The revenue lost by not taxing these amounts constitutes a
tPaOx eLxIpCeYn dGitOuAreL. S
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage employees to take
advantage of employer-provided education and training assistance programs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for employer-provided education assistance does not
present special challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal exclusion based on the
2022 Code simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules
and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
Note, however, that changes to the federal rules in the future could complicate
administration of the exclusion, if Massachusetts law does not conform to those changes.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from conformity to Code § 127 is estimated to be $13.7 - $14.8
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Exclusion of Employer-Provided Education Assistance
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $13.7 $14.1 $14.2 $14.8 $13.7
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the
3
Congressional Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT) . The JCT reports the impact on federal
tax collections resulting from the corresponding exclusion at the federal level. To share
4
down the federal estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal
estimates for the differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective tax rates, and
size of tax base.
Table 1 reflects only the estimated cost of conformity with Code § 127 because the JCT does
not report on the cost of Code § 132(j)(8). Therefore, the estimates in Table 1
underestimate the cost of this expenditure. However, DOR estimates that the cost of
conformity with Code § 127 far exceeds the cost of conformity with Code § 132(j)(8).
3
https://www.jct.gov/.
4
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 132 of 367

DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the employees who receive employer-
provided educational assistance. Employers who provide educational assistance to their
workers are indirect beneficiaries.
Educational assistance programs help workers pursue further education, certification, or
professional development courses, which in turn boost their skills and knowledge, make
them more productive, and help their personal development and future career.
Employers also benefit from providing educational assistance to their employees. Evidence
5
shows that employer tuition benefits reduce employee turnover. Employers with tuition
reimbursement benefits are also more likely to attract and retain employees. In addition,
education and training make workers more skilled and productive, benefiting employers.
90% of midsize and large companies offer their employees some kind of tuition
reimbursement; however, only a small share of workers (less than 10%) use the benefits
6 7
annually. Data from the National Survey of College Graduates (NSCG) for 2019 and 2021
showed that among employed individuals with a bachelor’s degree or higher, 10.1%
reported that they received tuition reimbursement from their employers. The receipt of
tuition reimbursement among those with at least a bachelor’s degree varied by type of
degree. Only 5.4% of employed bachelor’s degree holders reported receipt of tuition
reimbursement while 21.4% of employed master’s degree holders reported that they
received tuition reimbursement from their current employers. Of those with a doctorate
degree, 12.1% reported receipt of tuition reimbursement from their current employers.
The incidence of tuition reimbursement from current employers among those with
professional degrees such as JD, LLB, MD, DDS, and DVM was only 3.3.%. See Chart 1
below.
5
Colleen H. Faherty, “The Effect of Tuition Reimbursement on Turnover: A Case StudyT Ahne aWlyaslils S”,t rNeaetti oJonuarln al,
Bureau of Economic Research (NBER), Working Paper 12975, http://www.nber.org/papers/w12975
6
Jillian Berman, “Companies Help Employees Pay Tuition- but Few Accept the Offer”,
June 10, 2018, https://www.wsj.com/articles/companies-help-employees-pay-tuitionbut-few-accept-the-
offer-1528682580
7
The National Survey of College Graduate (NSCG) is a biennial survey of individuals with at least a bachelor’s
degree. The survey is conducted by the U.S. Census Bureau in partnership with the National Center for
Science and Engineering Statistics (NCSES) at the National Science Foundation (NSF). The sample of college
graduates in 2019 and 2022 combined was 311,000 (147,000 in 2019 and 164,000 in 2021). For more
information about the survey, see: https://ncses.nsf.gov/surveys/national-survey-college-graduates/2021
Page 133 of 367

Chart 1. Percent of Employed Bachelor’s or Higher Degree Holders Receiving Tuition
Reimbursement from Their Employers, U.S., 2019 and 2021 Averages
21.4%
12.1%
10.1%
5.4% -
3.3%
All (Bachelor's +) Bachelor’s degree Master’s degree (e.g., Other professional Doctorate (e.g., PhD,
(e.g., BS, BA, AB) MS, MA, MBA) degree (e.g., JD, LLB, DSc, EdD)
MD, DDS, DVM)
Source: The National Survey of College Graduates (NSCG) public use data files, 2019 and 2021; the
Massachusetts Department of Revenue.
To estimate the number of currently employed workers with a bachelor’s degree or higher
in Massachusetts who received employer-provided tuition reimbursement, DOR applied
the U.S. percentage of workers with a bachelor’s degree or higher with employer-provided
tuition reimbursement (displayed in Chart 1) to household employment level from the
American Community Survey (ACS) for those with bachelor’s degree or higher. DOR
estimated that 192,000 - 198,000 workers in Massachusetts with a bachelor’s degree or
higher receive employer-provided tuition reimbursement during 2022 - 2026. It should be
noted that workers without a bachelor’s degree or higher also benefit from employer-
provided tuition reimbursement; however, DOR does not have data on such workers.
Therefore, the estimates of workers in Massachusetts with employer-provided tuition
reimbursement in Table 2 are probably understated; the actual counts of workers with
such benefits could be higher.
Table 2. Estimated Numbers of Workers with Employer Tuition Reimbursement in
Massachusetts, 2022-2027
Highest Degree Year Total Wage and % of Workers Estimated Number of
Salary Employment with Tuition Workers with Employer
Reimbursement Tuition Reimbursement
All Workers, All 2022 3,595,632
Education 2023 3,636,128
Level 2024 3,674,992
2025 3,693,311
Page 134 of 367

2026 3,698,242
2027 3,702,917
Bachelor's 2022 1,032,533 5.40% 55,723
degree 2023 1,044,162 5.40% 56,350
2024 1,055,322 5.40% 56,953
2025 1,060,582 5.40% 57,237
2026 1,061,998 5.40% 57,313
2027 1,063,341 5.40% 57,386
Master's 2022 543,736 21.43% 116,540
degree 2023 549,860 21.43% 117,853
2024 555,737 21.43% 119,113
2025 558,507 21.43% 119,706
2026 559,253 21.43% 119,866
2027 559,960 21.43% 120,018
Professional 2022 110,421 3.29% 3,637
degree 2023 111,664 3.29% 3,678
2024 112,858 3.29% 3,717
2025 113,420 3.29% 3,735
2026 113,572 3.29% 3,740
D octorate 2027 113,715 3.29% 3,745
d egree
2022 134,026 12.14% 16,277
2023 135,536 12.14% 16,460
2024 136,984 12.14% 16,636
2025 137,667 12.14% 16,719
2026 137,851 12.14% 16,742
2027 138,025 12.14% 16,763
Total 2022 1,820,716 192,177
(Bachelor's +) 2023 1,841,222 194,342
2024 1,860,901 196,419
2025 1,870,177 197,398
2026 1,872,674 197,661
2027 1,875,042 197,911
Source: (i). Quarterly Census of Employment and Wages, the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics; (ii). 2022 American Community Survey (ACS)
public use files, the U.S. Census Bureau, tabulated by the Massachusetts Department of Revenue; (iii). The National Survey of College
Graduates (NSCG) public use data files, 2019 and 2021, tabulated by the Massachusetts Department of Revenue.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
Page 135 of 367

tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance. But some of the indirect benefits
to employers are discussed in the previous section.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an income tax adopt the federal exclusion for employer-provided
education and training assistance unless they decouple from Code in that regard. States
that adopt the federal exclusion include Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and
Vermont. California has its own state-specific exclusion for education and training
assistance.
Page 136 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.035 Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Annual cost: $0.0 - Year of adoption: 1984 Sunset date: None
Plan $0.2 million from
FY22 – FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Support of military service members
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □ □x
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □x
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □x
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □x □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 137 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Support for service members eligible for the Homeowners Assistance Plan is worthy and relevant goal for the Commonwealth. Those who are eligible for
HAP (and their spouses) may not be a broad base of taxpayers, yet the expenditure is still justified. Military income is varied, and not always in the lowest
tier in the Commonwealth.
Page 138 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
T AX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Department of Defense
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Homeowners Assistance Plan
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.035
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c) ; IRC § 132 (a)(8), (n); 42
YEAR ENACTED U.S. Code § 3374
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1984
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $0.0 - $0.2 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
No taxpayers have claimed this benefit during
FY22 - FY24. Average tax benefit could reach
$13K per taxpayer in FY24 and annually
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT thereafter.
No beneficiaries during FY22 - FY24. Average
tax benefit per taxpayer could reach $12K in
FY25 and annually thereafter. Average
number of beneficiaries could be in the low
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE tens per year.
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ conformity with the T he statute does not state the purpose of the
Internal Revenue Code (Code), Massachusetts tax expenditure.
adopts the federal exclusion for qualified
military base realignment and closure fringe
benefits paid by the Department of Defense
(DOD) to military personnel, eligible civilian
personnel, or their spouses. Such benefits are
paid to eligible individuals to compensate them
for certain losses incurred on the sale of their
Page 139 of 367

homes as a result of having to move because of
base closures or injury related to military
s W er h v a i t c e a . r e the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that co nform to the Code for individual
expenditure is to allow the DOD to make tax- income tax purposes allow the federal
free payments to military personnel, eligible exclusion forqualified military base
civilian personnel, or their spouses, to realignment and closure fringe benefits,
compensate such individuals for loss of home unless they decouple from the Code in that
property values owing to relocation resulting regard. The Commission is not aware of any
f rom military base closures or because of injury state that has decoupled.
from military service.
Page 140 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ conformity with the Internal Revenue Code (Code), Massachusetts
adopts the federal exclusion for qualified military base realignment and closure fringe
benefits paid by the Department of Defense (DOD) to military personnel, eligible civilian
personnel, or their spouses. Such payments are made under the DOD Homeowners
Assistance Plan authorized by 42 U.S. Code § 3374. The payments are paid to eligible
individuals to compensate them for certain losses incurred from the sale of their homes as
Id
a result of having to move because of military base closings or a permanent change of
station. . The plan benefit extends to military personnel and eligible DOD civilian
employees who are required to move for medical treatment or rehabilitation or due to
Id
medical retirement where a medical condition is the result of an injury incurred in the line
of duty. .
In the absence of the exclusion qualified military base realignment and closure fringe
benefits would be subject to the personal income tax. Revenue lost as a result of the
exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to allow the DOD to make tax-free
payments to military personnel, eligible civilian personnel, or their spouses, to compensate
such individuals for loss of home property values owing to military base closures or
because of injury from military service.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion forqualified military base realignment and closure
fringe benefits does not present any special challenges for the Department of Revenue
(DOR) as it is based on a federal exclusion that is monitored by the Internal Revenue
Service (IRS). The Commission assumes that the consistency of treatment of such
payments for federal and Massachusetts purposes also eases the compliance burden for
taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $0 per year during
FY22 - FY24 but $0.2 million for FY25 and annually thereafter. The U.S. Army Corps of
1
Engineers is responsible for administering the Home Assistance Program (HAP) and has
reported that since 2014 there have been no approved Massachusetts applications for this
benefit. See Table 1 below.
1
Department of Defense, Military Benefits: https://myarmybenefits.us.army.mil/
Page 141 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Department of Defense
Homeowners Assistance Plan
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.2 0.2
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct benefit of this tax expenditure is the tax exemption for compensation received
by military personnel and certain civilian employees and certain spouses who are eligible
for the Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan. From 1995 - 2014 the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers (the ACE) approved an average of 12 applications per year.
Income tax savings averaged $12,000 per taxpayer. DOR projects that the annual number
of approvals and beneficiaries in the near term will be in the low teens.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal
exclusion for qualified military base realignment and closure fringe benefits, unless they
decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has
de coupled.
Page 142 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.036: Exemption for Survivor Annuities for Fallen Public Annual cost: Year of adoption: 1958 Sunset date: None
I I I
Safety Officers <$50,000
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☒ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Support of sacrifice / service
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ x □ □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ x □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □x
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □x
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □x □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 143 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 144 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Survivor Annuities of Fallen
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Public Safety Officers
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.036
TAX TYPE Exclusion from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC § 101(h); M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1, 2(a)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1958
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Negligible (under $50,000)
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: I s the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue The statute does not state the purpose of the tax
Code (Code) for purposes of determining gross expenditure.
income for personal income tax purposes,
Massachusetts adopts the federal exclusion for
annuity income paid under a governmental
p lan to the survivors of public safety officers
k W il h le a d t i a n r e th t e h l e in peo olfi cdyu t g y o . als of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that conform to the Code for individual
exclusion i s to ease the financial burden for income tax purposes adopt the exclusion unless
survivors of public officers killed in the line of they have specifically decoupled from the Code
duty. in that regard. The Commission is not aware of
any state that has decoupled.
Page 145 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining gross
income for personal income tax purposes, Massachusetts excludes from income certain
payments to eligible survivors of public safety officers killed in the line of duty. Specifically,
Massachusetts adopts Code § 101(h), which allows a federal exclusion for annuities paid
under a governmental plan. To be treated as an eligible governmental plan, the plan must
1
meet certain funding, participation and anti-discrimination requirements. Public safety
officers include law enforcement officers, firefighters, members of rescue squads and
2
members of ambulance crews. Eligible survivors are limited to the spouses and children
of public safety officers. See § 101(h)(1)(A). The federal and state exclusion is not allowed
in certain circumstances detailed in IRC § 101(h)(2), where the public safety officer was
engaged in misconduct or negligence when he or she was killed, or if the survivor
contributed to the public safety officer’s death.
In the absence of the exclusion, surviving spouses and children of public safety officers
would be required to pay personal income tax on annuities received as a result of the
public safety officer’s death in the line of duty. The revenue foregone as a result of the
exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the exclusion is to ease the financial burden on
survivors of public officers killed in the line of duty.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exclusion for annuity income paid under a governmental plan to
the survivors of public safety officers killed in the line of duty does not present any special
challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of
treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be negligible (under
$50,000) during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
1
See IRC § 101(h)(1)(A), which i ncorporates the eligibility rules set out for qualified retirement plans in IRC §
401(a).
2
See IRS Publication 721 (2023)
Page 146 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Survivor Annuities of Fallen
Public Safety Officers
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible
Note: "Negligible" means that the estimate is less than $50,000 but greater than zero.
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the Joint
3 4
Committee on Taxation (JCT) , the Officer Down Memorial Page, Inc. (ODMP) , and the U.S.
5
Fire Administration (USFA) . The JCT reports the impact on federal tax collections
resulting from the corresponding exemption at the federal level. To share down the federal
estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the
6 7
differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective tax rates, and size of tax base .
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the survivors, and any dependents, of
public safety officers killed in the line of duty. DOR does not have data on the number of
8
direct beneficiaries.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitatio ns present in this instance.
3
The Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT). https://www.jct.gov/
4
The Officer Down Memorial Page, Inc. https://www.odmp.org/
5
The U.S. Fire Administration. https://www.usfa.fema.gov/
6
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
7
Using Massachusetts’ share of annual national fatalities for police officers and firefighters based on data
from ODMP and USFA.
8
Although ODMP and USFA provide count of fatalities of Massachusetts police officers and fire fighters by
year, DOR does not have similar data for members of rescue squads and members of ambulance crews. In
addition, one fallen public safety officer may leave behind multiple survivors and dependents.
Page 147 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes adopt the exclusion
unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. The Commission is
not aware of any state that has decoupled.
Page 148 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.040 & 1.420 Archer Medical Savings Accounts Annual cost: $0.09 - Year of adoption: 1998 Sunset date: None
I I I
(exemption & deduction) $0.18 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□x □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □x □ □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □x
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 149 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: This is a legacy TE tied to the federal code. It is already small in scope and is expected to gradually fade from use over time, as no new
qualifying MSAs are being created.
Page 150 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Archer Medical Savings Accounts (exemption &
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER deduction)
1.040 (earnings and distributions) & 1.420
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY (contributions)
Exclusions From Gross Income & Deductions
TAX TYPE from Adjusted Gross I ncome
LEGAL REF ERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L . c. 62, §§ 1(c), 1(d), and 2(d)(1); IRC § 220
REPEAL/EXPIRA TION DATE 1998
None
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT
Tax loss of $0.09 - $0.18 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 – FY26.
137 – 148 per year during FY22 - FY26 for 1.420;
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT Not available for 1.040
$134 - $162 per benefiting taxpayer during
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE F☒Y 2 2-FY26 for☐ 1.420; Not available for 1.040
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not explicitly state the purpose
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of of this tax expenditure.
determining income, eligible contributions to,
earnings in, and qualified distributions from
Archer medical savings accounts (Archer MSAs)
a W re h a n t o a t r s e u b t j h e e c tp too ltihcey p g e o r a s l o s n o a f l t in h c e o me tax. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that conform to the Code for income tax
expenditure is to incentivize eligible individuals purposes provide an exemption, deduction, or
Page 151 of 367

with high deductible health care plans t o save for exclusion for eligible contributions to, earnings
medical expenses that they may incur before in, and qualified distributions from Archer MSAs,
meeting their plan’s annual deductible. unless they have specifically decoupled from the
Code in that regard. California, Connecticut,
Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont
follow the federal treatment of Archer MSAs.
Page 152 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, and Massachusetts’ adoption of the deductions included in Code § 62,
eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from Archer medical
savings accounts (Archer MSAs) are not subject to the personal income tax. Specifically,
1
Massachusetts adopts Code § 220 as in effect for the 2022 tax year, which sets out the
federal tax treatment of Archer MSAs.
Archer MSAs have largely been discontinued and replaced by health savings accounts
(HSAs) (the expenditures for HSAs are described in Tax Expenditure Reports 1.031 and
1.422). New Archer MSAs generally cannot be created. As such, the only taxpayers with
2
Archer MSAs are taxpayers with legacy Archer MSAs, and taxpayers working for legacy
3 4
Archer MSA employers. For those taxpayers, eligible contributions are deductible,
5
earnings accumulate free of tax, and income from qualified distributions is excluded.
An Archer MSA is a tax-exempt trust created for the purpose of paying a taxpayer’s
qualified medical expenses. An Archer MSA can only be created for taxpayers who are self-
employed or work for a small employer, and the spouses of such taxpayers. In any given
year, an Archer MSA may receive cash contributions from either the taxpayer or the
taxpayer’s employer.
To qualify for the deduction for contributions, a taxpayer must be an “eligible individual”
on the first day of the month in which the contribution was made. In general, to be eligible
for a given month a person must, on the first day of that month: (i) be covered under a high
deductible health plan, (ii) have no other health coverage (except for coverage that is
expressly permitted by Code § 220, such as coverage for dental care or workers’
1
M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1(c) (stating that when used in chapter 62, “Code” shall mean “the Internal Revenue Code of
the United States, as amended on January 1, 2022 and in effect for the taxable year.”); M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(d)
(stating that when used in chapter 62, the term “Federal gross income” shall mean “gross income as defined
under the Code.”)
2
Taxpayers with legacy Archer MSAs, also known as “active MSA participants,” are taxpayers who had an
Archer MSA in 2007 or prior. Code § 220(i)(3).
3
Legacy Archer MSA employers, also known as “MSA-participating employers”, are small employers who
offered health care coverage under a high deductible plan to any employee in 2007 or prior. In addition,
the employer must have contributed to an employee Archer MSA in 2007 or a prior year, or at least 20
percent of the employer’s employees who were “eligible individuals” in any month of 2007 contributed at
least $100 to their Archer MSAs. Code § 220(i)(4).
4
Employer contributions may be excluded from employee income under Code § 106. The exclusion for
employer contributions is described in Tax Expenditure Report 1.004.
5
In general, qualified medical expenses will be medical expenses that are not reimbursed by an individual’s
high deductible health plan because the beneficiary has not yet reached the deductible amount.
Page 153 of 367

6
compensation claims), and (iii) not be enrolled in Medicare. Additionally, the person must
not be claimed as a dependent on someone else’s return for that tax year. There are
additional limits on eligibility for an individual with a high deductible family health plan
that covers the individual and their spouse if the spouse has their own Archer MSA to
which the spouse’s employer makes contributions.
Contributions to an Archer MSA are subject to federal limitations. The limit is 65% of the
annual deductible of an individual high deductible health plan, or 75% of the annual
deductible for a family high deductible health plan. Additionally, contributions cannot
exceed the amount of an account holder’s earnings.
In the absence of the special treatment of Archer MSAs described above, taxpayer
contributions to Archer MSAs, Archer MSA earnings, and Archer MSA distributions could be
subject to the personal income tax. The revenue foregone as a result of such special
treatment constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize eligible individuals
with high deductible health care plans to save for medical expenses that they may incur
before meeting their plan’s annual deductible.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of these expenditures does not present special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). Administrators of Archer MSAs report account activity,
including gross distributions and “prohibited transactions” on Form 1099-SA, which must
be provided to the taxpayer, Internal Revenue Service (IRS), and DOR. The prohibited
transaction information indicates a potential taxable distribution. This information
provides a means for the IRS and DOR to monitor compliance with the distribution
rules. Conformity with federal treatment of Archer MSAs simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
6
An individual who is ineligible for an Archer MSA because of Medicare enrollment may be eligible for a
Medicare Advantage MSA. A Medicare Advantage MSA is an Archer MSA that is designated by Medicare to
pay the qualified medical expenses of an account holder that is eligible for Medicare.
Page 154 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
7
The revenue loss resulting from the exemption of earnings in the Archer MSA accounts is
estimated to be about $0.07 - $0.16 million per year during FY22 - FY26. The revenue loss
from the deduction for contributions to Archer MSAs is estimated to be $0.02 million per
year for the same period. The combined total revenue loss for the period is estimated to be
$0.09 - $0.18 million. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Archer Medical Savings Accounts ($Million)
Fiscal Year FY2022 FY2023 FY2024 FY2025 FY2026
1.420 (Deduction of Contributions) $0.02 $0.02 $0.02 $0.02 $0.02
1.040 (Exemption of Earnings) $0.13 $0.07 $0.09 $0.16 $0.16
Total $0.15 $0.09 $0.11 $0.18 $0.18
To estimate the revenue loss from the deduction for contributions, DOR started with the
Archer MSA deduction amounts on personal income tax returns. The deduction amounts
were multiplied by the personal income tax rate (5%) to arrive at the revenue loss
8
estimates.
To estimate the revenue loss from the exemption for earnings, DOR started with the
estimates for 1.031 (exemption of earnings in HSA accounts) and 1.422 (deduction of
employee contributions to HSA accounts). Given that Archer MSA accounts are similar to
HSA accounts, DOR assumed that the average yields for Archer MSA accounts are close to
that for HSA accounts. DOR arrived at estimates for the exemption by multiplying
estimates for the deduction component by the ratio of estimates for 1.031 to the estimates
9
for 1.422.
DIRECT BENEFITS
10
Direct beneficiaries are individuals with an Archer MSA. Since not all Archer MSAs
receive employee contributions for a given year, the number of direct beneficiaries for the
7
To avoid double counting of tax benefits, exemption of Archer MSA distribution is not covered in the
estimates of 1.040 since the exempt distribution has already been either exempted as earnings or deducted as
contribution before distribution.
8
Further minor adjustments, such as growth for future years, were incorporated to arrive at the final
estimates.
9
Given the use of estimates for the tax expenditure for health savings account and the assumption that the
ratio of 1.040 to 1.420 is the same as the ratio of 1.031 to 1.422, the estimates for 1.040 are more uncertain
than the estimates for 1.420 and should be used with more caution.
10
Archer medical savings account holders’ spouses and dependents may also benefit from this tax
expenditure. For tax year 2022, on average each taxpayer who claimed the deduction on the return
represents 2.1 persons, including the taxpayer (a joint filer is counted as two persons) and the taxpayer’s
dependents.
Page 155 of 367

deduction (1.420) is smaller than that for the exemption (1.040). Due to lack of data, only
direct beneficiaries for 1.420 are discussed below.
Table 2 shows that 144 personal income taxpayers claimed a total of $0.4 million in Archer
11
MSA deductions for tax year 2022. The average deduction amount was $2,683 per
taxpayer resulting in an average tax saving of $134.
Table 2. Archer Medical Savings Account Deduction by Income Bracket
Tax Year 2022
Archer Medical Savings AccountDeduction
Average
(For claimants with tax liability)
Massachusetts Net Claimant
Count of Average Income
Adjusted Gross Income Tax
All Filers Number Deduction Group's
(AGI) Savings (at
of Amount per % of Total
a 5% rate)
claimants Deducted Claimant Deduction
Under $50,000 1,994,190 19 $39,086 $2,057 10.1% $103
$50,000 under $100,000 922,323 50 $129,376 $2,588 33.5% $129
$100,000 under $150,000 409,770 29 $54,931 $1,894 14.2% $95
$150,000 under $200,000 224,101 17 $63,136 $3,714 16.3% $186
$200,000 under $500,000 332,666 24 $78,807 $3,284 20.4% $164
$500,000 under $1,000,000 62,272 * * * * *
$1,000,000 or Over 30,351 * * * * *
Total 3,975,673 144 $386,336 $2,683 100.0% $134
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, 2022 individual income tax return data, preliminary and subject to change
Note: Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is the sum of Earned Income, Interest and Dividends,
Short-Term Capital Gains and Long-Term Capital Gains.
* Information withheld due to confidentiality rules
Table 2 shows that the income bracket with MA net AGI from $50,000 to $100,000 claimed
the most (33.5%) of the total deduction amount. This income bracket had 50 taxpayers
(35% of all claimants) with total deductions of $0.13 million, which was the highest among
all income brackets.
Table 3 shows DOR’s projection of the number of taxpayers who will claim a deduction for
contributions to an Archer MSA in future years, and the average expected tax benefit for
those taxpayers.
Table 3. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit for 1.420
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 137 144 145 147 148
Average Tax Benefit $162 $134 $134 $134 $134
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR)
11
Note that the deduction reported in Table 2 does not include exclusion of employer contributions
(including employee payroll contributions through a cafeteria plan) from employee income, which is covered
by tax expenditure 1.004.
Page 156 of 367

EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exemption, deduction,
or exclusion for eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from
Archer MSAs, unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard.
California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont follow the federal
treatment of Archer MSAs.
Page 157 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.041 Exemption of Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Annual cost: $15.9 – Year of adoption: 1996 Sunset date: None
Savings ("529" plans) $37.3 million from
FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐Relief of poverty
☐Investment ☐Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐Competitiveness/Strategic ☒Access to opportunity
☐Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐Other:
☐Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □X □ □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ X □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
□ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□X □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒No
Page 158 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Because this exemption is a result of conformance with the Federal code, it is not worth eliminating. But savers are disproportionately higher-
income, as are college attendees. That means the benefits of this exemption go disproportionately to higher income families.
Page 159 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption of Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Savings ("529" plans)
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.041
TAX TYPE Exclusions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC § 529
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1996
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $15.9 - $37.3 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 242,843 – 317,223 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
Estimated $66 – $118 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE individual.
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal T he statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, Massachusetts allows an
income exclusion for amounts earned by pre-
paid tuition programs and tuition savings
a W cc h o a u t n a t r s e . the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that conform to the Code for individual
e xpenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save income tax purposes provide an exclusion for
for higher education costs. the earnings of pre-paid tuition programs and
tuition savings accounts unless they
Page 160 of 367

specifically decouple from the Code in this
regard. The Commission is not aware of any
states that have decoupled.
Page 161 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, Massachusetts allows an income exclusion for amounts earned by
1
pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts. Under Code § 529(a) and (c), the
2
earnings of such programs and accounts are excluded from income.
In the absence of the exclusion, income earned by pre-paid tuition programs and tuition
savings accounts would be subject to the Massachusetts personal income tax. The revenue
lost as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save for
higher education costs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exclusion does not present any special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). The consistency of treatment of pre-paid tuition programs
and tuition savings accounts for federal and Massachusetts purposes allows the DOR and
taxpayers to rely on the federal rules and definitions pertaining to such programs and
accounts.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $15.9 - $37.3 per
3
year during FY22 - FY26.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption of Earnings of Pre-paid and
Tuition Savings ("529" plans)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $15.9 $27.0 $32.5 $34.2 $37.3
1
Massachusetts has the U.Fund College Investing Plan, a direct-sold 529 college savings plan managed by
Fidelity Investments using Fidelity mutual funds.
2
Distributions from pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts generally must be used for
qualified higher education expenses. As of the 2018 tax year, 529 plan account funds can be used for
elementary or secondary school expenses, up to $10,000 per year. Massachusetts adopts this change as
Massachusetts follows the current Code with respect to Code § 529. See TIR 18-14 for more information.
3
The rapid increase in estimated revenue loss from FY22 - FY24 reflects two factors: (i) the stock market
surged in 2020 and 2021, resulting in strong earnings and (ii) recent tax law changes have made 529 plans
more attractive resulting in an increase of 529 plans. For example, with the passage of the Secures 2.0 Act of
2022, beginning in tax year 2024 any excess funds from an established 529 plan can be rolled over to a ROTH
IRA for a lifetime maximum of up to $35,000 under certain conditions.
Page 162 of 367

Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the Joint
4 5
Committee on Taxation (JCT) and the National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) .
The JCT reports the impact on federal tax collections resulting from the corresponding
exemption at the federal level. To share down the federal estimates into Massachusetts
estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the differences between federal and state
6
fiscal years , effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are taxpayers with registered pre-paid
tuition programs and tuition savings accounts eligible for the exemption. Table 2 shows
7
the estimated number of direct beneficiaries and the resulting tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 242,843 257,256 274,766 295,232 317,223
Average Tax Savings $66 $105 $118 $116 $117
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from
Massachusetts Educational Financing Authority (MEFA).
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. For example, educational institutions who receive the withdrawn money
benefit from increased enrollment and tuition payments. Moreover, financial institutions,
which manage qualified plans likewise benefit, as the expenditure fosters the use of such
plans, thereby providing such financial institutions with access to increased capital.
4
The Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT). https://www.jct.gov/
5
The National Center for Education Statistics (NCES). https://nces.ed.gov/
6
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
7
The count reported in Table 2 is the number of pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts,
which may differ from the number of account owners given that an account owner may own multiple
accounts. In additi on, the “beneficiary” refers to the account owner who benefit from this tax expenditure,
not the students who benefit from money deposited in such accounts. The figures reported above should be
used with caution.
Page 163 of 367

To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to utilize
complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN (Impact
Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their complexity and
data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes provide an exclusion for
the earnings of pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts unless they
specifically decouple from the Code in this regard. The Commission is not aware of any
states that have decoupled.
Page 164 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.203 & 2.204 Excess Natural Resource Annual cost: $2.8-4 Corp; $0.4 Pers. Year of adoption: 1976 Sunset date:
Depletion Allowance I from FY22 – FY26 I I None
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☒ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☒ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □X □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 165 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
- Broad Group: This only impacts people involved in this specific field, which according to the statistics is very small group in the state. Although it is
broad in the sense that it covers a wide range of extractive activities, it is narrowly focused into this one field as opposed to allowing this adjusted
calculation to be used for income producing properties in other industries.
- Beneficial to Small Businesses: These extractive sites don’t strike me as being smaller businesses, but I am not familiar enough to opine
affirmatively one way or the other.
- Beneficial to Lower Income Taxpayers: This does primarily benefit lower income earners, although because it is based on percentages of income
generated, and there is the lack of a relationship to ones cost basis and the fact that the percentages are based upon the material extracted as
opposed to the revenue generated, this is clearly beneficial to all the taxpayers of this group equally as opposed to being primarily beneficial to
lower income taxpayers.
Page 166 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.203 & 2.204
TAX TYPE Deductions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax / Corporate Excise
IRC §§ 613, 613A; M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1); M.G.L.
YEAR ENACTED c. 63, § 30.3
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1976
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $2.8 - $4.0 million per year for
corporate excise filers, and $0.4 million per
year for personal income tax filers during FY22
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
F EDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, taxpayers in extractive
industries such as mining or drilling for natural
resources may deduct a percentage of gross
mining income as a depletion allowance
("percentage depletion") without regard to their
cost basis in the income producing property and
may continue to claim the depletion allowance
even after the cost of the property has been
reduced to zero. This method of cost recovery is
often more beneficial to taxpayers than the
traditional cost recovery method applicable to
natural resource property.
Page 167 of 367

What are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the tax All states that impose an individual or
expenditure is intended to stimulate extractive corporate income tax adopt the depletion
industries’ invest m ent in natural resource allowance unless they decouple from the Code
property such as mines, wells, and other in that regard. The Commission is not aware of
mineral deposits. any state that has decoupled. States that adopt
the exclusion include California, Connecticut,
Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode
Island, and Vermont.
Page 168 of 367

INTRODUCTION
An essential characteristic of a business income tax is that it is imposed on the net of
business receipts over deductible business expenses. However, an immediate deduction is
generally not allowed for the full cost of investments in natural resources such as mineral,
natural gas or oil deposits. Rather, the cost of the natural resource property is required to
be recovered over time as the natural resources are depleted by extraction. Traditional
financial accounting and tax accounting rules base cost recovery on the percentage of the
volume of natural resources extracted in a year over the estimated total volume of natural
resources included in the investment. This traditional cost recovery method is referred to
as the “cost-depletion” method.
Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 613 gives taxpayers the option to use an alternative cost
recovery method for investments in natural resource property. The alternative method is
referred to as “percentage depletion.” Under this method the deduction for cost recovery is
based on a percentage of the income generated by the natural resource property. Specially,
percentage depletion permits deduction of a statutory percentage of gross income from
natural resource property, and bears no relationship to cost or other basis. In fact, an
allowance calculated under percentage depletion is deductible even when the taxpayer's
adjusted basis in the property is zero, provided that the taxpayer has gross income from
the property. The statutory percentage of gross income allowed as a deduction depends on
the type of natural resource that is extracted. The percentages range from 22% for sulfur,
uranium and other designated minerals including most metals, to 5% for sand and gravel.
See Code § 613(b). The deduction may not exceed 50% (in some cases, 100%) of net
income from the property. The percentage depletion method is not available to large,
integrated oil companies or for natural gas resources located outside the US. See Code §§
613(d), 613A.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, taxpayers must recover the cost of natural resource property in the
same manner and in the same amount as they do for federal tax purposes. Thus,
Massachusetts permits the use of the percentage depletion method if it is used for federal
tax purposes. The percentage depletion method often results in a larger deduction than
traditional cost depletion method. The excess of the deduction determined using the
percentage depletion method over the deduction using the cost depletion method
constitutes a tax expenditure.
Page 169 of 367

POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the tax expenditure is intended to stimulate extractive
industries’ investment in natural resource property such as mines, wells, and other mineral
deposits.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the depletion percentage method for recovering the cost of natural
resource property does not present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity with
the federal system of cost recovery for natural resources simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers and practitioners.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $2.8 - $4.0 million
for corporate and business tax filers and $0.4 for personal income tax filers
peTra ybelaer 1 d.u Rreinvge nFYu2e2 L -o FssY 2E6s.t i Smeaet Teasb floer 1 E. x cess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance
($ Million)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Corporate & Business Tax $2.8 $3.7 $4.0 $3.7 $3.6
Personal Income Tax $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4
Total $3.1 $4.0 $4.4 $4.0 $3.9
Note: Details may not add to total due to rounding.
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on revenue loss estimates for the
1
corresponding federal deduction provided by the Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT) in the
most recent tax expenditure report. To share down the federal estimates to Massachusetts
estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the differences between federal and state
2
fiscal years, effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
1
JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue Act
of 1926. Among other tasks, JCT provides estimates of federal tax expenditures and revenue estimates of tax
legislation considered by the Congress. See https://www.jct.gov/about-us/overview/.
2 st th
Note that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1 to September 30 of the following year, while the
st th
Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1 to June 30 of the following year.
Page 170 of 367

DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure include taxpayers in the extractive
industries, including mining companies and oil and gas producers. Shareholders and
investors may indirectly benefit from this tax expenditure.
Table 2 shows U.S. Census data for the number of establishments and employees in the oil
and gas extraction and other mining industries. In 2022, there were 67 mining
establishments in Massachusetts with a total of 759 employees. Note that Massachusetts’
oil and gas extraction and other mining establishments account for only 0.6% of U.S. total.
Table 2. Statistics for Potential, Major Beneficiaries of
Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance (Year 2022)
Other
In Oil & Gas Extraction and
Individual Non-
Other Mining (NAICS 211 and Corporations Partnerships Total
3 proprietorships corporate
212).
Entities
Number of 67
56 0 6 5
establishments (0.6%)
Massachusetts
Number of 759
726 0 18 15
employees (0.3%)
Number of 11,333
8,312 728 2,207 86
establishments (100%)
U.S.
Number of 252,514
195,045 10,303 45,685 1,481
employees (100%)
Source: Data for County Business Patterns, U.S. Census Bureau.
3
U.S. Geological Survey at U.S. Department of Interior reports that Massachusetts is a major producer of dimension stone
(mostly granite), and produces common clay, construction sand and gravel, crushed stone, lime, and natural gemstones.
(https://www.usgs.gov/centers/national-minerals-information-center/mineral-industry-massachusetts.)
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
Page 171 of 367

(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an individual or corporate income tax adopt the depletion allowance
unless they decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled. States that adopt the exclusion include California, Connecticut,
M aine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 172 of 367

REFERENCES
Estimates Of Federal Tax
Expenditures For Fiscal Years 2023-2027.
Staff of Joint Committe on Taxation. (2023, December 7).
Retrieved from The Joint Committe on
Taxation: https://www.jct.gov/publications/2023/jcx-59-23/
U.S. Census Bureau. (2021). County Business Patterns. U.S.A. Retrieved from
https://data.census.gov/table?q=CBP2022.CB2200CBP&g=010XX00US_040XX00US
25&n=211:212:213
Page 173 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.310 & 2.311 Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control Annual cost: $0.3 Year of adoption: 1969 Sunset date: None
Facilities million from FY22 –
FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☒ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □x □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □x □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □x □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 174 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
The complexity of administration and the cost of remediation / pollution control facilities makes this an expenditure best suited for larger taxpayers (not
broad based). Given its low cost to the Commonwealth and its relation to the IRC it is a rational choice.
Page 175 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Facilities
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.310 & 2.311
TAX TYPE Accelerated Deductions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax / Corporate Excise
IRC § 169; M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1); M.G.L. c. 63, §
YEAR ENACTED 30.3
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1969
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $0.3 million per year for corporate
excise tax filers and $0.0 for personal income
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS tax filers during FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of tax expenditure.
determining income, taxpayers may elect to
amortize the cost of a certified pollution control
facility over a five-year period, potentially
W all h o a w t i n a g re fo t r h a e c pceolleircayt e g d o r a e ls c o o v f e t r h y e o f these costs. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the All states that impose an income tax adopt the
expenditure is to incentivize the construction of amortization unless they decouple from the
pollution con trol facilities by allowing Code in that regard. The Commission is not
accelerated recovery of the cost of such aware of any state that has decoupled. States
facilities. that adopt the amortization include California,
Page 176 of 367

Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New York,
Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 177 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of
determining income, taxpayers may elect to amortize the cost of a certified pollution
control facility over a five-year period, allowing for potential accelerated recovery of these
costs. See Code § 169. Five-year amortization is only available for pollution control
1
facilities subsequently added to plants that were in operation before 1976. Special rules
apply to atmospheric pollution control facilities, which are allowed seven-year
amortization if they are placed in service in connection with a plant or other property
placed in operation after December 31, 1975. See Code § 169(d)(5). In the absence of Code
§169, taxpayers would be required to recover the cost of pollution control facilities using
one of the depreciation methods that is generally available for machinery and equipment
under Code § 167. To the extent that five-year, or seven-year, amortization allows
accelerated cost recovery, it results in a deferral of tax, which could be viewed as an
interest-free loan. Such a deferral of tax constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize the construction of
pollution control facilities by allowing accelerated recovery of the cost of such facilities.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the five-year, or seven-year, amortization of pollution control
facilities does not present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity with the federal
treatment simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules
and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers and practitioners.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $0.3 million
2
annually for corporate and business tax filers and $0.0 for personal income tax filers
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
1
A certified pollution control facility is a treatment facility “used, in connection with a plant or other property
in operation before January 1, 1976, to abate or control water or atmospheric pollution or contamination by
removing, altering, disposing, storing, or preventing the creation or emission of pollutants, contaminants,
wastes, or heat.” Code § 169. Such facilities shall not “(i) increasIde the output or capacity, extend the useful life,
or reduce the total operating costs of such plant or other property (or any unit thereof), or (ii) alter the
nature of the manufacturing or production process or facility.” .
2
Different from this Massachusetts tax expenditure is Code § 169(d)(5) which applies to certain air pollution
control facilities. The Code allows a 7-year amortization option to air pollution control facilities placed in
service in connection with a plant or other property placed in operation after December 31, 1975. Estimates
in Table 1 are not adjusted for such differences between Massachusetts tax expenditure and federal tax
expenditure, therefore should be used with caution.
Page 178 of 367

Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Five-Year Amortization
of Pollution Control Facilities ($ Million)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Corporate Excise $0.3 $0.3 $0.3 $0.3 $0.3
Personal Income Tax $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0 $0.0
Total $0.3 $0.3 $0.3 $0.3 $0.3
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on revenue loss estimates for the
3
corresponding federal tax expenditure provided by the Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT)
in the most recent tax expenditure report. To share down the federal estimates to
Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the differences between
4
federal and state fiscal years, effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure include individuals or entities that own
certified pollution control facilities. There are five distinct types of facilities including
water pollution control facilities, air pollution control facilities, atmospheric pollution
control facilities for coal-fired plants, waste recovery facilities, and a broad category of
general pollution control equipment and structures.
According to Massachusetts Department of Environment Protection (DEP), as of January
2024, there are about 17,674 air pollution control facilities in Massachusetts. DOR does not
have data for other types of pollution control facilities.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
These benefits extend to a reduction in negative externalities resulting from economic
activities causing pollution. Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and
3
JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue Act
of 1926. Among other tasks, JCT provides estimates of federal tax expenditures and revenue estimates of tax
legislation considered by the Congress. See https://www.jct.gov/about-us/overview/.
4 st th
Note that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1 to September 30 of the following year, while the
st th
Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1 to June 30 of the following year.
Page 179 of 367

benefits associated with this expenditure. For example, developers, investors and
manufacturers of pollution control technologies, who create facilities eligible for
amortization, would benefit from increased market demand due to the financial incentives
offered through this provision. This can drive innovation and investment in cleaner
technologies.
To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to utilize
complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN (Impact
Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their complexity and the
data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an income tax adopt the amortization unless they decouple from the
Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled. States
that adopt the amortization include California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New
Y ork, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
Page 180 of 367

REFERENCES
Estimates Of Federal Tax Expenditures For
Fiscal Years 2023-2027.
Joint Committe on Taxation. (2023, December 7).
Retrieved from The Joint Committe on Taxation:
https://www.jct.gov/publications/2023/jcx-59-23/
Page 181 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.311 & 2.313 Deduction and Seven-Year Amortization for Annual cost: $0.4 Year of adoption: 1983 Sunset date: None
Reforestation million for FY22-26 for personal, 1980 for
corporate
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☒ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □X □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 182 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Since benefits are environmental, beneficiaries include many residents who are not the affected taxpayers. Provided information sheds little
light on businesses that can take the deduction. Result of conformity.
Page 183 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Deduction and Seven-Year Amortization for
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Reforestation
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.311 & 2.313
TAX TYPE Accelerated Deductions from Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax / Corporate Excise
IRC § 194; M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 1(c), 1(d), and 2(d);
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 63, § 30.4
Massachusetts has followed Code § 194 since
1983 for purposes of the personal income tax,
and 1980 for purposes of the corporate
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE excise.
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $0.2 million per year for corporate
excise and $0.2 million for personal income
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS tax during FY22-FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE Not available
☒ ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ conformity to Internal The statute does not state the purpose of the
Revenue Code (Code) § 194, taxpayers can elect tax expenditure.
to deduct up to $10,000 of forestation or
reforestation expenditures in a taxable year,
with excess amounts amortized over seven
years. The election applies to both the personal
income tax and the net income measure of the
corporate excise.
Page 184 of 367

What are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commissi on assumes the goal of the All states that impose an income tax based on
expenditure is to incentivize forestation and federal adjusted gross income adopt the
reforestation. $10,000 deduction and seven-year
amortization deduction for forestation or
reforestation expenses unless they decouple
from the Code in that regard. States that adopt
the deduction and seven-year amortization
include California, Connecticut, Maine, New
Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island, and
Vermont. Note that California limits its
conformity to expenditures on timber property
located within the state. New Hampshire does
not have a personal income tax but conforms to
Code § 194 for the purpose of its corporate
income tax.
Page 185 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 194(b) for purposes
of determining income, taxpayers may elect to deduct up to $10,000 of “reforestation
expenditures” incurred with respect to qualified timber property in the year in which
expenditures are incurred. The deduction applies to both the personal income tax and to
the net income measure of the corporate excise. See M.G.L. c. 62 §§ 1(c), 2(d)(1); M.G.L. c.
63, § 30.4. If reforestation expenditures exceed $10,000, taxpayers may amortize the
excess over a seven-year period. The amortization deduction has no dollar limit. See Code
§ 194(a). Trusts are not eligible for the deduction but may elect seven-year amortization
for such expenses. See Code § (b)(1)(B)(iii).
Qualified timber property is a “woodlot or other site located in the United States” used for
the “planting, cultivating, caring for, and cutting of” a commercial volume of trees for the
purpose of producing timber products. See Code § 194(c). The property must be at least
one acre in size. Reforestation expenditures include the direct costs of forestation or
reforestation, such as site preparation, seeds, labor, and equipment. See Code § 194(c).
In the absence of a Code § 194 election, forestation or reforestation expenses are recovered
as cost of goods sold when the trees are harvested and sold as timber products. Thus, the
election allows the accelerated recovery of such expenses, resulting in the equivalent of an
interest-free loan from the Commonwealth to the taxpayer. The time value of the amount
of the accelerated expense recovery constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize forestation and
reforestation.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the deduction and seven-year amortization of forestation and
reforestation expenses does not present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity
with the federal treatment simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the
same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers
and practitioners.
Page 186 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $0.4 million
annually during FY22-FY26 with $0.2 million for corporate and business tax filers and $0.2
for personal income tax filers. See table 1 below.
Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Deduction and Seven-Year Amortization for
Reforestation ($ Million)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
I I I I I I
Corporate Excise $0.2 $0.2 $0.2 $0.2 $0.2
Personal Income Tax $0.2 $0.2 $0.2 $0.2 $0.2
Total $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4 $0.4
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on revenue loss estimates for the
corresponding federal deduction provided by the Joint Committee on Taxation, Congress of
1
the United States (JCT) in its most recent tax expenditure report. To share down the
federal estimates to Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the
2
differences between federal and state fiscal years, effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
Direct beneficiaries are qualified timber property owners or lessees who incurred the
expenses covered by this tax expenditure. Qualified timber property owners may be
individuals, partnerships, corporations, and estates who own or lease qualified timber
property.
3
According to the website ‘MassWoods.org’ , over 60% (3.1 million acres) of Massachusetts
is forested making the state 8th most-forested state by percentage of forest cover. The
same source further indicates that over 212,000 private landowners, mostly families and
4
individuals, own over 75% of Massachusetts' forests. It is likely that only a fraction of
those landowners meet the criteria to be eligible for the tax incentive or claim the
deduction for a given tax year. The IRS estimated that, for tax year 2022, 17,262 personal
income taxpayers claimed this deduction on their federal tax returns. DOR estimates that
1
JCT is a nonpartisan committee of the United States Congress, originally established under the Revenue Act
of 1926. Among other tasks, JCT provides revenue estimates for federal tax expenditures and tax legislation
considered by the Congress. See https://www.jct.gov/about-us/overview/.
2 st th
Note that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1 to September 30 of the following year, while the
st th
Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1 to June 30 of the following year.
3
Refer to https://masswoods.org/. MassWoods.org is a website maintained by the UMass Extension Forest
Conservation Program.
4
For the entire USA, most forestland is privately owned (444 million acres, or 58%). Nonindustrial private
landowners (i.e., private, noncorporate entities that do not own wood-processing facilities) own 288 million
acres. Refer to https://crsreports.congress.gov/product/pdf/IF/IF12054
Page 187 of 367

5
approximately 100 of them may be from Massachusetts. IRS data for other types of
taxpayers, however, is not currently available. Generally, taxpayers do not report
amortization breakdown by type.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
In addition, by encouraging reforestation, the expenditure assists to protect public health
and environment, which would generate positive externalities, or benefits to each member
of the society. Such positive externalities are often difficult to quantify.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
All states that impose an income tax based on federal adjusted gross income adopt the
$10,000 deduction and seven-year amortization deduction for forestation or reforestation
expenses unless they decouple from the Code in that regard. States that adopt the
deduction and seven-year amortization include California, Connecticut, Maine, New
Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. Note that California limits its
conformity to expenditures on timber property located within the state. New Hampshire
does not have a personal income tax but conforms to Code § 194 for the purpose of its
corporate income tax.
5
https://www.irs.gov/pub/irs-pdf/p4801.pdf, page 24
Page 188 of 367

REFERENCES
Individual Income Tax Returns, Line Item Estimates, 2022.
Internal Revenu Service. (2022).
Retrieved from https://www.irs.gov/pub/irs-pdf/Epst4i8m0a1t.epsd Off Federal Tax Expenditures For
Fiscal Years 2023-2027.
Joint Committe on Taxation. (2023, December 7).
Retrieved from The Joint Committe on Taxation:
https://www.jct.gov/pMuabslsiacachtiuosnest/ts2 F0o2r3e/sjtcsx-59-23/
University of Amherst (n.d.). . Retrieved from MassWoods:
https://masswoods.org/massachusetts-
forests#:~:text=Facts%20about%20MA%20Forests%3A&text=Some%20towns%2
0in%20western%20Massachusetts,Department%20of%20Conservation%20and%
20Recreation
Page 189 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.407 Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 to 23 Annual cost: $10- Year of adoption: 1986 Sunset date: None
I I I
$10.6.6 million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐Relief of poverty
☐Investment ☐Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐Competitiveness/Strategic ☒Access to opportunity
☐Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐Other:
☐Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
□ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒No
Page 190 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Legislators may wish to keep in mind the changing demographics of the Commonwealth and the significant cost this may incur for the state.
Page 191 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 to 23
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.407
TAX TYPE Deductions From Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED IRC §§ 151-152; M.G.L. c. 62 § 3B(b)(3)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1986
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $10.0 - $10.6 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 – FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT Estimated 169,288 – 180,253 taxpayers.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE E☒stimated $5☐8.80 per benefiting taxpayer.
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts provides a $1,000 personal The statute does not state the purpose of this
income tax exemption for each of a taxpayer’s tax expenditure.
dependent children. The exemption for
children who are full-time students between
the ages of 19 and 23 is treated as a tax
e W x h pe a n t d a i r t e u r t e h . e policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Most states that impose a personal income tax
expenditure is to lessen the financial burden of allow exemptions for dependent children who
individuals that have children or dependents are full-time students between the ages of 19
over 18 and under 24 who are pursuing higher and 23, including New York, Rhode Island, and
education. Vermont. California and Maine allow credits
for such dependents rather than exemptions.
Connecticut does not allow an exemption for
dependents of any age.
Page 192 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts provides a personal income tax exemption for each of a taxpayer’s
dependents, as determined under Internal Revenue Code (Code)§ 151(c). See M.G.L. c. 62,
§ 3B(b)(3). The exemption allows taxpayers to reduce their taxable income by $1,000 for
each dependent. The Code’s definition of a dependent includes qualifying children and
qualifying relatives. See Code § 152(a). Qualifying children generally include a taxpayer’s
children (or certain specified close relatives) who are under the age of 19 and meet certain
other requirements. However, qualifying children also include a taxpayers’ children
(including specified close relatives) that are full-time students under the age of 24, so long
1
as they otherwise meet the definition of qualifying children. A qualifying relative is a
relative (or non-relative that lives with the taxpayer) for whom the taxpayer provides more
than half the support and who is not a qualifying child. See Code § 152(d).
The dependent exemption for qualifying children under 19 and qualifying relatives is not
considered a tax expenditure for purposes of the Massachusetts Tax Expenditure Budget.
This is because the tax expenditure analysis considers the family unit to be the basis of
analysis. Taxpayers are assumed to have an obligation to support children and qualifying
relatives under 19 and the exemption is not considered to be a special benefit for doing so.
However, individuals aged 19 and over are assumed to be capable of supporting
themselves, so the exemption applies to older children and qualifying relatives only if they
are full-time students between the ages of 19 and 23. The exemption for such children and
qualifying relatives is considered a tax expenditure equal to the amount of personal income
2
tax foregone as a result of allowing the exemption for such dependents.
1
See Code § 152(c), which provides that a qualifying child must:
1. Be a child of the taxpayer or a descendant of such a child, or a brother, sister, stepbrother, or
stepsister of the taxpayer, or the descendant or such relative;
2. Have the same principal place of abode as the taxpayer for more than half the taxable year;
3. Be under the age of 19 or be a full-time student who has attained the age of 19 but has not attained
the age of 24;
4. Not have provided more than half of the child’s own support for the calendar year in which the
2 taxable year of the taxpayer begins; and
5. Not have filed a joint return with the taxpayer’s spouse for the taxable year.
The Department of Revenue views the rules for personal exemptions and for no tax status in the
Commonwealth's personal income tax as provisions which help to define the income tax base, and thus as a
part of the basic structure of the tax (much as the progressive rate structure of the federal income tax, which
similarly reduces the tax burden on low-income individuals, is a part of its basic structure). The base of the tax
is defined as net income above what is required for subsistence. Since personal exemptions help define the
amount of income needed for subsistence, and therefore the base, they should not be classified as tax
expenditures. According to this reasoning, exemptions allowed for dependents would also be considered part
of the basic tax structure, since subsistence requirements increase with the size of the taxpayer's household.
Page 193 of 367

POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to allow taxpayers to continue
claiming dependent exemptions for children over 18 and under 24 who are pursuing
higher education.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this exclusion does not present special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). Conformity with federal age requirements for dependents
simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and
definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $10.0 - $10.6
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Dependent Exemption for Students Aged 19-23
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $10.0 $10.4 $10.5 $10.6 $10.6
3
The estimates are based mostly on Massachusetts individual income tax return data,
including data from the schedule DI Dependent Information , which provides each
dependent’s date of birth and, if applicable, disability information. DOR counted the
number of claimed dependents who were in the age group of 19 - 23 but do not have a
disability, assuming that these dependents are claimed because they are full-time students.
Some students may have a disability, but they were excluded from DOR’s analysis because
they can be claimed as dependents even if they are not students.
DOR also reviewed the student enrollment data from the U.S. Department of Education’s
National Center for Education Statistics (NCES) but did not use that data (except for its
projection of student enrollment in future years) for estimating the revenue loss from this
tax expenditure due to the limitations of that data. See Appendix for more information on
the NCES data.
DIRECT BENEFITS
child
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are taxpayers with a who is a full-time
student between the ages of 19 - 23 but does not have a disability. During tax years 2019 -
2022, 1.6 - 1.8 million dependents were claimed annually by taxpayers in Massachusetts.
3 https://www.mass.gov/doc/2022-schedule-di-dependent-information/download
Page 194 of 367

4
The number of dependents aged 19 - 23 who did not have a disability ranged from
191,000 - 227,000 annually, accounting for 12% - 13% of the total number of dependents
claimed by taxpayers in the state. See Table 2 below.
Table 2. Numbers of All Dependents and Dependents Aged 19-23 but Not Disabled
Claimed by Taxpayers, Tax Year 2019 to 2022
Dependent % of
Total
Tax Year Aged 19-23 But Not Dependent Aged 19-
Dependent
Disabled 23 But Not Disabled
2019 226,692 1,746,161 13.0%
2 0 2 0 191,699 1,661,904 11.5%
2021 199,176 1,667,680 11.9%
2022 207,437 1,686,232 12.3%
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, compiled from tax year 2019-2022 individual
income tax return data
Table 3 below shows the estimated number of direct beneficiariesand the average tax
savings per beneficiary.
Table 3. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Affected Taxpayers 169,288 176,304 177,929 179,569 180,253
Benefit per Affected Taxpayer $58.8 $58.8 $58.8 $58.8 $58.8
Numbers of Affected Dependents 199,176 207,437 209,349 211,278 212,083
Benefit per Affected Dependent $50.0 $50.0 $50.0 $50.0 $50.0
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1, Table 2 and
other return data
Table 4 below shows that, in tax year 2022, 985,153 taxpayers claimed an exemption for
1,686,232 dependents of any age, with an average of 1.71 (=1,686,232 / 985,153)
dependents per taxpayer. Among those taxpayers that claimed an exemption for
dependents, 18% or 176,304 taxpayers claimed an exemption for dependents aged 19 – 23
who do not have a disability, with an average of 1.18 (=207,437 / 176,304) such
dependents per taxpayer. Taxpayers with a net adjusted gross income (AGI) between
$200,000 - $500,000 claimed the most such exemptions, accounting for 23.1% of all such
taxpayers and 24.2% of all such dependents. Taxpayers in this AGI bracket made up a
disproportionately high percentage of claimants of this exemption, given that these
taxpayers make up only 9.7% of all taxpayers, and only 18.0% of all taxpayers claiming an
exemption for dependents.
4
Among the dependents aged 19-23, about 2.4%-2.6% are reported as having a disability.
Page 195 of 367

Table 4. Number of Dependents Aged 19-23 but Not Disabled by Income Bracket, Tax Year 2022
Number of Taxpayers Number of Number of Taxpayers Number of
Number of
Claiming Dependent Dependents of Any Reporting Dependent Dependents Aged
Taxpayers
Massachusetts Net Adjusted % of Exemption% of Age % of Aged 19-23% of 19-23% of
Gross Income (AGI) Total Total Total Total Total
Count Count Count Count Count
2.2% 1.9% 2.0% 2.1% 2.2%
3.2% 1.1% 1.1% 0.9% 0.9%
Under $5,000 74,025 18,573 34,360 3,707 4,521
4.8% 1.2% 1.1% 0.8% 0.8%
$5,000 under $10,000 109,398 10,532 18,367 1,592 1,872
4.9% 2.9% 2.6% 1.6% 1.5%
$10,000 under $15,000 166,414 11,560 18,397 1,384 1,620
4.8% 3.5% 3.3% 2.0% 1.9%
$15,000 under $20,000 168,723 28,963 44,575 2,761 3,050
4.6% 3.6% 3.4% 2.3% 2.1%
$20,000 under $25,000 164,137 34,489 56,359 3,503 3,881
4.6% 3.8% 3.5% 2.5% 2.3%
$25,000 under $30,000 157,375 35,244 57,217 4,027 4,434
4.6% 3.8% 3.6% 2.5% 2.4%
$30,000 under $35,000 159,001 36,963 59,848 4,403 4,831
4.4% 3.6% 3.4% 2.6% 2.5%
$35,000 under $40,000 158,421 37,548 60,205 4,483 4,947
4.1% 3.3% 3.1% 2.5% 2.3%
$40,000 under $45,000 152,766 35,604 57,513 4,613 5,086
7.3% 5.8% 5.5% 4.6% 4.3%
$45,000 under $50,000 141,363 32,364 52,128 4,387 4,866
6.2%,. 5.0%,. 4.7% 4.3% 4.1%
$50,000 under $60,000 250,979 57,220 91,975 r 8,034 r 8,942
5.3%,, 4.5%,, 4.3% 4.1% 3.9%
$60,000 under $70,000 211,613 48,828 78,569 7,512 8,487
~ ~
4.5% 4.1%,. 3.9% 4.0% 3.8%
$70,000 under $80,000 180,987 44,264 71,804 r 7,261 r 8,163
3.7%,, 3.7%,, 3.6% 3.6% 3.5%
$80,000 under $90,000 153,670 40,712 66,564 r 6,974 r 7,891
12.0%,, 14.7%,, 14.6% 15.8% 15.6%
$90,000 under $100,000 126,002 36,355 60,026 ~ 6,344 ~ 7,246
6.5%,. 10.4%,. 10.8% 12.6% 12.8%
$100,000 under $150,000 411,073 144,437 246,528 r 27,848 r 32,320
9.7%,, 18.0%,, 19.4% 23.1% 24.2%
$150,000 under $200,000 225,144 102,546 182,341 22,263 26,636
~ ~
1.8%,. 3.6%,. 4.1% 5.2% 5.6%
$200,000 under $500,000 334,771 177,105 326,557 r 40,739 r 50,170
0.9% 1.6% 2.0% 3.0% 3.3%
$500,000 under $1,000,000 62,970 35,655 69,619 9,209 11,665
100.0% 100.0% 100.0% 100.0% 100.0%
$1,000,000 or Over 31,010 16,191 33,280 5,260 6,809
Total 3,439,842 985,153 1,686,232 176,304 207,437
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, compiled from tax year 2022 individual income tax return data
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
Page 196 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states that impose a personal income tax allow exemptions for dependent children
who are fulltime students between the ages of 19 and 23, including New York, Rhode
Island, and Vermont. California and Maine allow credits for such dependents rather than
exemptions. Connecticut does not allow any exemption for dependents of any age.
Page 197 of 367

APPENDIX
As mentioned in the text, DOR looked at the student enrollment data from the U.S.
Department of Education’s National Center for Education Statistics (NCES). Using data from
NCES’ Integrated Post Secondary Education Data System (IPEDS), DOR estimated the
numbers of full-time students aged 19 - 23 enrolled in fall in Massachusetts’ colleges from
2009 - 2021. The full-time fall enrollment count includes both U.S. residents and
international students. The share of international students in Massachusetts’ colleges is
high and has increased over time. Our analysis of the IPEDS data shows that the share of
international students in Massachusetts’ colleges increased from 7.9% in 2009 to 15.2% in
2021. Excluding international students, the numbers of resident students enrolled in
34 - 39% of persons aged 19 - 23 in
Massachusetts’ colleges are much lower. DOR also estimated that the numbers of resident
Massachusetts.
students enrolled in Massachusetts’ colleges were
NumbersS eoef Stthued teanbtlse Ebnerloolwle. d in Massachusetts’ Colleges by Age and Full-Time
Enrollment Status, 2009-2021
All Ages Aged 19-23
Fall
Fall Enrolled, U.S. %
Fall
Year Fall Fall Enrolled, Full-Time Census Enrolled
Enrolled,
Enrolled Enrolled Full- Excluding Population Full-
Full-Time
Time International Estimates, Time in
Students 19-23 Colleges
2009 487,016 334,157 234,622 202,662 186,596 484,257 38.5%
2011 499,133 342,714 236,965 203,402 184,585 495,406 37.3%
2013 506,539 347,489 241,446 205,106 182,479 502,579 36.3%
2015 504,692 348,059 244,907 208,576 180,917 506,869 35.7%
2017 501,637 352,051 244,851 210,792 180,250 503,344 35.8%
2019 496,018 349,734 244,341 210,590 179,271 496,531 36.1%
2021 483,129 341,443 237,020 205,525 174,377 510,229 34.2%
Source: (i). Student enrollment data for Massachuetts, 2019-2021 are downloaded from U.S. Department of Education’s National Center
for Education Statiscs (NCES) Integrated Post Secondary Education Data System (IPEDS), https://nces.ed.gov/ipeds/. Enrollment and
graduation data for every post secondary educatonal instituition are avilable for download in IPEDS. Please note that in IPEDS survey,
submission of fall enrollment data by age group are mandatory, but optional for even years.
(ii). The IPEDS enrollment data needs to be adjusted for international students. We used foreign full-time students count (all ages) by
post-secondary educational institutions in Massachusetts using IPEDS public use files. Data for foreign students are not broken out by
age group. For full-time enrolled share of foreign students aged 19-23, we assumed the share of all full-time foreign students. (iii).
Population estimates data are from the U.S. Census Bureau’s Population Estimates Division, https://www.census.gov/programs-
surveys/popest/data/tables.html
As mentioned in the text, the NCES data has limitations for the estimation of this tax
expenditure: (1) The NCES data counts the students enrolled in Massachusetts’ colleges.
Though we have excluded international students, the count still includes out-of-state
students whose parents do not need to file Massachusetts income tax return; (2) Students
claimed by parents on Massachusetts income tax return may be enrolled in out of state
Page 198 of 367

colleges. Due to these limitations, NCES data are not completely comparable with the
return data. In the table above, the count of full-time resident students is about 80% - 90%
o f the count in Table 2.
Page 199 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.414 Tuition Tax Deduction Annual cost: $17.4 - Year of adoption: 1996 Sunset date: None
$17.7 million from
FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □x □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □x
The TE is easily administered.
□ □x □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □x □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 200 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 201 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Tuition Tax Deduction
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.414
TAX TYPE Deductions From Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 3(B)(a)(11)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1996
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $17.4 - $17.7 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT 37,000 - 42,000 per year during FY22 - FY26.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE $416 - $477 per year during FY22 - FY26.
☐ ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
A deduction is allowed for tuition payments T he statute does not state the purpose of the tax
made by taxpayers, for themselves or their expenditure.
dependents, for programs that would lead to a
degree or certificate from a two or four-year
college. The deduction is equal to the amount
by which the net tuition payments exceed
25% of the filer's Massachusetts adjusted
g W ro h s a s t i a n r c e o m th e e . p olicy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Few states offer a deduction for tuition
expenditure is to decrease the financial payments. New York allows a credit of up to
barriers to higher education by helping $400 or an itemized deduction of up to $10,000
students and their parents defray tuition for tuition payments, with no income
costs. limitations. Maine allows a credit of up to
$3,500 for student loan repayments made by
low-income taxpayers. No deduction is
Page 202 of 367

available in California, Connecticut, Rhode
Island, or Vermont.
Page 203 of 367

INTRODUCTION
A Massachusetts personal income tax deduction is allowed for tuition payments made by
taxpayers for themselves or their dependents. The deduction is authorized by M.G.L. c. 62,
§ 3(B)(a)(11). To qualify for the deduction, payments must be made for a degree or
certificate program offered by a two-or four-year college. The deduction is equal to the
amount by which the net tuition payments exceed 25% of the filer's Massachusetts
adjusted gross income. Net tuition is the cost of tuition reduced by scholarships, financial
aid, or similar grants. The deduction is not allowed for individuals who are nonresidents
for all or part of the taxable year.
The deduction subsidizes the cost of tuition and therefore reduces the cost of higher
education. The revenue lost as a result of the deduction constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to decrease the financial barriers to
higher education by helping students and their parents defray tuition costs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the tuition deduction presents some challenge for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). As there is no corresponding federal deduction, the DOR cannot rely on
federal enforcement measures to monitor the deduction. However, there are federal
credits for tuition. Educational institutions must provide most students with a US Form
1098-T (tuition statement) for purposes of reporting these credits. Form 1098-T includes
a box for payments received for qualified tuition. This information can be used to monitor
compliance with the Massachusetts tuition deduction.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $17.4 - $17.7
1
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for College Tuition Tax Deduction
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $17.4 $17.5 $17.5 $17.6 $17.7
1
Revenue loss estimates reported in Table 1 and estimates reported in Table 2 were derived by
microsimulation using Massachusetts individual income tax return data for multiple tax years (see Appendix
for more details), supplemented with projection to future years based on tax return data and Massachusetts’
college age population data from the U.S. Census Bureau.
Page 204 of 367

DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are taxpayers with “qualifying college
tuition payments”. The beneficiaries include students themselves, parents who pay tuition
for their children, and other family members who pay college tuition. Table 2 shows the
estimated number of direct beneficiaries (taxpayers only)and the average tax savings for
2
FY22 – FY26.T a ble 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 41,909 39,412 38,620 37,844 37,084
Average Tax Savings $416 $443 $454 $465 $477
Table 3 shows the distribution of tax saving resulting from tuition tax deduction by income
3
bracket for tax year 2022. In 2022, taxpayers with a net adjusted gross income (AGI)
under $50,000 claimed 56% of the tax savings resulting from this expenditure. On the
other hand, taxpayers with a net AGI of $100,000 or more claimed about 25% of total tax
savinTgasb. l e 3. Tax Saving Resulting from Tuition Tax Deduction by Income Bracket
Tax Year 2022
Beneficiaries of Tuition Tax Deduction
Massachusetts Net
Count of
Adjusted Gross Income Income Group's
All Filers Number of Average
(AGI) Tax Saving % of Total Tax
Beneficiaries Tax Saving
Saving
Under $5,000 417,769 17 $9 $1 0.0%
$5,000 under $10,000 247,164 3,224 $514,414 $160 2.9%
$10,000 under $15,000 212,002 6,649 $1,678,317 $252 9.6%
$15,000 under $20,000 184,944 5,216 $1,753,481 $336 10.0%
$20,000 under $25,000 166,883 3,919 $1,503,262 $384 8.6%
$25,000 under $30,000 159,066 2,916 $1,211,263 $415 6.9%
$30,000 under $35,000 160,022 2,270 $1,060,292 $467 6.1%
$35,000 under $40,000 159,147 1,736 $819,873 $472 4.7%
2
Revenue loss estimates reported in Table 1 and estimates reported in Table 2 were derived by
microsimulation using Massachusetts individual income tax return data for multiple tax years (see Appendix
for more details), supplemented with projection to future years based on tax return data and Massachusetts’
college age population data from the U.S. Census Bureau.
3
Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is calculated as the sum of Earned 5.0% Income, 5.0%
Interest and Dividends, 12% Short-Term Capital Gains and 5.0% Long-Term Capital Gains. In tax year 2022,
these income types include those reported on line 10, line 20, Line 23a, plus Long-Term Capital Gains derived
from Line 24, of Form 1, and corresponding lines of other forms.
Page 205 of 367

$40,000 under $45,000 153,543 1,428 $729,197 $511 4.2%
$45,000 under $50,000 142,121 1,038 $527,653 $508 3.0%
$50,000 under $60,000 252,516 1,642 $914,395 $557 5.2%
$60,000 under $70,000 213,189 1,312 $764,950 $583 4.4%
$70,000 under $80,000 182,138 1,012 $626,122 $619 3.6%
$80,000 under $90,000 154,666 900 $575,470 $639 3.3%
$90,000 under $100,000 126,866 678 $478,165 $705 2.7%
$100,000 under $150,000 414,198 2,498 $1,764,008 $706 10.1%
$150,000 under $200,000 226,567 1,515 $1,159,513 $765 6.6%
$200,000 under $500,000 337,034 1,397 $1,312,969 $940 7.5%
$500,000 under $1,000,000 63,519 39 $61,239 $1,570 0.4%
Total
$1,000,000 or Over 31,565 6 $22,143 $3,691 0.1%
4,004,919 39,412 $17,476,736 $443 100.0%
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, preliminary tax year 2022 individual income tax return data.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Only a few states offer a deduction for tuition payments. New York allows a credit of up to
$400 or an itemized deduction of up to $10,000 for tuition payments, with no income
limitations. Maine allows a credit of up to $3,500 for student loan repayments made by
low-income taxpayers. Other states that allow a deduction similar to the Massachusetts
deduction include Ohio and Louisiana. No deduction is available in California, Connecticut,
Rhode Island, or Vermont.
Page 206 of 367

APPENDIX
For Tables 1 & 2, DOR estimated the number of beneficiaries and tax savings by using
microsimulations and Massachusetts individual income tax return data for tax years 2017 –
2022 reported in Table A-1 below.
Table A-1. Tuition Tax Deduction Beneficiaries in Massachusetts
Tax Years 2017 - 2022
Tax Year Number of Tuition Amount of Tax Number of Tax Filers Total Amount of Tuition
Tax Deduction Saving for Who Claimed Tuition Tax Deduction Claimed
Beneficiaries Beneficiaries Tax Deduction by All Tax Filers
2017 48,061 $18,981,410 67,458 $1,289,109,838
2018 41,359 $16,107,368 58,528 $742,736,456
2019 44,268 $17,855,482 62,267 $881,572,838
2020 41,182 $15,847,342 59,036 $794,051,073
2021 41,909 $17,447,668 57,514 $863,467,287
2022 39,412 $17,476,736 53,403 $803,763,238
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, tax year 2017 - 2022 individual income tax return data.
Note that not all tuition tax deduction claimants benefit from the deduction. In tax year
2022, 53,403 taxpayers claimed $804 million in tuition tax deductions, but only 39,412
taxpayers benefited from the deduction with total tax saving of $17 million. The difference
in claimants and beneficiaries may be due to some filers having insufficient income against
which to apply the deduction.
Page 207 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.419 Deduction for Business Expenses of National Guard Annual cost: Year of adoption: Sunset date:
and Reserve Members $1.5 - $1.6 million 2003 None
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☒ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Tax Relief
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □x
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□x □ □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □x □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □x
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □x □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 208 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: The overall fiscal impact of this tax expenditure is minimal and provides a fair tax break to those in the armed services, particularly those that
live farther away from where they must report for duty.
Page 209 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Deduction for Business Expenses of National
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Guard and Reserve Members
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.419
TAX TYPE Deduction from Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1); Code § 62(a)(2)(E)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 2003
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $1.5 - $1.6 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 13,709 - 14,770 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
Estimated $102 - $119 per benefiting
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE i☒nd ividual. ☐
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal T he statute does not state the purpose of this
Revenue Code (Code) for determining tax expenditure.
employee business expense deductions,
Massachusetts allows a personal income tax
deduction for travel expenses incurred by
National Guard and Armed Forces reserve
m embers who must travel more than 100 miles
f W ro h m at t h a e re ir t h h o e m peosl tioc yth g e o ir a a ls s s o i f g t n h e e d posts. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States that conform to the Code for individual
deduction is to defray National Guard and income tax purposes allow the federal
deduction for business expenses of National
Page 210 of 367

A rmed Forces reserve members’ cost of Guard and Armed Forces reserve members,
travelling to their assigned posts. unless they decouple from the Code in that
regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled.
Page 211 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for determining
employee business expense deductions, Massachusetts allows a personal income tax
deduction for travel expenses incurred by National Guard and Armed Forces reserve
members who must travel more than 100 miles from their homes to their assigned posts.
The Massachusetts deduction is effectuated by M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1), which adopts the
federal deductions allowable under Code § 62 that “consist of expenses of travel, meals and
lodging while away from home, or expenses of transportation paid or incurred by the
taxpayer in connection with the performance by him of services as an employee.” Code §
62(a)(2)(E) allows members of the National Guard and Armed Forces reserve to deduct
expenses that are incurred in connection with military services performed more than 100
miles away from home. The amount of the deduction is limited to (i) the regular federal
per diem rate for lodging, meals, and incidental expenses and (ii) the standard federal
1
mileage rate for car expenses, plus any parking fees, ferry fees, and tolls. The deduction is
allowed only if (i) the taxpayer is not reimbursed for such expenses or (ii) the taxpayer is
2
reimbursed and the reimbursement is reported as wages on the taxpayer’s W-2. National
Guard and Armed Forces reserve members are not required to itemize deductions in order
to claim the federal or Massachusetts deduction.
Revenue that is lost as a result of the deduction constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to defray National Guard and
Armed Forces reserve members’ cost of travelling to their assigned posts.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the deduction for qualifying expenses incurred by National Guard
and Armed Forces reserve members does not present any special challenges for the
Department of Revenue (DOR). Adoption of the federal deduction simplifies tax
compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be
used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $1.5 - $1.6 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
1Id.
See IRS Publication 463 at p. 31.
2
Page 212 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Deduction for
Business Expenses of National Guard and Reserve Members
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $1.5 $1.6 $1.6 $1.6 $1.6
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based mostly on data from the Joint
3
Committee on Taxation (JCT) . The JCT reports the impact on federal tax collections
resulting from the corresponding deduction at the federal level. To share down the federal
4
estimates into Massachusetts estimates, DOR adjusted the federal estimates for the
differences between federal and state fiscal years , effective tax rates, and size of tax base.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct benefits of this tax expenditure are the tax savings from the deduction for the
National Guard and Armed Forces reserve members.
The National Guard and Armed Forces reserve members who must travel more than 100
miles from home to perform services are the direct beneficiaries of this deduction. The
deduction allows these taxpayers to subtract the cost of eligible expenses from their gross
income subject to tax. Table 2 below shows the estimated number of direct beneficiaries
and the resulting tax savings per beneficiary.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
70 5 3 09
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 14,7 14,44 14,120 13,91 13,7
Average Tax Benefit $102 $113 $116 $117 $119
Source: Estimated by Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR) based on Table 1 and data from
the Defense Manpower Data Center.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
3
https://www.jct.gov/
4
It should be noted that the federal fiscal year runs from October 1st to September 30th of the following year,
while the Massachusetts fiscal year runs from July 1st to June 30th of the following year.
Page 213 of 367

Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal
deduction for business expenses of National Guard and Armed Forces reserve members,
unless they decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any
state that has decoupled.
Page 214 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.425 Student Loan Interest Deduction Annual cost: $15.6 - Year of adoption: 1997 Sunset date: None
$17.5 million from by Fed, 1999 by MA
FY22 – FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes ☒ No Up to $2,500 for federal additional
deduction for undergrad student loan interest
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity - decrease financial barriers to higher education
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □ □X
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 215 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: May be worthwhile to evaluate state and federal expenditures separately.
Page 216 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Student Loan Interest Deduction
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.425
TAX TYPE Deductions From Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
M.G.L. c. 62, §§ 2(d)(1), 3B(a)(12); I.R.C. §
YEAR ENACTED 62(a)(17), § 221
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1997 (federal); 1999 (Massachusetts)
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $15.6 - $17.5 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
180,300 - 211,200 per year during FY22 -
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY26.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE $☒7 8 - $95 per year during FY22 - FY26.
YES (☒1. Deduction for student loan interest
allowed under the Internal Revenue Code
(Code)) NO (2. Massachusetts deduction
that applies to interest on undergraduate
student loans)
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts allows two alternative T he statute does not state the purpose of the
deductions for student loan interest. The first tax expenditure.
is the deduction for student loan interest
allowed under the Internal Revenue Code
(Code), to which Massachusetts conforms. The
Code allows a deduction of up to $2,500 of
interest paid on loans used to pay for
undergraduate or graduate education, subject
to income limitations. The second deduction is
a Massachusetts deduction that applies to
interest on undergraduate student loans. This
Page 217 of 367

deduction is not limited in amount and is not
subject to income limitations.
T W a h x a p t a y a e r r e s t c h a e n pnootl itcayke g b o o a t l h s o d f e d th u e c tions for the Are there other states with a similar Tax
s e a x m pe e n in d t i e tu re r s e t ? payments. Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Most states that adopt the Code for individual
expenditure is to decrease the financial income tax purposes allow the federal
barriers to higher education by helping deduction of up to $2,500 for student loan
students defray interest expenses related to interest. California, Connecticut, Maine, Rhode
student loans. Island, and Vermont allow such a deduction.
New York allows an uncapped deduction for
interest on undergraduate student loans
similar to the second Massachusetts deduction
summarized above.
Page 218 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts allows two alternative deductions for student loan interest. The first is
authorized by M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1) and is equal to the federal deduction for student loan
interest available under Internal Revenue Code (Code)§§ 62(a)(17), 221. The deduction is
allowed for interest paid by individuals subject to the personal income tax, up to an annual
maximum of $2,500, on qualified education loans for graduate or undergraduate education.
The deduction is subject to income limitations. For taxable years beginning in 2024, the
deduction begins to phase-out for taxpayers with federal modified adjusted gross income
in excess of $80,000 ($165,000 for joint returns) and is completely phased out for
taxpayers with modified adjusted gross income of $95,000 or more ($195,000 or more for
joint returns).
The second deduction is authorized by M.G.L. c. 62, § 3(B)(a)(12). The deduction is allowed
for the full amount of interest paid on undergraduate student loans. It is not subject to any
income limitations.
Taxpayers cannot take both deductions for the same interest payments.
The deductions subsidize the cost of interest on student loans and therefore reduce the
cost of higher education. The revenue lost as a result of the deductions constitutes a tax
expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to decrease the financial barriers to
higher education by helping students defray interest expenses related to student loans.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of this expenditure does not present any special challenges for the
Massachusetts Department of Revenue (DOR). Conformity with the federal deduction
simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and
definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. Although the second
Massachusetts deduction is not based on the Code, it poses no particular administrability
challenge. Educational institutions must provide students with a US Form 1098-E, which
includes a box for student loan interest. DOR can use this information to monitor
compliance with both deductions.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $15.6 - $17.5
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Page 219 of 367

Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Student Loan Interest Deduction
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Revenue Loss Estimates ($ Million) $16.6 $15.6 $16.2 $16.9 $17.5
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates reported above are based on DOR’s individual
1
income tax return data.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are taxpayers making higher education
student loan interest payments. Table 2 shows the estimated number of direct
beneficiariesT aanbdl eth 2e. r Nesuumltibnegr t oaxf Dsairveincgt sB peenre bfiecnieafriiceiasr &y. A verage Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 211,151 180,347 181,596 182,853 184,120
Average Tax Savings $78 $87 $89 $92 $95
Table 3 shows the distribution of the deduction and the resulting tax savings by income
group for tax year 2022. In 2022, 180,347 taxpayers or 4.5% of all filers claimed $312.7
million in student loan interest deductions. Taxpayers with a net adjusted gross income
2
(AGI) of $100,000 and over are the largest cohort for this deduction, claiming about 43%
of all tax savings resulting from this tax expenditure. In contrast, only 21% of all tax
savings went to taxpayers with net AGI under $50,000. The average claimant tax saving is
about $87.
1
Please note that the revenue loss estimates as reported in Table 1 do not reflect the phase out of the
deduction authorized by Internal Revenue Code (Code)§§ 62(a)(17), 221 beginning in 2024 as mentioned in
the “Introduction” section. Part of that deduction can be substitute by the second deduction authorized by
M.G.L. c. 62, § 3(B)(a)(12) if the interest payments are used to pay for undergraduate education.
2
Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is calculated as the sum of Earned 5.0% Income, 5.0%
Interest and Dividends, 12% Short-Term Capital Gains and 5.0% Long-Term Capital Gains. In tax year 2022,
these income types include those reported on line 10, line 20, Line 23a, plus Long-Term Capital Gains derived
from Line 24, of Form 1, and corresponding lines of other forms.
Page 220 of 367

Table 3. Student Loan Interest Deduction by Income Bracket, Tax Year 2022
Student Loan Interest Deduction A v e r a g e
(For claimants with tax liability) Tax
Massachusetts Net Number Saving
Adjusted Gross Income of All per
Average Income
(AGI) Filers Number Claimant
Amount Deduction Group's %
of (at a 5%
Deducted per of Total
Claimants rate)
Claimant Deduction
Under $5,000 417,769 2,481 $275,833 $111 0.1% $6
$5,000 under $10,000 247,164 2,219 $742,347 $335 0.2% $17
$10,000 under $15,000 212,002 3,289 $2,735,105 $832 0.9% $42
$15,000 under $20,000 184,944 3,850 $4,201,923 $1,091 1.3% $55
$20,000 under $25,000 166,883 4,330 $5,565,456 $1,285 1.8% $64
$25,000 under $30,000 159,066 4,778 $6,919,455 $1,448 2.2% $72
$30,000 under $35,000 160,022 5,613 $9,044,319 $1,611 2.9% $81
$35,000 under $40,000 159,147 6,335 $11,306,505 $1,785 3.6% $89
$40,000 under $45,000 153,543 6,904 $11,777,334 $1,706 3.8% $85
$45,000 under $50,000 142,121 7,213 $13,129,729 $1,820 4.2% $91
$50,000 under $60,000 252,516 14,992 $27,527,775 $1,836 8.8% $92
$60,000 under $70,000 213,189 14,931 $28,198,796 $1,889 9.0% $94
$70,000 under $80,000 182,138 14,035 $24,369,183 $1,736 7.8% $87
$80,000 under $90,000 154,666 11,099 $18,700,626 $1,685 6.0% $84
$90,000 under $100,000 126,866 8,064 $14,680,345 $1,820 4.7% $91
$100,000 under $150,000 414,198 31,058 $56,006,458 $1,803 17.9% $90
$150,000 under $200,000 226,567 19,816 $34,802,813 $1,756 11.1% $88
$200,000 under $500,000 337,034 17,838 $38,489,549 $2,158 12.3% $108
$500,000 under $1,000,000 63,519 1,311 $3,737,176 $2,851 1.2% $143
$1,000,000 or Over 31,565 191 $446,947 $2,340 0.1% $117
Total 4,004,919 180,347 $312,657,674 $1,734 100.0% $87
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue, 2022 individual income tax return data
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Page 221 of 367

Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal
deduction of up to $2,500 for student loan interest similar to the federal deduction,
including similar income limitations. California, Connecticut, Maine, Rhode Island, and
Vermont allow such a deduction. New York allows an uncapped deduction for interest on
undergraduate student loans similar to the second Massachusetts deduction summarized
above.
Page 222 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.427 Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Contribution Annual cost: $3.2- Year of adoption: 2016 Sunset date: None
Deduction $3.7 million from FY22 -
FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☒ Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☒ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☒ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 223 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
As the cost of higher education continues to increase families are beginning to plan to this major expense. If college savings plans were taxed, it would act
as a disincentive to save. Other states allow for this deduction, Massachusetts, with its many colleges and universities should do so as well. This deduction
is necessary.
Page 224 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Contribution Deduction
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.427
TAX TYPE Deductions from Adjusted Gross Income
LEGAL REFERENCE Personal Income Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(19)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 2016 (Acts of 2016 c. 133, § 135)
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $3.2 - $3.7 million per year during
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS FY22 - FY26.
Estimated 39,406 – 45,068 per year during
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT FY22 - FY26.
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE E☐s ti mated $82☒ per benefiting taxpayer.
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts allows taxpayers a deduction of T he statute does not state the purpose of the
up to $1,000 per individual or $2,000 per tax expenditure.
married couple filing jointly for contributions
to an account in a pre-paid tuition program or
c W o h lle a g t e a s r a e v t i h n e g sp porloicgyra g m o . a ls of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Many states allow a deduction for
expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save contributions to education savings accounts.
for higher education costs. The amount of the deduction varies. States
that allow a deduction include Connecticut (up
to $5,000 for single filers and $10,000 for joint
filers), New York (up to $5,000 for single filers
and $10,000 for joint filers), and Rhode Island
Page 225 of 367

(up to $500 for single filers and $1,000 for joint
filers). Vermont allows a credit for 10% of
contributions up to $2,500 of contributions by
single filers and up $5,000 of contributions by
joint filers. California and Maine do not allow a
deduction or a credit.
Page 226 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts allows a deduction for amounts contributed to an account in a pre-paid
1
tuition program or college savings programestablished by Massachusetts. The deduction
is authorized by M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(19). The deduction is capped at $1,000 for single
filers and heads of household and $2,000 for joint filers. Such programs and plans must
meet administrative requirements set out by state and federal law. Withdrawals from such
programs and plans are free of federal and state tax if the proceeds are used for qualified
education purposes. This report covers only the deduction for contributions. The
treatment of withdrawals is covered in TERC 1.041.
Absent the deduction, all contributions to pre-paid tuition programs and college savings
accounts would be subject to the personal income tax. The revenue that Massachusetts
forgoes as a result of allowing the deduction constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save for
higher education costs.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the deduction for contributions to pre-paid tuition programs and
college savings accounts presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR) as
it is not based on any current federal deduction. However, plan sponsors are required to
report contributions, earnings and withdrawals with respect to such programs and plans
for both state and federal purposes. Such reporting assists the DOR in monitoring the
deduction and helps taxpayers comply with the rules pertaining to the deduction.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $3.2 - $3.7 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Prepaid Tuition or College
Savings Plan Contribution Deduction
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $3.2 $3.3 $3.4 $3.6 $3.7
1 Massachusetts has available the U.Fund College Investing Plan, a direct-sold 529 college savings plan managed by
Fidelity Investments using Fidelity mutual funds.
Page 227 of 367

Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates above are based on the Massachusetts Department
of Revenue’s Statistic of Income data (SOI).
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the taxpayers making contributions to
and students benefitting from pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts.
Table 2 shows the estimated number of contributing taxpayersand the resulting tax
savings per taxpayer.
Table 2. Number of Direct Beneficiaries & Average Tax Benefit
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Number of Beneficiaries 39,406 41,012 42,210 43,616 45,068
Average Tax Savings $82 $82 $82 $82 $82
Table 3 shows the distribution of the deduction and the resulting tax savings by income
group for tax year 2022. In tax year 2022, taxpayers with a net adjusted gross income
2
(AGI) of $200,000 - $500,000 claimed 51.8% of all tax savings resulting from this tax
expenditure. Taxpayers with net AGI of $100,000 or more claimed 91.6% of all tax savings.
The average tax saving per claimant is about $82.
Table 3. Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Contribution Deduction by Income Bracket
Tax Year 2022
Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Contribution Average
Deduction T a x
Massachusetts Net Number (For claimants with tax liability) Saving
Adjusted Gross Income of All
Average
Income per
(AGI) Filers Number of Amount Group's % Claimant
Deduction
Claimants Deducted of Total (at a 5%
per Claimant
Deduction rate)
Under $5,000 417,769 86 $23,683 $275 0.0% $14
$5,000 under $10,000 247,164 101 $41,974 $416 0.1% $21
$10,000 under $15,000 212,002 151 $99,474 $659 0.1% $33
$15,000 under $20,000 184,944 184 $156,339 $850 0.2% $42
$20,000 under $25,000 166,883 191 $174,075 $911 0.3% $46
$25,000 under $30,000 159,066 218 $221,099 $1,014 0.3% $51
2
Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is calculated as the sum of Earned 5.0% Income, 5.0%
Interest and Dividends, 12% Short-Term Capital Gains and 5.0% Long-Term Capital Gains. In tax year 2022,
these income types include those reported on line 10, line 20, Line 23a, plus Long-Term Capital Gains derived
from Line 24, of Form 1, and corresponding lines of other forms.
Page 228 of 367

$30,000 under $35,000 160,022 231 $232,743 $1,008 0.3% $50
$35,000 under $40,000 159,147 244 $259,205 $1,062 0.4% $53
$40,000 under $45,000 153,543 279 $299,696 $1,074 0.4% $54
$45,000 under $50,000 142,121 242 $242,931 $1,004 0.4% $50
$50,000 under $60,000 252,516 554 $589,049 $1,063 0.9% $53
$60,000 under $70,000 213,189 607 $684,344 $1,127 1.0% $56
$70,000 under $80,000 182,138 674 $763,976 $1,133 1.1% $57
$80,000 under $90,000 154,666 757 $894,561 $1,182 1.3% $59
$90,000 under $100,000 126,866 751 $912,421 $1,215 1.4% $61
$100,000 under $150,000 414,198 4,758 $6,497,502 $1,366 9.7% $68
$150,000 under $200,000 226,567 6,214 $9,791,066 $1,576 14.6% $79
$200,000 under $500,000 337,034 19,361 $34,693,141 $1,792 51.8% $90
$500,000 under $1,000,000 63,519 4,237 $8,103,559 $1,913 12.1% $96
$1,000,000 or Over 31,565 1,172 $2,239,691 $1,911 3.3% $96
Total 4,004,919 41,012 $66,920,529 $1,632 100.0% $82
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue -Preliminary tax year 2022 individual income tax return data.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. For example, financial institutions, which manage qualified plans benefit
indirectly, as the expenditure fosters the use of such plans, thereby providing such financial
institutions with access to increased capital and demand for their services.
To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to utilize
complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN (Impact
Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their complexity and
data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Many states allow a deduction for contributions to education savings accounts. The
amount of the deduction varies. States that allow a deduction include Connecticut (up to
Page 229 of 367

$5,000 for single filers and $10,000 for joint filers), New York (up to $5,000 for single filers
and $10,000 for joint filers), and Rhode Island (up to $500 for single filers and $1,000 for
joint filers). Vermont allows a credit for 10% of contributions up to $2,500 of contributions
by single filers and up to $5,000 of contributions by joint filers. California and Maine do not
allow a deduction or a credit.
Page 230 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 1.606 & 2.608 Annual cost: Total: $24.5m to 27.2m Year of Sunset
Brownfields Credit (personal $2.3m - $2.8m; corporate $22.2m to $26.4m) FY22 -FY26 adoption: 1998 date: None
I I I
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☒ Corporate ☒Personal Income ☐ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐Relief of poverty
☐Investment ☐Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐Competitiveness/Strategic ☐Access to opportunity
☒Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐Other:
☐Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □x □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □ □x
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □x
□x □ □ □
The TE is easily administered.
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □x □ □
Individuals only
□x □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☒ Yes ☐No
Page 231 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
• Comments:
Members noted that (i) this credit has no cap and therefore the fiscal impact of the credit is unpredictable, (ii) there is
administrative complexity in the fact that DEP regulations determine eligibility for the credit but the statute tasks DOR with
reviewing applications and granting credits, requiring DOR to develop technical expertise. Members voted “Strongly Disagree” on
. the question of whether this tax expenditure is easily administered. Given the significant and unpredictable revenue impact, and
administrative challenges the legislature may wish to consider reviewing this expenditure.
Page 232 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Brownfields Credit
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 1.608 & 2.608
TAX TYPE Credits Against Tax
Personal Income Tax/Corporate and Business
LEGAL REFERENCE Excise
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 62, §6(j); M.G.L. c. 63, §38Q
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1998
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $2.3 - $2.8 million per year for
personal income tax, and $22.2 - $26.4 million
per year for corporate and business excise
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 – FY26.
40 – 45 per year for personal income tax, 13 –
20 per year for corporate and business excise
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BENEFIT during tax years 2018 - 2022.
$17,000 - $70,000 per year for personal
income tax, and $1.1 million - $3.1 million per
year for corporate and business excise during
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE tax years 2018 - 2022.
☐ ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts allows a personal income tax and The statute does not explicitly state the
corporate excise credit for costs incurred in purpose of this tax expenditure.
remediating contamination of real estate.
What are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the credit Few other states allow a credit similar to the
is to promote clean-up of contaminated Brownfields Credit. No credit is available in
property in Massachusetts in accordance with California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire,
Page 233 of 367

s tandards set out by the Massachusetts Rhode Island, or Vermont. However, New York
Department of Environmental Protection (DEP). allows a similar credit.
Page 234 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts allows a credit for costs incurred in remediating contamination of real
estate. See M.G.L. c. 62, §6 (j); M.G.L. c. 63, § 38Q. The credit may be claimed by personal
income taxpayers, business corporations or non-profit corporations. The credit is available
for expenses incurred to remediate contaminated property in Massachusetts. To claim the
credit a taxpayer must commence and diligently pursue an environmental response action
and achieve and maintain a permanent solution or remedy operation status in compliance
with M.G.L. c. 21E, § 2. The taxpayer must complete the cleanup in compliance with
standards set out by the Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection (DEP).
The contaminated property must be owned or leased for business purposes by the claimant
and must be located within an economically distressed area. The remediation must be
commenced on or before August 5, 2028 and eligible costs that qualify for the credit must
be incurred before January 1, 2029.
The credit is equal to either 25% or 50% of the taxpayer’s net response and removal costs,
depending on whether any limitations on the use of the property remain after remediation.
The taxpayer’s net response and removal costs are the eligible costs less any
reimbursement received by the taxpayer. Unused credit may be carried forward for up to
five years. Taxpayers may sell, transfer or assign the credit. The credit may be carried
forward for up to 5 years.
In the absence of the credit, taxpayers would bear the full cost of remediation of
contaminated property. The revenue foregone as a result of the credit constitutes a tax
expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the credit is to promote clean-up of contaminated
property in Massachusetts in accordance with standards set out by DEP.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the Brownfields Credit presents challenges for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). DOR is responsible for administering the credit. Verification of eligible
expenses often raises technical environmental matters that require specialized expertise.
DOR audits the credit as part of its personal income tax and corporate excise audit
processes.
Page 235 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $24.5 - $29.2
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below. The estimates are made based on
historical data on credits claimed on tax returns. By tax type, the revenue loss estimates
are $2.3 - $2.8 million per year for personal income tax, and $22.2 - $26.4 million per year
for corporate and business tax.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Brownfields Credit ($Million)
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
I I I I I I
Personal Income Tax $2.3 $2.4 $2.6 $2.7 $2.8
Corporate and Business Tax $22.2 $23.1 $24.1 $25.2 $26.4
Total $24.5 $25.5 $26.7 $27.9 $29.2
Table 2 below shows the amount and count of available and claimed credits for personal
income taxpayers in recent years. “Available credit” is the maximum amount of credit that
a taxpayer can claim based on tax liability, provided that there are no other restrictions;
“Claimed credit” is the credit amount that a taxpayer actually claimed.
During the tax years 2018 - 2022, the number of taxpayers who claimed the credit ranged
from 40 - 45, and the dollar amount of claimed credits ranged from $0.772 - $2.986 million.
The average credit amount per claimant ranged from $17,555 - $69,452. The annual
amount of credits claimed was 21.9% - 75.5% of the available credit amount.
Table 2. The Amount and Count of Brownfields Credit by Tax Year
for Personal Income Tax
2018 2019 2020 2021 2022
Tax Year Amount Amount Amount Amount Amount
Count Count Count Count Count
($000) ($000) ($000) ($000) ($000)
Available
$1,944 45 $3,527 44 $2,506 44 $3,953 45 $2,517 44
Credit - A
Claimed
$1,100 45 $772 44 $1,392 44 $2,986 43 $1,656 40
Credit - B
B/A 56.6% 100.0% 21.9% 100.0% 55.6% 100.0% 75.5% 95.6% 65.8% 90.9%
Average
Claimed
$24,453 $17,555 $31,645 $69,452 $41,398
Credit
Amount ($)
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue. Data for 2022 are preliminary and subject to change.
Table 3 below shows the amount and count of available and claimed or shared credits for
corporate and business taxpayers. “Available credit” is the maximum amount of credit that
a taxpayer can claim based on tax liability, provided that there are no other restrictions;
Page 236 of 367

“Claimed credit” is the credit amount that a taxpayer actually claimed; and “shared credit”
is the credit amount used by other members of a taxpayer’s combined group.
During the tax years from 2018 - 2022, the number of corporate and business taxpayers
who claimed or shared the credit ranged from 13 - 20, and the amount of claimed or shared
credits ranged from $20.1 - $46.2 million. The average credit amount per claimant ranged
from $1.1 - $3.1 million. The annual amount of credits claimed or shared was 89.3% -
96.7% of the available credit amount.
Table 3. The Amount and Count of Brownfields Credit by Tax Year
for Corporate and Business Tax
2018 2019 2020 2021 2022
Tax Year Amount Amount Amount Amount Amount
Count Count Count Count Count
($000) ($000) ($000) ($000) ($000)
Available
$50,360 15 $29,751 20 $22,619 19 $22,079 19 $25,022 17
Credit – A
Claimed or
Shared Credit $46,164 15 $26,575 20 $21,136 13 $20,114 19 $24,192 17
- B
B/A 91.7% 100.0% 89.3% 100.0% 93.4% 68.4% 91.1% 100.0% 96.7% 100.0%
Average
Claimed or
$3,077.6 $1,328.8 $1,625.8 $1,058.6 $1,423.1
Shared
A mount
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue. Data for 2021 and 2022 are preliminary and subject to change.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The beneficiaries of this credit are taxpayers that clean up contaminated property in
Massachusetts.
First, developers revitalizing brownfield sites benefit from the tax credit as they undertake
costly cleanup activities. The tax credit is expected to encourage them to invest in these
challenging projects, helping to transform neglected areas into productive properties. The
tax credit provides financial relief by covering a significant portion of cleanup costs, making
it appealing for organizations that might otherwise lack the resources to undertake such
projects. Besides individuals or organizations who are awarded brownfields credits, credit
brokers and credit buyers also benefit from the credit directly.
Second, those who provide environmental remediation services, such as licensed site
professionals, benefit from the tax credit program indirectly as their services are essential
Page 237 of 367

for securing the tax credits. Compliance with the program’s regulations aids consultants
and contractors by securing contracts for necessary remediation work.
Communities benefit from the redeveloped properties through revitalized local economies,
1
increased property values, and improved public health. The cleanup of brownfields sites
activates previously unusable land, bringing it back into productive use, which could spur
local development and job creation.
Tables 4 - 6 below provide information on the taxpayers who claimed the credit on their
2
tax returns for the most recent year for which such data is complete. These tables reflect
the data for the taxpayers who claimed the credit which, because the credit is transferable,
may not be the taxpayer that generated the credit.
Personal Income Taxpayers:
Table 4 shows the distribution of claimed credit by income level for tax year 2021. The
average tax savings was $75,144. While the tax credit was claimed by individuals in most
income brackets, the greatest percentage of claimants (33%) had net adjusted gross
income of $1 million or more. That group claimed 81.9% of the total personal income tax
credit amount, with an average tax saving of $184,659 per claimant, which is higher than
that for other income groups.
Table 4. Brownfields Credit Claims by Net Adjusted Gross Income
for Personal Income Taxpayers for 2021
Massachusetts Net Adjusted Percent of Percent of the Tax Saving per
Gross Income claimed amounts number of claimants Claimant ($)
0 less than $50,000 ** ** **
$50,000 less than $100,000 None None None
$100,000 less than $150,000 ** ** **
$150,000 less than $200,000 None None None
$200,000 less than $500,000 1.7% 12.8% $10,076
$500,000 less than $ 1 million 5.4% 25.6% $15,791
$1 million or over 81.9% 33.3% $184,659
Unspecified 10.6% 20.5% $38,969
Total or average 100.0% 100.0% $75,144
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue (Massachusetts personal income tax returns-tax year 2021).
Notes: 1) Massachusetts Net Adjusted Gross Income (AGI) is the sum of Earned Income, Interest and Dividends,
Short-Term Capital Gains and Long-Term Capital Gains.
2) ** Information withheld to maintain taxpayer confidentiality
1
Note, however, that increased property values may adversely affect lo wer-income households that can no
longer afford to live there.
2
Note: Tables 4 - 6 were created using samples due to data limitations.
Page 238 of 367

Corporate and business taxpayers:
Tables 5 and 6 show the percentage of claimed or shared amounts, percentage of number
of claimants, and average tax savings per claimant by number of employees (Table 5) and
by industry (Table 6), respectively, for tax year 2020.
Looking at Table 5, the greatest percentage (36.4%) of all corporate claimants had 500 or
more employees. That group claimed or shared 53.3% of the total corporate and business
credit amount, with an average tax savings of $4.1 million per claimant. 27.3% of all
corporate claimants had 5 - 49 employees. That group claimed or shared 34.3% of the total
corporate and business credit amount, with an average tax savings of $3.5 million per
claimant.
Table 5. Brownfields Credit Claims by Number of Employees
for Corporate and Business Taxpayers for 2020
Percent of claimed Percent of the Tax Saving per
Number of Employees
or shared amounts number of claimants Claimant ($000)
Less than 5 ** ** **
5 to 49 34.3% 27.3% $3,470
50 to 99 ** ** **
100 to 199 None None None
200 to 499 None None None
500 or more 53.3% 36.4% $4,051
Unspecified or not found 6.9% 22.7% $844
Total or average 100.0% 100.0% $2,762
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue (Massachusetts corporate and business tax returns -tax year 2020).
Notes: ** Information withheld to maintain taxpayer confidentiality
Looking at Table 6, a significant majority (86.7%) of total corporate and business claimants
of the credit were in the Insurance industry. This group accounted for 72.7% of the total
amount of corporate and business credits claimed or shared, with an average tax savings of
$3.3 million per claimant.
Table 6. Brownfields Credit Claims by Industry
for Corporate and Business Taxpayers for 2020
Percent of Percent of the
Tax Saving per
Industry claimed or shared number of
Claimant ($000)
amounts claimants
Manufacturing ** ** **
Finance ** ** **
Real Estate and Rental and Leasing ** ** **
Management of Companies and
** ** **
Enterprises
Insurance 86.7% 72.7% $3,292
Unspecified or others ** ** **
Page 239 of 367

Total or average 100.0% 100.0% $2,762
Source: Massachusetts Department of Revenue (Massachusetts corporate and business tax returns -tax year 2020).
Notes: ** Information withheld to maintain taxpayer confidentiality
Gunawan and Leon (2017) highlight the immediate benefits of assisting (through tax
incentives) private developers in repurposing brownfields, which include reintegrating
land into the local tax base. This process enhances the financial resources available for
local government services such as education, transportation, and emergency services. By
transforming these areas, the overall attractiveness and land value rise, leading to higher
tax revenues, and many other benefics such as job creation and fewer vehicle miles
traveled.
Sullivan (2017) reports that the cleanup of brownfield sites resulted in a rise in residential
property values by 5% - 15.2% within a 1.29-mile radius of the sites. Haninger et al.
(2017) also report that with cleanup, property values increase by an average of 5.0% -
11.5%.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance this tax expenditure) and the direct
benefits. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the personal
income tax or corporate and business excise tax that would have been collected, are equal
to the direct benefits afforded by the tax expenditure to the taxpayers who claim the credit.
Besides the direct costs and benefits, there are indirect and induced costs and benefits
associated with this tax expenditure. To measure these indirect and induced costs and
benefits, economists often need to utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional
Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN (Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use
such models given their complexity and the data limitations present in this instance. But in
the previous section, DOR cited some studies on some indirect benefits.
In addition, by encouraging the cleanup of contaminated property, the expenditure assists
to protect public health and environment, which would generate positive externalities, or
benefits to each member of the society. Such positive externalities are often difficult to
quantify.
Page 240 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Few other states allow a credit similar to the Brownfields Credit. No credit is available in
California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, Rhode Island, or Vermont. However, New
York allows a similar credit.
Page 241 of 367

REFERENCES
Housing Policy
Greenberg, M., Craighill, P., Mayer, H., Zukin, C., & Wells, J. (2001). Brownfield
Debate, 12
redevelopment and affordable housing: A case study of New Jersey.
(3), 515-540. doi:10.1080/10T5h1e1 E4c8o2n.2om00ic1 .a9n5d2 S1o4c1i7al Impacts of
Brownfield Redevelopment
Gunawan, G., & Leon, S. (2017, November 20).
. Retrieved from Geo Engineer:
https://www.geoengineer.org/education/web-class-projects/cee-549-
geoenvironmental-engineering-fall-2017/assignments/brownfield-
remediation#:~:text=Most%20immediately%2C%20helping%20private%20develo
pers%20reuse%20brownfields%20brings%20land%20back%20into%2
Journal of the Association of Environmental and Resource Economists,
Haninger, K., Ma, L., & Timmins, C. (2017, January 26). The Value of Brownfield
4
Remediation.
(1), 197-241. doi:htBtpr:o/w/dnxfi.edlodis. oPrrgo/g1r0a.m10 E8n6v/i6ro8n9m74en3t al and Economic Benefits
USEPA. (2021, January 11). .
Retrieved 2024, from USEPA:
https://19january2021snapshot.epa.gov/brownfields/brownfields-program-
environmental-and-economic-
benefits_.html#:~:text=Revitalizing%20brownfield%20sites%20creates%20benefit
s,revolving%20loan%20fund%20cooperative%20agreements.
Page 242 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.001 Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government Annual cost: $50.9 - Year of adoption: 1967 Sunset date: None
$62.4M per year
during FY22 - FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☒ Yes (constitutionally required) ☐ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☒ Other: Mandated by federal law ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ X □ □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □X □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 243 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
This is not really an expenditure because the Commonwealth has no choice but to exempt these sales. Sales to the federal government and its agencies
are not subject to the sales and use tax because the US Constitution prohibits states from taxing such sales. The prohibition is effectuated by an
exemption set out in the Massachusetts sales and use tax statutes. Administration of the expenditure is challenging because the federal government and
its agencies generally decline to present exemption certificates, meaning that DOR must audit vendors to ensure that they are properly excluding sales to
the federal government from taxable receipts.
Page 244 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.001
TAX TYPE Exempt Entities
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(d)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1967
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $50.9 - $62.4 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Available ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Sales to the federal government and its The statute does not state the purpose of this
agencies are not subject to the sales and use tax tax expenditure.
because the US Constitution prohibits states
from taxing such sales. The prohibition is
effectuated by an exemption set out in the
M W a h s a s t a c a h r u e s t e h t e ts p soalleics ya n g d o a u l s s e o t f a x th s e ta tutes. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
There is no policy goal of the tax expenditure. The US Constitution prohibits any state from
The statute merely prevents Massachusetts imposing a sales and use tax on sales to the
from purporting to impose an unconstitutional federal government or its agencies.
tax on sales to the federal government and its
agencies.
Page 245 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Sales to the federal government and its agencies are not subject to the Massachusetts sales
and use tax because the US Constitution prohibits states from taxing such sales.
Specifically, the US Supreme Court has held that the Supremacy Clause of the US
1
Constitution prevents states from doing so. The prohibition is effectuated by an
exemption set out in the Massachusetts sales and use tax statutes. See M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(d);
M.G.L. c 64I, § 7(b).
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the goal of the tax expenditure is to prevent Massachusetts
from purporting to impose an unconstitutional tax on sales to the federal government and
its agencies.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The sales and use tax rules for sales to the federal government and its agencies are
administered through the Department of Revenue (DOR) audit function. The DOR has
issued exemption certificates (Form ST-5), that the federal government and its agencies
may present to vendors to claim the Massachusetts statutory exemption. The federal
government and its agencies generally decline to present such certificates. Thus, the DOR
must audit vendors to ensure that they are properly excluding sales to the federal
government from taxable receipts.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $50.9 - $62.4
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See the table below.
Table 1. Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($Million) $50.9 $53.5 $56.4 $59.3 $62.4
DOR does not have micro-level data on federal purchases (sales to federal government)
that are subject to Massachusetts sales and use tax absent this tax expenditure.
Revenue loss estimates are based on the total federal government spending from the
2
Monthly Treasury Statement (MTS) from the US Treasury , share of contractual supplies
1
See McCulloch v. Maryland, 17 U.S. 316 (1819); Alabama v. King & Boozer, 314 U.S. 1 (1941); United States v.
New Mexico, 455 U.S. 720 (1982).
2
Monthly Treasury Statement (MTS) | U.S. Treasury Fiscal Data
Page 246 of 367

3
from USASPENDING.gov , Massachusetts’ share of federal civilian employment from U.S.
4
Office of Personnel Management , and Massachusetts sales tax return data from DOR.
An alternate method using the tax expenditure estimates of other states including Rhode
Island, New York, and New Jersey was utilized, adjusted for tax rate and economic size
differentials. Estimates from both methods were comparable. The estimates reported in
Table 1 are an average of the two methods.
Due to the use of external data and the limitations of these data for estimating this tax
expenditure, the estimates reported in Table 1 may have significant estimation uncertainty
and should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The Federal agencies and political subdivisions that purchase, and the Massachusetts
residents or businesses that sell, the exempt products are the direct beneficiaries of the
sales tax exemption. Buyers benefit from the sales tax exemption in the form of paying a
lower “after tax” price while sellers benefit in the form of receiving a higher “before tax”
price. The exact split of the direct benefits depends on the interaction of demand and
supply and is often difficult to quantify. Out-of-state businesses selling
exempt products to the Federal agencies and political subdivisions located in
Massachusetts are also direct beneficiaries.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
3
Government Spending Explorer | USAspending
4
Federal Civilian Employment (opm.gov)
Page 247 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
The US Constitution prohibits any state from imposing a sales and use tax on sales to the
federal government or its agencies.
Page 248 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.002 Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth Annual cost: Year of adoption: 1967 Sunset date: None
I I I
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ $ O 9 t 6 h . e 0 r -
$119.2 million
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☒ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □X □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 249 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 250 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.002
TAX TYPE Exempt Entities
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(d)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1967
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $96.0 - $119.2 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Available☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Sales to the Commonwealth, its agencies and The statutes do not state the purpose of this
political subdivisions are exempt from sales tax expenditure.
t W ax h . at are the policy goals of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the expenditure Most states that impose a sales and use tax
is intended to reduce the expenses of provide an exemption for sales to the state and
Commonwealth agencies and political its agencies. Connecticut, Maine, New York,
subdivisions, thereby increasing the resources Rhode Island, and Vermont have such an
government organizations have available to exemption. California does not have such an
devote to their missions. exemption but allows government
organizations to apply for refunds of sales tax
paid on certain purchases.
Page 251 of 367

INTRODUCTION
All retail sales of tangible personal property are subject to sales and use tax unless an
exemption applies. M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(d) provides an exemption for sales to the
Commonwealth, its agencies and political subdivisions. The exemption does not apply to
sales to other states.
The Massachusetts sales tax and complementary use tax is a transaction tax that applies to
retail sales of tangible personal property, including prewritten computer software
regardless of mode of transfer, and telecommunication services. A retail sale is any sale
other than a sale for resale. A sale for resale occurs when a business purchases an item and
sells it to a third party in substantially the same form in which it was purchased. All retail
sales are taxable unless an exemption applies. These exemptions are tax expenditures
because they prevent the imposition of tax on transactions that would otherwise be
taxable.
Absent the exemption afforded by this tax expenditure, sales to the Commonwealth, its
agencies and political subdivisions would be subject to sales and use tax, increasing the
cost of government operations.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the expenditure is intended to reduce the expenses of the
Commonwealth, its agencies and political subdivisions, thereby increasing the resources
such government organizations have available to devote to their missions.
ADMINISTRABILITY
Administration of the exemption for sales to the Commonwealth, its agencies and political
subdivisions does not present any special challenge to taxpayers or the Department of
Revenue (DOR). To claim the exemption government organizations must present
exemption certificates to vendors. The DOR monitors the exemption when it audits
vendors as part of its sales and use tax audit function.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $96.0 - $119.2
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See the table below.
Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($ in million) $96.0 $101.4 $107.0 $112.9 $119.2
Page 252 of 367

The revenue loss estimates are based on state expenditure data by detailed expenditure
1
categories from the Massachusetts Office of the Comptroller , local expenditure data from
2
the Division of Local Services at the DOR , state and local direct general expenditure data
3
from the Tax Policy Center and state government finance data from the US Census
4
Bureau.
Some of the state expenditure items are partly covered by other sales tax exemptions, such
as the sales tax exemption for newspapers and magazines. Therefore, there are overlaps
between this sales tax expenditure and other sales tax expenditures (for example: TE 3.106
Exemption for Newspapers and Magazines). In estimating the revenue loss from this
expenditure, DOR excluded the revenue loss attributable to sales that would still be exempt
absent this expenditure.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The Commonwealth agencies and political subdivisions that buy the exempt products, and
the Massachusetts residents or businesses who sell the exempt products, are the direct
beneficiaries of this sales tax exemption. Buyers benefit from the sales tax exemption in
the form of paying a lower “after tax” price while sellers benefit in the form of receiving a
higher “before tax” price. The exact split of the direct benefits depends on the interaction of
demand and supply and is often difficult to quantify. Out-of-state businesses selling
exempt products to the Commonwealth agencies and political subdivisions are also direct
beneficiaries.
On the buyer’s side, besides the state government and its agencies, there are 351 cities and
towns in Massachusetts. The number of sellers who benefit from this tax expenditure is
not available.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
1
For expenditure categories, see https://www.macomptroller.org/expenditure-classification-handbook/
2
3
https://dlsgateway.dor.state.ma.us/reports/rdPage.aspx?rdReport=dashboard.categ ory_4
https://www.taxpolicycenter.org/statistics/state-and-local-direct-general-expenditures-capita
4
https://www.census.gov/data/datasets/2021/econ/local/public-use-datasets.html
Page 253 of 367

Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states that impose a sales and use tax provide an exemption for sales to the state and
its agencies. Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont have such an
exemption. California does not have such an exemption but allows government
o rganizations to apply for refunds of sales tax paid on certain purchases.
Page 254 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.107 Exemption for American Flag Annual cost: ~$1.3 Year of adoption: 1968 Sunset date: None
I I I
million
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☒ Other: Promote Patriotism
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □x □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □x □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □ □x □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □x □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □x □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □x □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □x □ □
Individuals only
□ □x □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 255 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Massachusetts is one of 10 states nationally that exempts all sales of U.S. flags from the sales and use tax. The discount is small on a percentage basis and
is not widely publicized. Further, it is likely that demand for U.S. flags is reasonably price inelastic. Thus, it seems likely that the exemption changes
behavior little and only provides benefits to a select group of individuals and businesses. That said, given the low dollar amount, this expenditure does
achieve the originally intended goal.
Since 1968, patriotism has changed considerably, which may be something to consider. Some states offer this exemption only for sales by non-profit
veteran’s organizations or on sales to veterans. Limited exemptions like these seem like a more accurate reflection of our current values, but it feels
unlikely that we have the data to understand how much this exemption is used on the sale of flags to and by veterans.
Page 256 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption for the American Flag
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.107
TAX TYPE Exempt Products / Services
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(w)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1968
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Tax loss of $1.1 - $1.3 million per year during
FY22 - FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Available☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Sales of the flag of the United States are exempt T he statute does not state the purpose of the
f W ro h m at s a a r le e s t a h n e d p u o s l e i c ta y x g . o als of the eAxreem thpetiroen .o t her states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the Several states provide a sales and use tax
expenditure is to promote patriotism by exemption for sales of U.S. flags. Connecticut,
reducing the cost of the U.S. flag to consumers. New York, and Rhode Island provide such an
exemption. Vermont exempts sales of U.S. flags
to and by non-profit veterans’ organizations.
California exempts sales of U.S. flags by non-
profit veterans’ organizations. Maine does not
have a sales tax exemption for sales of U.S.
flags. New Hampshire does not impose a sales
and use tax.
Page 257 of 367

INTRODUCTION
All retail sales of tangible personal property are subject to sales and use tax unless an
exemption applies. M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(w) exempts “[s]ales of the flag of the United States.”
Sales of other flags, including state flags, are not exempt. Letter Ruling 92-3.
The Massachusetts sales tax and complementary use tax is a transaction tax that applies to
retail sales of tangible personal property, including prewritten computer software
regardless of mode of transfer, and telecommunication services. A retail sale is any sale
other than a sale for resale. A sale for resale occurs when a business purchases an item and
sells it to a third party in substantially the same form in which it was purchased. All retail
sales are taxable unless an exemption applies. These exemptions are tax expenditures
because they prevent the imposition of tax on transactions that would otherwise be
taxable. One such exemption is the exemption for sales of U.S. flags.
Absent the exemption, all sales of the U.S. flag would be subject to sales and use tax. The
revenue foregone as a result of the exemption constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to promote patriotism by reducing
the cost of the U.S. flag to consumers.
ADMINISTRABILITY
Administration of the exemption for the U.S. flag does not present any special
challenge to taxpayers or the DOR. Vendors are generally aware of the exemption and do
not charge sales tax on sales of U.S. flags. Exemption certificates are not required. The DOR
reviews retailers’ sales as part of its sales and use tax audit program.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $1.1 - $1.3 million
per year during FY22 - FY26. See the table below.
Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for the American Flag
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Estimated Revenue Loss ($ in million) $1.10 $1.23 $1.24 $1.27 $1.30
The revenue loss estimates are based mostly on data from the U.S. Census Bureau (CB), the
Flag Manufacturing Association of America, the IBISWorld, and the U.S. Bureau of Labor
Page 258 of 367

1
Statistics (BLS). Due to the use of external data for estimation of this tax expenditure and
limitations of these data, the estimates reported in the table should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The Massachusetts residents and businesses that buy or sell American flags are the direct
beneficiaries of the sales tax exemption. Buyers benefit from the sales tax exemption in the
form of paying a lower “after tax” price while sellers benefit from the sales tax exemption in
the form of receiving a higher “before tax” price. The exact split of the direct benefits
depends on the interaction of demand and supply and is often difficult to quantify. Out-of-
state businesses selling exempt products to Massachusetts residents or businesses are also
direct beneficiaries.
2
Based on Statista survey in 2018, 62% of U.S. consumers responded that they owned an
American flag. Based on the Statista survey and Massachusetts population of about 7
million in 2023, approximately 4.3 million Massachusetts residents benefited from this tax
expenditure in 2023 by purchasing a flag. Data on the number of sellers of American flags
is not available.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
1
According to the U.S. Census Bureau, in 2012, the United States imported $4 million of American flags.
According to the Flag Manufacturing Association of America, 94% of the American Flags are manufactured in
the United States. Therefore, the American flags sold in the United States were about $66.7 million in 2012.
2T his estimate is grown to future years to reflect sales growth and is then apportioned to Massachusetts using
Massa chusetts’ share of the national population.
https://www.statista.com/statistics/882408/share-of-consumers-who-own-patriotic-items-us-by-product-
type/
Page 259 of 367

Besides economic costs and benefits, this sales tax exemption helps promote patriotism in
Massachusetts.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Several states provide a sales and use tax exemption for sales of U.S. flags. Connecticut,
New York, and Rhode Island provide such an exemption. Vermont exempts sales of U.S.
flags to and by non-profit veterans’ organizations. California exempts sales of U.S. flags by
non-profit veterans’ organizations. Maine does not have a sales tax exemption for sales of
U.S. flags. New Hampshire does not impose a sales and use tax.
Page 260 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.408 Exemption for textbooks Annual cost: $10.2 - Year of adoption: 1968 Sunset date: None
$12.2 million from
FY22 – FY26
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☒ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☒ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □X □ □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □X □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □X □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 261 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Reducing the cost of textbooks for low-income students, and thus reducing the cost of attending college, is a reasonable goal. But this
exemption is a blunt tool to do that. At the K-12 level, most public schools do not require students to purchase books. Private schools are more likely to
require purchases. Any benefits to consumers go disproportionately to higher-income families. At the college level, attendees tend to have higher lifetime
incomes. Again, benefits to consumers go disproportionately to higher-income families. Further, given that demand for textbooks has become increasing
elastic, a significant portion of benefits goes to textbook publishers and, to a lesser extent, authors.
Nevertheless, an important group of lower-income students find textbooks prohibitively expensive. With the growth of electronic books, a better strategy
to support those students may be to provide the libraries of public colleges and universities with the resources to make electronic versions of textbooks
available for students. At a minimum, this should be happening at community colleges.
Page 262 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption for Textbooks
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.408
Exemptions For Specified Uses of Product/
TAX TYPE Services
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(m)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1968
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $10.2 - $12.2 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 – FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Available ☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Sales of textbooks and other books required for T he statute does not state the purpose of the
instructional purposes at educational tax expenditure.
i W ns h t a it t u a ti r o e n t s h a e r ep eoxleicmyp g t o fr a o ls m o s f a t l h e e s and use tax. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the States vary in their sales and use tax treatment
expenditure is to help defray the cost of course of textbooks required for courses at
materials that students are required to educational institutions. The Massachusetts
purchase for classes at educational institutions. exemption is broader than similar exemptions
in most other states. For example, Connecticut,
New York, and Rhode Island generally limit the
exemption to college-level textbooks. A
substantial number of states, including
California, Maine and Vermont do not provide
any exemption for textbooks.
Page 263 of 367

INTRODUCTION
All retail sales of tangible personal property are subject to sales and use tax unless an
exemption applies. M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(m) provides an exemption for sales of textbooks and
other books required for instructional purposes in courses offered by educational
institutions. The exemption is available without regard to the academic level of the course
and is available regardless of whether the educational institution is public or private. The
exemption also applies to purchases of textbooks used in courses at for-profit educational
institutions.
Absent the exemption afforded by this tax expenditure textbooks and other books required
for courses at educational institutions would be subject to sales and use tax when
purchased by students. Thus, the exemption marginally reduces the cost of course
materials. The revenue lost as a result of the exemption constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to help defray the cost of course
materials that students are required to purchase for classes at educational institutions.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The administration of the exemption for textbooks and other books required for courses at
educational institutions presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR).
Vendors of textbooks at the retail level are likely to have a variety of exempt and non-
exempt sales. The only way to monitor the exemption is by auditing vendors. However,
vendors are generally aware of the exemption for textbooks and take steps to collect sales
and use tax appropriately. Thus, although audits are necessary to monitor compliance with
the exemption, the DOR does not view non-compliance as a widespread problem. Vendors
should maintain adequate records to demonstrate that exempt sales were properly
classified in the case they are audited.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $10.2 - $12.2
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates
for Exemption for Textbooks
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Revenue Loss Estimates ($Million) $10.2 $10.7 $11.4 $11.7 $12.2
Page 264 of 367

The revenue loss estimates are based on national PreK-12 and higher education textbooks
1 2
sales data from the Association of American Publishers (AAP) .
National PreK-12 textbook sales were apportioned to Massachusetts using Massachusetts’
3
share of the national population (age 5-19) . Similarly, national higher education textbook
sales were apportioned to Massachusetts using Massachusetts’ share of national fall
4
enrollment in degree-granting post-secondary institutions .
Due to the use of external data and the limitations of the data for estimating this tax
expenditure, the estimates reported in the table above may have significant estimation
uncertainty and should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
Massachusetts residents (students, families, households, school districts, etc.) who buy the
exempt products and the Massachusetts residents or businesses who sell the exempt
products are the direct beneficiaries of the sales tax exemption. Buyers benefit from the
sales tax exemption in the form of paying a lower “after tax” price while sellers benefit in
the form of receiving a higher “before tax” price. The exact split of the direct benefits
depends on the interaction of demand and supply and is often difficult to quantify. Out of
state students who enroll in Massachusetts postsecondary institutions and out of state
businesses who sell textbooks in Massachusetts are also direct beneficiaries.
Based on NCES data, 468,960 students enrolled in Massachusetts degree-granting
postsecondary institutions in Fall of 2022. Based on Massachusetts Department of
5
Education’s enrollment by grade data , 914,959 students were enrolled in Pre-K through
high school in the 2023 - 24 school year.
The exact number of textbook sellers is not available. Based on the 2017 Economic Census
data, there were 194 Massachusetts bookstore establishments with a total of 2,937
employees. In 2017, these establishments had annual payroll and sales of $48.0 million
and $371.1 million, respectively.
1
Sales of digital textbooks are excluded because they would not be subject to the sales tax even without this
tax expenditure. However, online sales of textbook in print formats (paperbacks, hardbacks, mass market,
and special bindings) would be taxable without this tax expenditure.
2
https://publishers.org
3
Population data is from the U.S. Census Bureau: https://www.census.gov
4
Data on fall enrollment in the degree granting post-secondary institutions is from the Nation al Center for
Education Statistics (NCES): https://nces.ed.gov/programs/digest/d23/tables/dt23_304.10.asp
5
https://profiles.doe.mass.edu/profiles/student.aspx?orgcode=00000000&orgtypecode=0&
Page 265 of 367

Book publishers also benefit directly from this tax expenditure if selling books directly to
the final consumers such as school districts, etc. Data on textbook publishers is not
available. Based on the 2017 Economic census data, there were 92 Massachusetts book
publishing establishments with a total of 5,868 employees. In 2017, these establishments
had annual payroll and sales of $539 million and $2.7 billion, respectively.
Similarly, bookmerchant wholesalers may also benefit directly from this tax expenditure if
they sell textbooks directly to the final consumers. However, data for Massachusetts book
merchant wholesalers are not available.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
States vary in their sales and use tax treatment of textbooks required for courses at
educational institutions. The Massachusetts exemption is broader than similar exemptions
in most other states. For example, Connecticut, New York, and Rhode Island generally limit
the exemption to college level textbooks. A substantial number of states, including
California, Maine and Vermont do not provide any exemption for textbooks.
Page 266 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.412 Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and Annual cost: $352.2 - Year of adoption: 1967 Sunset date: None
Supplies Used in federal and Massachusetts Government Construction Contracts $375.1 million
and Construction Contracts with Tax Exempt Organizations
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☐ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☐ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☒ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☐ Other: ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □X □
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □X □
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers.
□ □X □ □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □X □
The TE is easily administered.
□ □ □X □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □ □X □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 267 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments: Members noted that higher education institutions are eligible for the exemption. Members noted this tax expenditure was adopted in 1967
which led to a discussion regarding the age of some Massachusetts tax expenditures. Members agreed that age could be used as a factor for deciding
which tax expenditures are flagged for legislative review. Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review.
Page 268 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
EVALUATION YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and
Supplies Used in federal and Massachusetts
Government Construction Contracts and
Construction Contracts with Tax Exempt
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Organizations
`TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.412
Exemptions For Specified Uses of Product /
TAX TYPE Services
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(f)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1967
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
Tax loss of $352.2 - $375.1 million per year
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS during FY22 – FY26.
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Availa☒ble
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts allows a sales and use tax T he statute does not state the purpose of the
exemption for the sale of building materials and tax expenditure.
supplies used by contractors in fulfilling
construction contracts with federal and
Massachusetts government entities or with
cWerhtaatin a rtaex t-hexee pmoplitc oyr ggoanailzsa otfio tnhse. Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes that the expenditure Most states that impose a sales and use tax
is intended to reduce the cost of construction allow an exemption for sales of building
projects funded by government entities and tax- materials and supplies used in construction
exempt organizations, thereby increasing the contracts with the federal government, their
Page 269 of 367

resources such entities and organizations have own state’s government and tax-exempt
available to devote to their missions. organizations. Connecticut, Maine, New York,
Rhode Island and Vermont allow such an
exemption. California allows exemption for
federal construction projects but generally
taxes building materials and supplies used in
state and local construction contracts and
contracts with tax-exempt organizations.
Page 270 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Massachusetts allows a sales and use tax exemption for the sale of building materials and
supplies used by contractors in fulfilling construction contracts with federal and
Massachusetts government entities or with corporations, foundations, organizations or
institutions that are exempt from taxation under Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3). M.G.L.
c. 64H, § 6(f). The exemption also applies to construction equipment that contractors rent
for exclusive use in such construction contracts.
For purposes of the exemption, a construction contract is an agreement that will result in
the construction, reconstruction, repair, or remodeling of certain building structures,
public highways, bridges, or other public works. Exempt building materials and supplies
include materials that will be incorporated into building structures (e.g., concrete or steel)
and supplies that will be consumed in fulfilling the contract (e.g., fuel used to operate
construction equipment). The exemption does not apply to items used by the contractor to
administer the construction contract (e.g., telecommunications services or office
equipment).
With respect to construction contracts with the federal government, Massachusetts or any
political subdivision thereof, or their respective agencies, sales of building materials and
supplies are generally exempt if the building structure, public highway, bridge or other
public works under construction is owned by or held in trust for the benefit of the
governmental entity and used exclusively for public purposes. With respect to
construction contracts with a corporation, foundation, organization or institution that is
tax-exempt under Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3), sales of building materials and
supplies are generally exempt if the building structure under construction is owned by or
held in trust for the benefit of the tax-exempt entity and used exclusively in the conduct of
its religious, scientific, charitable or educational purposes. Further, the property must be
used for the owner’s governmental or tax-exempt purposes.
Absent the exemption, sales of construction materials and supplies used by contractors in
contracts with government entities and tax-exempt organizations would be subject to sales
and use tax, increasing the cost of construction for such entities. The revenue foregone as a
result of the exemption constitutes a tax expenditure,
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes that the expenditure is intended to reduce the cost of
construction projects funded by government entities and tax-exempt organizations,
thereby increasing the resources such organizations have available to devote to their
missions.
Page 271 of 367

ADMINISTRABILITY
The exemption for building materials and supplies used in construction contracts with
government entities and tax-exempt organizations is administered through the DOR audit
function. To facilitate the exemption the DOR issues Certificates of Exemption, Forms ST-2
to exempt organizations and entities upon request. The Form ST-2 documents the
SalesTax Exempt Purchaser Certificate
organizations’ and entities’ exempt status. Furthermore, the purchasing entities must
Contractor’s Sales Tax Exempt Purchase Certificate
generally complete either a , Form ST-5, or a
, Form ST-5C and provide the forms to
vendors at the time of purchase in order to claim the exemption. However, DOR must audit
vendors and contractors to ensure that they are applying the exemption correctly.
DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be $352.2 - $375.1
million per year during FY22 - FY26. See the table below.
Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for Sales of Building Materials
and Supplies Used in Connection with Certain Construction Contracts
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Revenue Loss Estimates ($ Million) $360.4 $356.2 $352.2 $363.2 $375.1
1
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based mostly on the 2022 Economic Census
data for Massachusetts construction sector (NAICS code 23), including the cost of building
materials, fuels, and rental of construction machinery and equipment. The census data also
provides the value of construction work on government owned and private owned
2
projects. Using the Census Bureau’s Annual Capital Expenditure Survey data and the IRS’
3
Form 990 data, DOR estimated the share of construction work owned by governments and
501(c)(3) organizations, for which the cost of building materials, fuels and rental of
construction machinery and equipment is exempt from sales tax under this tax
expenditure.
Due to the use of external data and the limitations of the data, the estimates reported in the
table above may have significant estimation uncertainty and should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
This exemption directly benefits (i) federal and state government organizations and their
agencies, subdivisions, etc. a nd nonprofit entities with property in Massachusetts, (ii)
1
2
https://www.census.gov/programs-surveys/economic-census/data/tables.html
https://www.census.gov/programs-surveys/aces.html
3
https://www.irs.gov/statistics/soi-tax-stats-charities-and-other-tax-exempt-organizations-statistics
Page 272 of 367

individuals and/or businesses performing construction or contracting services for the
aforementioned entities, (iii) and (iii) vendors selling building materials in Massachusetts.
The individuals and entities benefit from the sales tax exemption in the form of paying a
lower “after tax” price and receiving a higher “before tax” price. The exact split of the direct
benefits depends on the interaction of demand and supply and is often difficult to quantify.
Out-of-state businesses selling exempt products in Massachusetts are also direct
beneficiaries.
According to the 2022 U.S. Census Bureau, Massachusetts had 21,290 construction firms.
These firms jointly employed 165,896 people, generating $14.3 billion in annual payroll
and $75.1 billion in annual sales.
In addition to the construction sector, lumber and other construction materials merchant
wholesalers including manufacturers' sales branches and offices (NAICS 4233) also benefit
from the tax exemption on the seller’s side. According to the 2022 U.S. Census Bureau,
Massachusetts had 231 lumber and other construction materials merchant wholesalers
including manufacturers' sales branches and offices. These firms jointly employed 5,027
people, generating $425.1 million in annual payroll and $6.1 billion in annual sales. Garden
equipment and supplies dealers (NAICS 444) may also benefit from this sales tax
exemption. According to the 2022 U.S. Census Bureau, Massachusetts had 1,089 firms in
this industry. These firms jointly employed 30,402 people, generating $1. 3 billion in
annual payroll and $11.6 billion in annual sales.
EVALUATION: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
Page 273 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
Most states that impose sales and use tax allow an exemption for sales of building materials
and supplies used in construction contracts with the federal government, their own state’s
government and tax-exempt organizations. Connecticut, Maine, New York. Rhode Island
and Vermont allow such an exemption. California allows exemption for federal
construction projects but generally taxes building materials and supplies used in state and
l ocal construction contracts and contracts with tax-exempt organizations.
Page 274 of 367

Template for Evaluating Expenditures
Name of Expenditure: 3.608 Exemptions for Gifts of Scientific Equipment I Annual cost: <$50K I Year of adoption: 1983 I Sunset date: None
Tax Type (check all that apply): ☒ Corporate ☐ Personal Income ☒ Sales ☐ Other
This tax expenditure is a result of state conformity to the Federal Code: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Goal of expenditure (check all that apply):
Business: Individual:
☐ Job creation & maintenance ☐ Relief of poverty
☒ Investment ☐ Progressivity/assistance to low earners
☐ Competitiveness/Strategic ☐ Access to opportunity
☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice ☐ Health/Environment/Social Justice
☒ Other: Incentivize Donations to nonprofit education ☐ Other:
Measurement and Effectiveness Ratings:
Which best reflects your opinion on each statement? Strongly disagree Somewhat disagree Somewhat agree Strongly agree
We can measure the overall benefit toward achieving the goal(s). □ □ □ □X
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by its intended beneficiaries. □ □ □ □X
The TE is claimed by a broad group of taxpayers. □ □ □X □
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer is meaningful as an incentive/benefit. □ □ X □X □
The TE is relevant today. □ □ □ □X
The TE is easily administered.
□ □X □ □
Business only
-The TE is primarily beneficial to smaller businesses. □X □ □ □
Individuals only
□ □ □ □
-The TE is primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
This tax expenditure is flagged for legislative review: ☐ Yes ☒ No
Page 275 of 367

Instructions: Please provide comments below explaining Strongly Disagree/Somewhat Disagree ratings and other considerations to be highlighted, such as
policy proposals.
Comments:
Page 276 of 367

MASSACHUSETTS TAX EXPENDITURES
EVALUATION SUMMARY
Evaluation YEAR: 2025
TAX EXPENDITURE TITLE
TAX EXPENDITURE NUMBER Exemption for Gifts of Scientific Equipment
TAX EXPENDITURE CATEGORY 3.608
TAX TYPE Miscellaneous Exemptions
LEGAL REFERENCE Sales and Use Tax
YEAR ENACTED M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(jj)
REPEAL/EXPIRATION DATE 1983
ANNUAL REVENUE IMPACT None
NUMBER OF TAXPAYERS Negligible
AVERAGE TAXPAYER BEN EFIT Not Available
FEDERAL TAX EXPENDITURE N☐o t Available☒
YES NO
Description of the Tax Expenditure: Is the purpose defined in the statute?
Massachusetts provides a sales and use tax T he statute does not state the purpose of the
exemption for donations of scientific tax expenditure.
equipment by manufacturers to non-profit
educational institutions, to the Massachusetts
Technology Park Corporation, or to the Bay
W Sta h t a e t S a k r i e ll s t h C e o rppoolriactyio g n o . als of the Are there other states with a similar Tax
expenditure? Expenditure?
The Commission assumes the goal of the The Commission is not aware of any state that
exemption is to allow manufacturers to donate has a specific exemption for donations of
scientific equipment to public and private scientific equipment. However, several states,
nonprofit educational institutions without including California, Connecticut, Maine, New
incurring sales and use tax. York, and Vermont allow broader exemptions
for donations of any tangible personal property
by vendors to tax-exempt organizations.
Page 277 of 367

INTRODUCTION
Chapter 64H, Section 2 of the Massachusetts General Laws imposes a sales tax on retail
sales of tangible personal property. A sale is defined as any transfer of title or possession
for consideration. G.L. c. 64H, § 1(12)(a). Massachusetts provides a sales and use tax
exemption for donations of scientific equipment or apparatus by manufacturers to non-
profit educational institutions, to the Massachusetts Technology Park Corporation, or to the
1
Bay State Skills Corporation. Although donations of tangible personal property are not
subject to the sales or use tax because donations are not “for consideration,” without this
exemption the sales tax would be imposed upon otherwise exempt inputs required to make
the tangible personal property. A manufacturer’s purchase of inputs such as materials,
tools, fuel, and machinery to be used in the manufacture of tangible personal property to be
sold is exempt from the sales and use tax under G.L. c. 64H, § 6(r) and (s). To claim the
exemption the manufacturer presents an exempt use certificate when purchasing the
inputs and the sales and use tax is imposed upon the subsequent sale of the manufactured
products (in this case, scientific equipment or apparatus) by the manufacturer, unless an
exemption applies. However, if after presenting the certificate, the manufacturer donates
the manufactured products instead of selling them, the manufacturer is required to pay
sales tax on the cost of the inputs for which the manufacturer previously claimed an
exemption. M.G.L. c. 64H, §§ 8 (h). See also Letter Ruling 84-62. Donation of manufactured
equipment would trigger the sales tax if not for the exemption. The revenue foregone as a
result of the exemption constitutes a tax expenditure.
POLICY GOALS
The Commission assumes the goal of the exemption is to allow manufacturers to donate
scientific equipment to public and private nonprofit educational institutions without
incurring sales and use tax.
ADMINISTRABILITY
The exemption for donations of scientific equipment presents some challenge to the
Department of Revenue (DOR) because no certificate or other documentation is required to
claim the exemption, and the recipient of the donation will be a tax-exempt entity with no
sales and use tax filing requirement. Thus, the exemption can be verified only by auditing
manufacturers.
1 M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(jj) states, in its entirety: “(jj) sales of ''scientific equipment or apparatus'' within the meaning of
section 170 (e) (4) (B) (v) of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States as amended on January first, nineteen
hundred and eighty-three, by the manufacturer when such scientific equipment or apparatus is donated by said
manufacturer at no charge to a public or private nonprofit educational institution located in the commonwealth or to
the Massachusetts Technology Park Corporation for the purposes of clause (4) of paragraph (b) of section six of
chapter forty J, or to the Bay State Skills Corporation.”
Page 278 of 367

DIRECT COSTS
The revenue loss resulting from this tax expenditure is estimated to be negligible per year
during FY22 - FY26. See Table 1 below.
Table 1. Tax Revenue Loss Estimates for Exemption for
Gifts of Scientific Equipment
Fiscal Year 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026
Revenue Loss Estimates ($ Million) Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible Negligible
Note: "Negligible" means that the estimate is less than $50,000 but greater than zero.
2
Massachusetts’ revenue loss estimates are based mostly on the 2022 Economic Census
data for Massachusetts’ manufacturing sector (NAICS code 31-33). DOR selected a subset
of this sector that potentially donate scientific equipment to educational institutions for
3
research and experiment in physical or biological sciences. A list of manufacturing
4
industries in this subset is included in the Appendix at the end of this report. Economic
Census data included sales and inputs, such as materials, fuel, tools, and machinery, used in
production. DOR estimated the dollar amount of inputs that are potentially eligible for
exemption under this tax expenditure.
IndustryWeek reported that manufacturers generally give less than 1% (0.08%) of their
5 6
total revenue in donations in 2014. According to Giving USA, 3.4% of all contributions
went to the education sector. Applying these shares and sales tax rate to the estimated
dollar amount of inputs potentially eligible for this tax expenditure, DOR estimated the
revenue loss to be less than $50,000 per year.
Due to the use of external data and the limitations of the data for estimating this tax
expenditure, the estimates reported in the table above may have very significant estimation
uncertainty and should be used with caution.
DIRECT BENEFITS
The direct beneficiaries of this tax expenditure are the public and private nonprofit
educational institutions located in Massachusetts and their students, the Massachusetts
Technology Park Corporatio n, and the Bay State Skills Corporation, as well as
2
3
https://www.census.gov/programs-surveys/economic-census/data/tables.html
See IRC 170 (e)(4)(B)(v)
4
Given that “scientific equipment or apparatus” refers to a diverse array of tools and equipment used in
scientific settings to conduct experiments, collect data, and analyze results, this list is very likely not
exhaustive. On the other hand, these industries also produce a lot of equipment and apparatus that are
usually not used in scientific research and experiment.
5
https://www.industryweek.com/leadership/companies-executives/media-gallery/21964346/giving-back-
8-of-the-most-charitable-us-manufacturers
6
https://givingusa.org/giving-usa-limited-data-tableau-visualization/
Page 279 of 367

manufacturers making such donations. However, given that tax saving resulting from this
tax expenditure is negligible, these beneficiaries (further described below) hardly benefit
from this tax expenditure if any.
Based on the 2022 Economic Census, DOR assumed 16 possible manufacturing industries
that could have donated scientific equipment or apparatus to educational institutions in
2022. These 16 manufacturing industries had 259 firms and jointly employed 19,899
people, generating $2.5 billion in annual payroll and $9.7 billion in annual sales in 2022.
Please note that this list may not be exhaustive.
All the public and private non-profit education institutions in Massachusetts are potential
7
beneficiaries of this tax exemption. According to the Massachusetts Colleges Statistics , for
the academic year 2023 - 24, 151 colleges and universities are active in Massachusetts - 42
public, 77 not-for-profit private, and 32 for-profit private schools. By school level, 88 four-
year or higher schools, 22 two to four-year community colleges, and 41 two-year trade
schools. In the 2023-2024 school year, according to the Massachusetts Department of
8
Elementary and Secondary Education, Massachusetts had 398 school districts , 1,826
9
elementary and secondary schools and 914,959 enrolled students .
Evaluation: COMPARING COSTS AND BENEFITS
In the previous sections, we report the direct costs (to the Commonwealth, or to the
residents and businesses who ultimately bear the costs when the Commonwealth cuts
government spending or increases taxes to finance the tax expenditure) and direct benefits
of this tax expenditure. In this instance, the direct costs to the Commonwealth, namely the
tax revenue that would have been collected, are equal to the direct benefits afforded by the
tax expenditure to taxpayers.
Furthermore, there may be indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with this
expenditure. To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often need to
utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN
(Impact Analysis for Planning) models. DOR did not use such models given their
complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
7 8 https://www.doe.mass.edu/InfoServices/reports/enroll/2024/district-grade.xlsx
9 hhttttppss::///w/wwww.wdo.uen.mivasstsa.etsd.uco/Imnf/osSteartveisc/ems/raespsoarcths/uesnerottlsl//2 024/school-grade.xlsx
Page 280 of 367

SIMILAR TAX EXPENDITURES OFFERED BY OTHER STATES
The Commission is not aware of any state that has a specific exemption for donations of
scientific equipment. However, several states, including California, Connecticut, Maine,
New York, and Vermont allow broader exemptions for donations of any tangible personal
property by vendors to tax-exempt organizations.
Page 281 of 367

APPENDIX
List of Manufacturing Industries Potentially Gifting Scientific Equipment to Non-
Profit Educational Institutions in Massachusetts *
Total Sales
2022 Annual
Number Number of or
NAICS Meaning of NAICS code Year Payroll Employment
of Firms Establishments Revenue
code (mil. of $)
(mil. of $)
327215 Glass Product Manufacturing Made of Purchased Glass 2022 27 28 99 28 489
332216 Saw Blade and Handtool Manufacturing 2022 19 19 D 86 1,487
332410 Power Boiler and Heat Exchanger Manufacturing 2022 3 3 128 41 512
333310 Commercial and Service Industry Machinery Manufacturing 2022 56 59I 885 235 2,952
333415 Air-conditioning and warm air heating equipment and 2022 13 13 !I 314 80 1,138
commercial and industrial refrigeration equipment i
manufacturing i
333991 Power-Driven Handtool Manufacturing 2022 4 4I 31 8 116
333998 All Other Miscellaneous General Purpose Machinery 2022 39 39I 1,239 303 2,886
Manufacturing
334111 Electronic Computer Manufacturing 2022 9 9 498 39 435
334112 Computer Storage Device Manufacturing 2022 4 4 D D 250 to 499 employees
334118 Computer Terminal and Other Computer Peripheral Equipment 2022 11 11 D D 100 to 249 employees
Manufacturing
334513 Instruments and related products manufacturing for measuring, 2022 40 41i 1,060 267 1,915
displaying, and controlling industrial process variables
334514 Totalizing fluid meter and counting device manufacturing 2022 5 5 27 5 94
334515 Instrument manufacturing for measuring and testing electricity 2022 35 36 471 138 1,308
and electrical systems
334516 Analytical laboratory instrument manufacturing 2022 67 72 3,304 918 9,010
334517 Irradiation apparatus manufacturing 2022 12 12 822 174 1,744
Total 259 269 9,681 2,508 19,899
334519 Other measuring and controlling device manufacturing 2022 38 40 803 187 2,202
Source: The U.S. Census Bureau, 2022 Economic Census
* The list of the industries may not be exhaustive.
D Withheld to avoid disclosing data for individual companies; data are included in higher level totals.
Page 282 of 367

Appendix E
Tax Expenditure Review
Commission Meeting Minutes
Page 283 of 367

Tax Expenditure Review Commission Meeting
Wednesday, April 24, 2024
1:00 PM
Via Zoom
Commission Members in Attendance:
Chairperson Rebecca Forter, MA Department of Revenue
Sue Perez, Designee, MA Treasurer
Amar Patel, Designee, Senate Ways and Means Committee
Eli Roerden, Designee, House Minority Leader
Chris Carlozzi, Designee, Senate Minority Leader
Professor Michelle Hanlon, Governor’s Appointee
Lindsay Janeczek, Designee, MA Auditor
Professor Matthew Weinzierl, Governor’s Appointee
Stephen Maher, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, Senate Co-Chair
Commission Members Absent:
Tim Sheridan, Designee, House Ways and Means Committee
Ryan Sterling, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, House Co-Chair
List of Documents:
I. Meeting Agenda
II. Draft Minutes
i. February 28, 2024 Meeting
III. TERC 2024 Final Report
IV. Presentation of April tax expenditure evaluation ratings, discuss and vote on ratings
i. 1.031 & 1.422 Health Savings Accounts (exemption & deduction)
ii. 1.040 & 1.420 Archer Medical Savings Accounts (exemption & deduction)
iii. 1.007 Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits
iv. 1.009 Exemption of Social Security Benefits
v. 1.011 Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses
vi. 1.013 Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners
vii. 1.028 Exemption of Income Received by Persons Killed in Military Action
or Terrorist Activity
Chairperson Forter welcomed Commission members. Members were asked to announce
themselves and a quorum was recognized by Chairperson Forter. The meeting via teleconference was
called to order at 1:05AM. Chairperson Forter put the Commission and public on notice that the meeting
is recorded for the purpose of minutes. The recording of the meeting will be kept for public record.
Chairperson Forter asked for any comments or changes on the February 28, 2024 draft meeting
minutes. Members did not provide any comment. Members voted to approve the February `24 meeting
minutes as drafted. The meeting minutes will be posted to the TERC website.
Page 284 of 367

Chairperson Forter provided a brief overview of the updates made to the draft TERC 2024 Report.
Updates to the report are outlined in the February `24 meeting minutes. Members voted to approve the
TERC 2024 Final Report as presented. Chairperson Forter noted that the report will be submitted to the
Legislature and posted to the TERC website following this meeting.
Professor Michelle Hanlon led a discussion on the Exemption and Deduction of Health Savings
Accounts. This tax expenditure was adopted in 2005 and has an annual revenue impact of $36.0 - $68.5
million during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income
and Massachusetts’ adoption of the deductions included in Code § 62, eligible contributions to, earnings
in, and qualified distributions from health savings accounts (HSAs) are not subject to the personal income
tax. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 223, which sets out the federal tax treatment of HSAs.
Code § 223 allows employees a deduction for eligible contributions to an HSA. Employer contributions
may be excluded from employee income under Code § 106. (The exclusion for employer contributions is
described in Tax Expenditure Report 1.004). In addition, Code § 223 allows earnings to accumulate in an
HSA free of tax. Code § 223 also allows an exclusion from income for qualified distributions.
Massachusetts adopts Code § 223 as currently in effect. An HSA is a tax-exempt trust created for the
purpose of paying a taxpayer’s qualified medical expenses. An HSA may receive cash contributions from
the taxpayer or any other person (e.g., a family member or employer) on behalf of the taxpayer.
Contributions other than those from an employer may be deductible from the taxpayer’s gross income.
States that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exemption, deduction, or exclusion
for eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from HSAs, unless they have
specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and
Vermont follow the federal treatment of HSAs. California has decoupled from the federal treatment and
taxes both employee and employer contributions to HSAs.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize individuals with high deductible
health care plans to save for medical expenses that they may incur before meeting their plan’s annual
deductible.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption and Deduction of Health Savings
Accounts as presented.
Professor Matt Weinzierl led a discussion on the Exemption and Deduction of Archer Medical
Savings Accounts. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1998 and has an annual revenue impact of $0.09 -
$0.18 million during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income,
and Massachusetts’ adoption of the deductions included in Code § 62, eligible contributions to, earnings
in, and qualified distributions from Archer medical savings accounts (Archer MSAs) are not subject to the
personal income tax. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 220 as in effect for the 2022 tax year,
which sets out the federal tax treatment of Archer MSAs. Archer MSAs have largely been discontinued
and replaced by health savings accounts (HSAs) (the expenditures for HSAs are described in Tax
Expenditure Reports 1.031 and 1.422). New Archer MSAs generally cannot be created. As such, the only
Page 285 of 367

taxpayers with Archer MSAs are taxpayers with legacy Archer MSAs, and taxpayers working for legacy
Archer MSA employers. For those taxpayers, eligible contributions are deductible, earnings accumulate
free of tax, and income from qualified distributions is excluded. An Archer MSA is a tax-exempt trust
created for the purpose of paying a taxpayer’s qualified medical expenses. An Archer MSA can only be
created for taxpayers who are self-employed or work for a small employer, and the spouses of such
taxpayers. In any given year, an Archer MSA may receive cash contributions from either the taxpayer or
the taxpayer’s employer.
States that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exemption, deduction, or exclusion
for eligible contributions to, earnings in, and qualified distributions from Archer MSAs, unless they have
specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode
Island, and Vermont follow the federal treatment of Archer MSAs.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize eligible individuals with high
deductible health care plans to save for medical expenses that they may incur before meeting their plan’s
annual deductible.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption and Deduction of Archer Medical
Savings Accounts as presented.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1985 and has an annual revenue impact of $1.4 - $1.6 million during FY22 –
FY26 with no sunset date.
Railroad Retirement benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income for personal income tax
purposes. Railroad retirement benefits are paid in two parts: Tier 1, which is analogous to Social Security,
and Tier 2, which is analogous to a pension plan. Neither Tier 1 nor Tier 2 benefits are included in
Massachusetts gross income. The Massachusetts exclusion for Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits is
effectuated by a modification to federal gross income, upon which the personal income tax is generally
based. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(H). A portion of Tier 1 benefits is included in federal gross income if the
recipient’s income exceeds certain levels set out in Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 86. Note that the
inclusion rule under Code § 86 applies to both Social Security and Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits. Up
to 85% of Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits may be includable in federal gross income under the Code.
Due to the Massachusetts modification, Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits are excluded from
Massachusetts gross income entirely. The Massachusetts exclusion for Tier 2 Railroad Retirement benefits
is the result of a federal law prohibiting states from taxing such benefits. See 45 USC, § 231m. Because
the exemption for Tier 2 Railroad Retirement benefits is not the result of any Massachusetts general or
special law, it is not considered a tax expenditure and therefore is not evaluated in this report. Railroad
Retirement benefits are generally paid to retired railroad workers and their spouses, surviving dependents
of deceased railroad workers, and disabled railroad workers. In the absence of the exclusion, such
recipients would be required to include Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits in their Massachusetts gross
income to the same extent that the benefits are included in federal gross income. The personal income
tax revenue forgone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a Massachusetts tax expenditure.
Page 286 of 367

Most states allow an exclusion or exemption for the full amount of Tier 1 Railroad Retirement benefits, as
Massachusetts does. States that do so include California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island,
and Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax expenditure is to provide tax relief to recipients of Railroad
Retirement benefits, who include retired railroad workers and their spouses, surviving dependents of
deceased railroad workers, and disabled railroad workers.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for Railroad Retirement Benefits as presented.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption of Social Security Benefits. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1985 and has an annual revenue impact of $483.7 - $660.5 million during
FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Social Security benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income for personal income tax purposes.
See M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(H). The exclusion is effectuated by a modification to federal gross income, upon
which the personal income tax is generally based. A portion of such benefits is included in federal gross
income if the recipient’s income exceeds certain levels set out in Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 86. Up
to 85% of Social Security benefits may be includable in federal gross income under the Code. Due to the
Massachusetts modification, Social Security benefits are excluded from Massachusetts gross income
entirely. The tax expenditure covered in this report is the exclusion of the amount of Social Security
benefits that is otherwise includable in federal gross income, not the amount that is excluded for federal
purposes. Social Security benefits are generally paid to retired workers and their spouses, surviving
dependents of deceased workers, and disabled workers. In the absence of the exclusion, such recipients
would be required to include Social Security benefits in their Massachusetts gross income to the same
extent that the benefits are included in federal gross income. The personal income tax revenue forgone
as a result of the exclusion constitutes a Massachusetts tax expenditure.
Most states allow an exclusion or exemption for the entire amount of Social Security benefits. States that
do so include California, Maine, and New York. Other states exclude or exempt all or a portion of Social
Security benefits only if the taxpayer’s income is under a particular threshold. States that adopt this
limited approach include Connecticut, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the tax expenditure is to provide tax relief to recipients of Social
Security benefits, who include retired workers and their spouses, surviving dependents of deceased
workers, and disabled workers.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Social Security Benefits as
presented.
Amar Patel led a discussion on the Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses. This tax expenditure
was adopted in 1981 and has an annual revenue impact of $5.0 - $5.7 million during FY22 – FY26 with no
sunset date.
Page 287 of 367

Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income,
dependent care assistance provided by employers to employees is excluded from Massachusetts gross
income for personal income tax purposes. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 129, which excludes
dependent care assistance from employees’ gross income. Dependent care assistance consists of the
value of an employer’s provision of, or payment for, the care of employees’ qualifying dependents, which
enables those employees to work. Qualifying dependents include dependent children under the age of
thirteen, certain disabled dependents, and certain disabled spouses. For the exclusion to apply, the
dependent care assistance must be paid pursuant to a plan that meets the administrative requirements
set out in the Code. The amount of the exclusion under Code § 129 may not exceed $5,000 ($2,500 for
married filing separately) during a taxable year. Further, the amount excluded may not exceed the earned
income of the employee or, if the employee is married, the lesser of the earned income of the employee
or the spouse for the taxable year. In the absence of the exclusion, employees would be required to pay
Massachusetts personal income tax on amounts they receive from their employers as dependent care
assistance. Personal income tax revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a tax
expenditure.
All states that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exclusion for dependent care
assistance unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code with regard to the exclusion. The
Commission is not aware of any states that have decoupled. The actual amount of the exclusion in each
state may vary depending on the Code conformity date in that state.
The Commission assumes that the goal of the expenditure is to help taxpayers defray the cost of
dependent care so that they are better able to maintain their employment while caring for a dependent.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses as
presented.
Chris Carlozzi led a discussion on the Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1972 and has an annual revenue impact of less than $50,000 during FY22 –
FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income,
amounts received by coal miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung
disease are excluded from Massachusetts gross income. Such compensation is payable under the federal
Black Lung Benefits Act of 1972. Code § 104 provides that gross income does not include “amounts
received under workman’s compensation acts as compensation for personal injuries or sickness.” In
Revenue Ruling 72-400, the Internal Revenue Service ruled that compensation received by coal miners or
their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung disease is excludable from gross
income under Code § 104(a)(1). Note that the general exclusion for workers’ compensation benefits is a
separate tax expenditure (see tax expenditure number 1.010). In the absence of the exclusion, amounts
paid to coal miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung disease
would be subject to personal income tax. The revenue foregone as a result of the exclusion constitutes a
tax expenditure. All states that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exclusion for
amounts paid to coal miners or their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung
Page 288 of 367

disease, unless they decouple from the Code with regard to the exclusion. The Commission is not aware
of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to prevent the amounts paid to coal miners or
their survivors as compensation for disability or death from black lung disease from being diminished by
subjecting the compensation to income tax.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses as
presented.
Amar Patel led a discussion on the Exemption of Income Received by Persons Killed in Military
Action or Terrorist Activity. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1988 for deaths in active military service;
2002 for deaths related to certain terrorist acts and has an annual revenue impact of less than $50,000
during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Certain individuals that died as a result of injuries sustained in (i) military service in a combat zone, (ii)
military or civilian service in a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii) specified terrorist attacks on
civilians are exempted from the Massachusetts personal income tax, subject to certain limitations. M.G.L.
c. 62, § 25. Section 25 is a Massachusetts-specific exemption, but it generally follows the same rules and
definitions as are used in a similar federal exemption set out in Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 692. See
Technical Information Release (TIR) 02-19. The Massachusetts and federal exemptions from personal
income tax apply only to eligible tax years. For deaths resulting from injuries sustained in military service
in a combat zone, eligible tax years are the tax year in which the death occurred and all immediately
preceding tax years starting with the tax year in which the decedent first served in the combat zone.
M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(b); Code § 692(a). For other deaths, the exemption applies to the year of death and all
immediately preceding tax years starting with the year immediately preceding the year the injury
occurred. M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(b); Code § 692(c), (d). Note that the exemption for civilian victims of terrorist
attacks who were not employees of the United States applies only to individuals who died: (i) of wounds
or injury incurred as a result of the terrorist attacks against the United States on April 19, 1995, or
September 11, 2001, or (ii) of illness incurred as a result of an attack involving anthrax occurring on or
after September 11, 2001 and before January 1, 2002. Combat zones are designated by the President by
Executive Order. A military action is defined as any military action involving the US armed forces and
resulting from violence or aggression against the US or any of its allies (or threat thereof). See M.G.L. c.
62, § 25(b), referring to Code § 692(c)(2)(B). Terrorist attacks are limited to the Oklahoma City bombing of
April 1995, the World Trade Center attack of September 2001, and attacks involving anthrax occurring on
or after September 11, 2001, and before January 1, 2002. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 25(c)(4); 26 USC, see also
Code § 692(d)(4). In the absence of the exemption, individuals who die as a result of service in combat
zones, military actions, or specified terrorist attacks would be required to pay Massachusetts personal
income tax on all of their income. The revenue foregone as a result of the exemption constitutes a tax
expenditure.
Many states provide a similar exemption from income taxes, including California, Connecticut, Maine, New
York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. The Commission is not aware of any state without a similar exemption.
Page 289 of 367

The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to provide tax relief to the families of taxpayers
that die as a result of injuries sustained in (i) military service in a combat zone, (ii) military or civilian
service in a military action or terrorist attack, or (iii) specified terrorist attacks.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Income Received by Persons
Killed in Military Action or Terrorist Activity as presented.
Chairperson Forter noted that Professor Michelle Hanlon’s and Professor Matthew Weinzierl’s
terms are set to expire after this meeting. Chairperson Forter thanked Professor Michelle Hanlon and
Professor Matthew Weinzierl for serving the Commission. Michelle and Matt helped lay the groundwork
for how we evaluate tax expenditures have made significant contributions to the Commission over the
past 4 years. The Commissoin is appreciative of the collaborative spirit and generosity displayed by
Michelle and Matt. Michelle and Matt’s support in this endeavor speaks volumes about the teamwork
and collaboration that are at the core of our Commission's success. Michelle and Matt brought a wealth
of knowledge, skills, and experience to the table. Their dedication and enthusiasm were evident.
Chairperson Forter mentioned that the Governor’s Office is working on appointing new members.
Members agreed to schedule the next meeting for May/June. The purpose of the next meeting is to
review the next batch of tax expenditures. Chairperson Forter concluded the meeting at 1:53 PM.
Page 290 of 367

Tax Expenditure Review Commission Meeting
Wednesday, June 26, 2024
1:00 PM
Via Zoom
Commission Members in Attendance:
• Chairperson Rebecca Forter, MA Department of Revenue
• Chris Carlozzi, Designee, Senate Minority Leader
• Eli Roerden, Designee, House Minority Leader
• Lindsay Janeczek, Designee, MA Auditor
• Stephen Maher, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, Senate Co-Chair
• Professor Natasha Varyani, Governor’s Appointee
• Professor Thomas Downes, Governor’s Appointee
Commission Members Absent:
• Amar Patel, Designee, Senate Ways and Means Committee
• Tim Sheridan, Designee, House Ways and Means Committee
• Ryan Sterling, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, House Co-Chair
• Sue Perez, Designee, MA Treasurer
List of Documents:
• Meeting Agenda
• Draft Minutes
• April 24, 2024 Meeting
• Presentation of June tax expenditure evaluation ratings, discuss and vote on ratings
• 1.026 Exemption of Military Disability Pensions
• 1.027 Exemption of Compensation to Massachusetts-Based Nonresident Military
Personnel
• 1.419 Business Exp of National Guard and Reserve Members
• 1.033 Employer-Provided Education Assistance
• 1.407 Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 or Over
• 3.002 Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth
• 3.107 Exemption for the American Flag
Meeting Minutes:
Chairperson Forter welcomed Commission members, and a quorum was recognized. The meeting
via teleconference was called to order at 1:05 PM. Chairperson Forter put the Commission and public on
notice that the meeting is recorded for the purpose of minutes. The recording of the meeting will be kept
for public record.
Page 291 of 367

Chairperson Forter noted changes in membership. Two new members were appointed by the
Governor’s office, Professor Natasha Varyani and Professor Thomas Downes. Varyani is a professor of law
at Roger Williams University School of Law and Downes is a professor of economics at Tufts University.
Appointment letters are attached at the end of this document. Chairperson Forter asked all members to
introduce themselves.
Chairperson Forter asked for any comments or changes on the April 24, 2024, draft meeting
minutes. Members did not provide any comment. Members voted to approve the April ‘24 meeting
minutes as drafted. The meeting minutes will be posted to the TERC website.
Chairperson Forter provided a brief overview of the Commission’s review process for the benefit
of its newest members. Chairperson Forter explained that the Commission’s goal is to flag expenditures
that are determined to be problematic for various reasons, whether administrative or based on relevancy
or other considerations. Chairperson Forter noted that this year marks the fifth year of the Commission’s
first evaluation cycle.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption of Military Disability Pensions. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1971 and has an annual revenue impact of $ 0.6 - 0.8 million during FY22 -
FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, amounts received as military disability pensions are excluded from gross income. Massachusetts
adopts federal gross income as the starting point for determining income subject to the personal income
tax. Massachusetts uses the definition of federal gross income as determined under the Internal Revenue
Code (Code) as it appeared on January 1, 2022. As a result, Massachusetts adopts the federal income
exclusion for “amounts received as a pension, annuity, or similar allowance for personal injuries or
sickness resulting from active service in the armed forces or as a result of certain terrorist attacks.” See
Code §§ 104(a)(4),(5) (b). To qualify for the exclusion under Code §§ 104(a)(4), a payment generally must
be made because of a combat-related injury. This report refers to payments that are excludable from
federal and Massachusetts income under Code § 104 as military disability pensions. The revenue
foregone by not taxing these amounts constitutes a tax expenditure.
All states that impose an income tax adopt the exclusion for military disability pensions unless they
decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
States that adopt the exclusion include California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and
Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to prevent amounts received as military disability
pensions from being diminished by subjecting them to income tax.
The administration of the exclusion for military disability retirement income does not present special
challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal exclusion based on the 2022 Code simplifies tax
Page 292 of 367

compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers. Note, however, that changes to the federal rules in the
future could complicate administration of the exclusion if Massachusetts law is not updated to conform
to those changes.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Military Disability Pensions as
presented.
Professor Thomas Downs led a discussion on the Exemption of Compensation to MA-Based
Nonresident Military Personnel. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1973 and has an annual revenue
impact of $10.6 - $12.8 million during FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Nonresident servicemembers are not subject to personal income tax on compensation for active-duty
military service, even if the service is performed in Massachusetts. In general, nonresidents are subject to
personal income tax on income from Massachusetts sources, including employment in the
Commonwealth. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(a). However, Massachusetts provides an exception to the general
rule with regard to compensation received by nonresidents for active-duty military service. The exception
is implemented by M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c), which deems such compensation “to be from sources other than
sources within the Commonwealth.” Further, days spent in the Commonwealth while on active duty in
the Armed Forces of the United States do not count toward the183-day residency rule. See M.G.L c. 62, §
1(f).
Note that federal law imposes the same rule as M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c) by providing that compensation for
active-duty military service may not be sourced to a state in which a nonresident servicemember is
serving in compliance with military orders. See 50 U.S.C.A. § 4001(b). The federal exemption also applies
to certain income earned by spouses of nonresident servicemembers. See 50 U.S.C.A. § 4001(c).
Massachusetts follows the federal exemption for military spouses even though spouses are not
referenced in M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c). The federal exemption, including for military spouses, applies
regardless of whether Massachusetts imposes its own exemption under M.G.L. c. 62, § 5A(c).
Personal income tax revenue foregone as a result of exempting nonresident servicemembers’ military
compensation constitutes a tax expenditure.
Most states exempt nonresident servicemembers’ military compensation from income tax. However,
even if a state does not explicitly do so by statute, federal law imposes such an exemption.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to ensure that nonresident servicemembers do
not become subject to personal income tax by reason of their assignments to military posts in
Massachusetts.
Page 293 of 367

The administration of the exemption for nonresident servicemembers’ military compensation presents
some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR). Such compensation is taxable if received by
resident service members. Thus, to monitor eligibility for the exemption the DOR must distinguish
between resident and nonresident servicemembers. Residency is a fact-intensive determination, which
requires a case-by-case analysis.
Administration is relatively simple for nonresident servicemembers as they are not required to provide
any documentation of their residency status to the DOR in order to claim the exemption and are not
required to file returns reporting exempt income. Nonresident servicemembers are required to provide
such information if they are subjected to an audit.
Of note in the discussion is the distinction that the exemption applies to the personnel and to their
spouses in the Commonwealth, even where language does not explicitly state so. Additionally, discussion
took place regarding whether this is, in fact, a tax expenditure. The Commission agreed that this may be
an issue that merits revisiting. These notes were added to the comment section of the evaluation
template.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Compensation to MA-Based
Nonresident Military Personnel as presented.
Stephen Maher led a discussion on the Deduction for Business Expenses of National Guard and
Reserve Members. This tax expenditure was adopted in 2003 and has an annual revenue impact of $1.5 -
$1.6 million during the FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for determining employee business
expense deductions, Massachusetts allows a personal income tax deduction for travel expenses incurred
by National Guard and Armed Forces reserve members who must travel more than 100 miles from their
homes to their assigned posts. The Massachusetts deduction is effectuated by M.G.L. c. 62, § 2(d)(1),
which adopts the federal deductions allowable under Code § 62 that “consist of expenses of travel, meals
and lodging while away from home, or expenses of transportation paid or incurred by the taxpayer in
connection with the performance by him of services as an employee.” Code § 62(a)(2)(E) allows members
of the National Guard and Armed Forces reserve to deduct expenses that are incurred in connection with
military services performed more than 100 miles away from home. The amount of the deduction is
limited to (i) the regular federal per diem rate for lodging, meals, and incidental expenses and (ii) the
standard federal mileage rate for car expenses, plus any parking fees, ferry fees, and tolls. The deduction
is allowed only if (i) the taxpayer is not reimbursed for such expenses or (ii) the taxpayer is reimbursed and
the reimbursement is reported as wages on the taxpayer’s W-2. National Guard and Armed Forces
reserve members are not required to itemize deductions in order to claim the federal or Massachusetts
deduction. Revenue that is lost as a result of the deduction constitutes a tax expenditure.
Page 294 of 367

States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal deduction for
business expenses of National Guard and Armed Forces reserve members, unless they decouple from the
Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to defray National Guard and Armed Forces
reserve members’ cost of travelling to their assigned posts.
The administration of the deduction for qualifying expenses incurred by National Guard and Armed Forces
reserve members does not present any special challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR).
Adoption of the federal deduction simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same
general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Deduction for Business Expenses of National
Guard and Reserve Members as presented.
Christopher Carlozzi led a discussion on the Employer-Provided Education Assistance. This tax
expenditure was conformed to since 1998 and has an annual revenue impact of $13.7 - $14.8 million
during the FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Massachusetts adopts the Internal Revenue Code (Code) definition of gross income as it appears in the
Code as of January 1, 2022 for personal income tax purposes. Under the 2022 Code, certain amounts
paid by an employer for employee education or training are excluded from employee gross income.
Specifically, under Code § 127, employees can annually exclude up to $5,250 of employer payments made
pursuant to an “educational assistance program.” Code § 127(a). An “educational assistance program” is
a written plan created by an employer to provide employees with educational assistance. Code §
127(b)(1). The plan must meet various non-discrimination requirements. Code § 127(b)(2). Employer
assistance may include payments for an employee’s tuition, fees, textbooks, or other similar expenses. It
may also include payments towards an employee’s qualified student loan principal or interest after March
27, 2020 and before 2026. Employer assistance does not include payments for lodging, meals,
transportation, tools, or supplies. An employee’s education or training does not need to be related to
their employment unless the education or training pertains to sports, games, or hobbies. Code §
127(c)(1).
Code § 132(j)(8) supplements Code § 127 by allowing employees to exclude employer-provided education
assistance that is not covered by Code § 127 (e.g., assistance above $5,250 or assistance unrelated to an
educational assistance plan.). The § 132(j)(8) exclusion is only available if the education assistance benefit
constitutes a “working condition fringe.” In this context, the term “working condition fringe” means an
employer-provided benefit that the employee would be allowed to deduct as a trade or business expense
under Code § 162 if the employee had paid for the benefit directly. Note that employees cannot claim a
tax deduction or credit for amounts excluded under Code §§ 127 or 132(j)(8).
Because of the Commonwealth’s reliance on the Code for purposes of determining income, employer-
provided education assistance is not included in employee gross income for Massachusetts tax purposes.
The revenue lost by not taxing these amounts constitutes a tax expenditure.
Page 295 of 367

All states that impose an income tax adopt the federal exclusion for employer-provided education and
training assistance unless they decouple from the Code in that regard. States that adopt the federal
exclusion include Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. California has its own state-
specific exclusion for education and training assistance.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage employees to take advantage of
employer-provided education and training assistance programs. The Commission agreed to add
comments to the form to ensure that the benefit incurred by employers is made clear alongside the
benefit to the employees.
The administration of the exclusion for employer-provided education assistance does not present special
challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal exclusion based on the 2022 Code simplifies tax
compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers. Note, however, that changes to the federal rules in the future
could complicate administration of the exclusion, if Massachusetts law does not conform to those
changes.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Employer-Provided Education Assistance as
presented.
Christopher Carlozzi led a discussion on the Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 - 23. This
tax expenditure was adopted in 1986 and has an annual revenue impact of $10 - $10.6 million during
FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Massachusetts provides a personal income tax exemption for each of a taxpayer’s dependents, as
determined under Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 151(c). See M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(b)(3). The exemption
allows taxpayers to reduce their taxable income by $1,000 for each dependent. The Code’s definition of a
dependent includes qualifying children and qualifying relatives. See Code § 152(a). Qualifying children
generally include a taxpayer’s children (or certain specified close relatives) who are under the age of 19
and meet certain other requirements. However, qualifying children also include a taxpayers’ children
(including specified close relatives) that are full-time students under the age of 24, so long as they
otherwise meet the definition of qualifying children. A qualifying relative is a relative (or non-relative that
lives with the taxpayer) for whom the taxpayer provides more than half the support and who is not a
qualifying child. See Code § 152(d).
The dependent exemption for qualifying children under 19 and qualifying relatives is not considered a tax
expenditure for purposes of the Massachusetts Tax Expenditure Budget. This is because the tax
expenditure analysis considers the family unit to be the basis of analysis. Taxpayers are assumed to have
an obligation to support children and qualifying relatives under 19 and the exemption is not considered to
be a special benefit for doing so. However, individuals aged 19 and over are assumed to be capable of
supporting themselves, so the exemption applies to older children and qualifying relatives only if they are
full-time students between the ages of 19 and 23. The exemption for such children and qualifying
Page 296 of 367

relatives is considered a tax expenditure equal to the amount of personal income tax foregone as a result
of allowing the exemption for such dependents
Most states that impose a personal income tax allow exemptions for dependent children who are full-time
students between the ages of 19 and 23, including New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. California and
Maine allow credits for such dependents rather than exemptions. Connecticut does not allow an
exemption for dependents of any age.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to allow taxpayers to continue claiming
dependent exemptions for children over 18 and under 24 who are pursuing higher education.
The administration of this exclusion does not present special challenges for the Department of Revenue
(DOR). Conformity with federal age requirements for dependents simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and
federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for
taxpayers.
The Commission made note, with special attention from Professor Varyani, to keep in mind the changing
demographics of the Commonwealth and the significant cost this may incur for the state. Members
added this note to the comment section of the evaluation template
Members voted to approve the evaluation template of Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 – 23 as
presented.
Lindsay Janeczek led a discussion on the Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1967 and has an annual revenue impact of $96.0-119.2 million during FY22 -
FY26 with no sunset date.
All retail sales of tangible personal property are subject to sales and use tax unless an exemption applies.
M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(d) provides an exemption for sales to the Commonwealth, its agencies and political
subdivisions. The exemption does not apply to sales to other states.
The Massachusetts sales tax and complementary use tax is a transaction tax that applies to retail sales of
tangible personal property, including prewritten computer software regardless of mode of transfer, and
telecommunication services. A retail sale is any sale other than a sale for resale. A sale for resale occurs
when a business purchases an item and sells it to a third party in substantially the same form in which it
was purchased. All retail sales are taxable unless an exemption applies. These exemptions are tax
expenditures because they prevent the imposition of tax on transactions that would otherwise be taxable.
Absent the exemption afforded by this tax expenditure, sales to the Commonwealth, its agencies and
political subdivisions would be subject to sales and use tax, increasing the cost of government operations.
Most states that impose a sales and use tax provide an exemption for sales to the state and its agencies.
Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont have such an exemption. California does not
have such an exemption but allows government organizations to apply for refunds of sales tax paid on
certain purchases.
Page 297 of 367

The Commission assumes that the expenditure is intended to reduce the expenses of the Commonwealth,
its agencies and political subdivisions, thereby increasing the resources such government organizations
have available to devote to their missions.
Administration of the exemption for sales to the Commonwealth, its agencies and political subdivisions
does not present any special challenge to taxpayers or the Department of Revenue (DOR). To claim the
exemption government organizations must present exemption certificates to vendors. The DOR monitors
the exemption when it audits vendors as part of its sales and use tax audit function.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption for Sales in the Commonwealth as
presented.
Professor Varyani led a discussion on the Exemption for the American Flag. This tax expenditure
was adopted in 1968 and has an annual revenue impact of $1.0 - $1.5 million during FY22 - FY26 with no
sunset date.
All retail sales of tangible personal property are subject to sales and use tax unless an exemption applies.
M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(w) exempts “[s]ales of the flag of the United States.” Sales of other flags, including state
flags, are not exempt. Letter Ruling 92-3.
The Massachusetts sales tax and complementary use tax is a transaction tax that applies to retail sales of
tangible personal property, including prewritten computer software regardless of mode of transfer, and
telecommunication services. A retail sale is any sale other than a sale for resale. A sale for resale occurs
when a business purchases an item and sells it to a third party in substantially the same form in which it
was purchased. All retail sales are taxable unless an exemption applies. These exemptions are tax
expenditures because they prevent the imposition of tax on transactions that would otherwise be taxable.
One such exemption is the exemption for sales of U.S. flags.
Absent the exemption, all sales of the U.S. flag would be subject to sales and use tax. The revenue
foregone as a result of the exemption constitutes a tax expenditure.
Several states provide a sales and use tax exemption for sales of U.S. flags. Connecticut, New York, and
Rhode Island provide such an exemption. Vermont exempts sales of U.S. flags to and by non-profit
veterans’ organizations. California exempts sales of U.S. flags by non-profit veterans’ organizations.
Maine does not have a sales tax exemption for sales of U.S. flags. New Hampshire does not impose a sales
and use tax.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to promote patriotism by reducing the cost of the
U.S. flag to consumers.
Administration of the exemption for the U.S. flag does not present any special challenge to taxpayers or
the DOR. Vendors are generally aware of the exemption and do not charge sales tax on sales of U.S. flags.
Exemption certificates are not required. The DOR reviews retailers’ sales as part of its sales and use tax
audit program.
Page 298 of 367

Professor Varyani made special note that compared to the year which this tax expenditure was enacted,
patriotism may be different than that felt today. Additionally of note is commentary denoting that some
states provide an exemption for those with nonprofit or veteran status.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption for the American Flag as
presented.
Members agreed to reconvene in September. The purpose of the next meeting is to discuss the next
batch of tax expenditures. Chairperson Forter thanked members for contributions to the Commission.
Chairperson Forter concluded the meeting at 2:03 PM.
Page 299 of 367

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS
STATE HOUSE • BOSTON, MA 02133
(617) 725-4000
MAURA T. HEALEY KIMBERLEY DRISCOLL
GOVERNOR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
April 1 7, 2024
Natasha N. Varyani, Esq.
Boston, MA 02111
Dear Attorney Varyani,
I am pleased to appoint you as a member of the Tax Expenditure Commission, pursuant to
Chapter 207 of the Acts of 2018.
Before commencing your responsibilities, you must take an oath of office. The appointment will
be void unless that oath is taken within three months of the date of this letter. Consistent with
the statute under which you were appointed, your term will expire on July 1, 2026.
Lieutenant Governor Driscoll and I appreciate your willingness to serve the Commonwealth in
this capacity.
Congratulations on your appointment.
Sincerely,
cc: Kimberley Driscoll, Lieutenant Governor
William Francis Galvin, Secretary of the Commonwealth
William J. McNamara, Comptroller of the Commonwealth
Matthew Gorkowicz, Secretaiy of the Executive Office of Administration and Finance
Page 300 of 367

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
COMMONWEALTH OF MASSACHUSETTS
STATE HOUSE• BOSTON,
MA 02133
( 617) 725-4000
MAURA T. HEALEY KIMBERLEY DRISCOLL
GOVERNOR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
May 24, 2024
Thomas A. Downes, Ph.D.
Brookline, MA 02446
Dear Dr. Downes,
I am pleased to appoint you as a member of the Tax Expenditure Commission, pursuant to
Chapter 207 of the Acts of 2018.
Before commencing your responsibilities, you must take an oath of office. The appointment will
be void unless that oath is taken within three months of the date of this letter. Consistent with the
statute under which you were appointed, your term will expire on July 1, 2026.
Lieutenant Governor Driscoll and I appreciate your willingness to serve the Commonwealth in
this capacity.
Congratulations on your appointment.
J, /�
Sin
74
Maura T. Healey
cc: Kimberley Driscoll, Lieutenant Governor
William Francis Galvin, Secretary of the Commonwealth
William J. McNamara, Comptroller of the Commonwealth
Matthew Gorkowicz, Secretary of the Executive Office of Administration and Finance
Page 301 of 367
@ � ON' Rr:c,-c;;:un PAPCR

Tax Expenditure Review Commission Meeting
Tuesday, October 1, 2024
1:00 PM
Via Zoom
Commission Members in Attendance:
• Chairperson Rebecca Forter, MA Department of Revenue
• Lindsay Janeczek, Designee, MA Auditor
• Sue Perez, Designee, MA Treasurer
• Stephen Maher, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, Senate Co-Chair
• Amar Patel, Designee, Senate Ways and Means Committee
• Chris Carlozzi, Designee, Senate Minority Leader
• John Keeler, Designee, House Minority Leader
Commission Members Absent:
• Tim Sheridan, Designee, House Ways and Means Committee
• Ryan Sterling, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, House Co-Chair
• Professor Natasha Varyani, Governor’s Appointee
• Professor Thomas Downes, Governor’s Appointee
List of Documents:
• Meeting Agenda
• Draft Minutes
• June 26, 2024 Meeting
• Presentation of October tax expenditure evaluation ratings, discuss and vote on ratings
• 1.024 Exemption of Benefits and Allowances to Armed Forces Personnel
• 1.025 Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability Compensation and G.I. Benefits
• 1.017 Exclusion of Payments Received Under Government Conservation, Reclamation
and Restoration Programs (previously Exemption of Cost-Sharing Payments)
• 1.015 Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and Tuition Reductions
• 1.016 Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards
• 3.001 Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government
Meeting Minutes:
Chairperson Forter welcomed Commission members, and a quorum was recognized. The
meeting via teleconference was called to order at 1:03 PM. Chairperson Forter put the Commission and
public on notice that the meeting is recorded for the purpose of minutes. The recording of the meeting
will be kept for public record.
Page 302 of 367

Chairperson Forter asked for any comments or changes on the June 26, 2024 draft meeting
minutes. Members did not provide any comment. Members voted to approve the June ‘24 meeting
minutes as drafted. The meeting minutes will be posted to the TERC website.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption of Benefits and Allowances to Armed
Forces Personnel. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1954 and has a revenue impact of $14.2 - $17.4
million per year during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income,
Massachusetts excludes from gross income several benefits to members of the armed services, including,
under Code § 112, (i) compensation earned by members of the Armed Forces serving in a combat zone
and (ii) income received by such individuals who were hospitalized as a result of injury incurred while
serving in a combat zone, and under Code § 134, certain qualified military benefits, such as certain
medical and disability benefits, moving allowances, dependent care assistance, and certain travel
benefits.
All states that impose an income tax adopt the federal exclusion for income received for serving in a
combat zone or during hospitalization as a result of injuries incurred during such service, as well as the
exclusion for certain benefits to the members of the armed forces, unless those states decouple from the
Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled. States that adopt the
exclusion include California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the exclusion is to provide tax relief to members of the Armed
Forces for their services generally, and also to those who (i) serve in a combat zone, or (ii) were
hospitalized as a result of injury incurred while serving in a combat zone.
The administration of the exclusion for qualifying benefits and for income received by Armed Forces
members for serving in a combat zone or during hospitalization as a result of injuries incurred during such
service does not present special challenges for DOR. Payors of such income will identify it as excludable
on Form W-2. Conformity with the federal exclusion based on the 2024 Code simplifies tax compliance
and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and
federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance
burden for taxpayers.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Benefits and Allowances to
Armed Forces Personnel as presented. Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged
for legislative review.
Lindsay Janeczek led a discussion on the Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability
Compensation and G.I. Benefits. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1958 and has a revenue impact of
$49.7 - $69.5 million per year during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Page 303 of 367

Federal law provides that “[p]payments of benefits due or to become due under any law administered by
the Secretary [of Veterans Affairs] . . . made to, or on account of, a beneficiary shall be exempt from
taxation.” 38 U.S.C. 5301(a)(1). The preemption applies for both federal and state tax purposes. As a
result of this preemption, Massachusetts is not permitted to impose income tax on veterans’ disability
pensions, disability compensation, and G.I. benefits. Note that the exemption does not apply to ordinary
pensions received for serving in the military. There is no provision in the Internal Revenue Code (Code) or
the Massachusetts General Laws specifically adopting the federal preemption.
Federal law prevents the federal government or any state from imposing an income tax on veterans’
disability pensions, disability compensation, and G.I. benefits.
The Commission assumes the goal of the federal law exempting veterans' disability pensions, disability
compensation and G.I. benefits from taxation is to prevent such benefits from being diminished by
subjecting them to income tax.
The administration of the exclusion for military disability income does not present special challenges for
DOR. Such income is not reported as taxable on Forms W-2 or 1099 for either federal or state purposes
and is therefore distinguishable from other income. Conformity with the federal preemption simplifies
tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also
eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability
Compensation and G.I. Benefits as presented. Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be
flagged for legislative review.
Stephen Maher led a discussion on the Exclusion of Payments Received Under Government
Conservation, Reclamation and Restoration Programs (previously Exemption of Cost-Sharing Payments).
This tax expenditure was adopted in 1978 and has a revenue impact of $0.4 million per year during FY22
– FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, property owners may exclude from income certain payments they receive for participating in
designated conservation, reclamation, and restoration programs.
All states that conform to the Code for income tax purposes provide an exclusion for payments received
under government conservation, reclamation, and restoration programs, unless they specifically decouple
from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any states that have decoupled.
Page 304 of 367

The Commission assumes that the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to participate in
conservation, reclamation and restoration programs.
The administration of the exclusion for payments from government conservation, reclamation and
restoration programs does not present any special challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR).
Conformity with the federal exclusion simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same
general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for employers and
employees.
Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exclusion of Payments Received Under
Government Conservation, Reclamation and Restoration Programs with a change to Somewhat Agree on
the question of whether the tax expenditure is primarily beneficial to small businesses. Members agreed
that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and Tuition
Reductions. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1954 and has a revenue impact of $43 - $55 million per
year during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, qualifying scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions are excluded from
Massachusetts gross income.
All states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow an exclusion for qualifying
scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions unless they have specifically decoupled from the
Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize formal education by helping
students defray its costs.
The administration of this exclusion does not present any special challenges for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). Educational institutions must provide most students with IRS Form 1098-T (tuition
statement), which includes a box for scholarships or fellowship grants. Taxpayers are instructed to
include taxable portions of scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions in federal gross income.
The Internal Revenue Service (IRS) uses this information to monitor compliance with Code § 117(a) and
(d) and shares the results with the DOR. The Commission assumes that the consistency of treatment of
qualifying scholarships, fellowship grants, and tuition reductions for federal and Massachusetts purposes
also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers
Page 305 of 367

Members voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and
Tuition Reductions as presented. Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for
legislative review.
Amar Patel led a discussion on the Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards. This tax expenditure
was adopted in 1954 and has a revenue impact of $3 - $4 million per year during FY22 – FY26.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining income,
prizes for achievements in specified fields and certain cash payments received for participating in the
Olympics or Paralympics are excluded from Massachusetts gross income.
All states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal exclusion for
achievement prizes, unless they have specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. The
Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to avoid having taxes diminish the value of certain
prizes and awards.
The administration of this exclusion presents some challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR).
Olympic and Paralympic medals and prizes are required to be reported by the payor on Form 1099-Misc,
but it is not necessarily the case that the value of other prizes will be reported on 1099s or W-2s.
Individual audits may be required to monitor the exclusion. However, conformity with the federal
exclusion simplifies tax compliance and administration of the exclusion by allowing the same general rules
and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. Further, such conformity allows the
DOR to use audit results shared by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) to monitor the exclusion.
Members agreed to approve the evaluation template for the Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards with
an additional comment noting that this tax expenditure is complicated to administer and monitor because
many of the prizes and awards are not reported. Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be
flagged for legislative review.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government. This
tax expenditure was adopted in 1968 and has a revenue impact of $50.9 – $62.4 million per year during
FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Sales to the federal government and its agencies are not subject to the sales and use tax because the US
Constitution prohibits states from taxing such sales. The prohibition is effectuated by an exemption set
out in the Massachusetts sales and use tax statutes.
The US Constitution prohibits any state from imposing a sales and use tax on sales to the federal
government or its agencies.
There is no policy goal of the tax expenditure. The statute merely prevents Massachusetts from purporting
to impose an unconstitutional tax on sales to the federal government and its agencies.
Page 306 of 367

The sales and use tax rules for sales to the federal government and its agencies are administered through
the Department of Revenue (DOR) audit function. The DOR has issued exemption certificates (Form ST-5),
that the federal government and its agencies may present to vendors to claim the Massachusetts
statutory exemption. The federal government and its agencies generally decline to present such
certificates. Thus, the DOR must audit vendors to ensure that they are properly excluding sales to the
federal government from taxable receipts.
Members agreed to approve the evaluation template for Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government
with an additional comment noting that this is not really an expenditure because the Commonwealth has
no choice but to exempt these sales. Sales to the federal government and its agencies are not subject to
the sales and use tax because the US Constitution prohibits states from taxing such sales. The prohibition
is effectuated by an exemption set out in the Massachusetts sales and use tax statutes. Administration of
the expenditure is challenging because the federal government and its agencies generally decline to
present exemption certificates, meaning that DOR must audit vendors to ensure that they are properly
excluding sales to the federal government from taxable receipts. Members agreed that this tax
expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review.
Members agreed to reconvene in November. The purpose of the next meeting is to discuss the
next batch of tax expenditures. Chairperson Forter thanked members for contributions to the
Commission. Chairperson Forter concluded the meeting at 1:35 PM.
Page 307 of 367

Tax Expenditure Review Commission Meeting
Friday, November 22, 2024
1:00 PM
Via Zoom
Commission Members in Attendance:
• Chairperson Rebecca Forter, MA Department of Revenue
• Lindsay Janeczek, Designee, MA Auditor
• Sue Perez, Designee, MA Treasurer
• Stephen Maher, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, Senate Co-Chair
• Amar Patel, Designee, Senate Ways and Means Committee
• Chris Carlozzi, Designee, Senate Minority Leader
• Professor Natasha Varyani, Governor’s Appointee
• Professor Thomas Downes, Governor’s Appointee
Commission Members Absent:
• Tim Sheridan, Designee, House Ways and Means Committee
• Ryan Sterling, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, House Co-Chair
• Representative Michael Soter, Designee, House Minority Leader
List of Documents:
• Meeting Agenda
• Draft Minutes
• October 1, 2024 Meeting
• Presentation of October tax expenditure evaluation ratings, discuss and vote on ratings
• 1.203 & 2.204 Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance
• 1.310 & 2.311 Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control Facilities
• 1.041 Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Savings ("529" plans)
• 1.427 Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Deduction
• 1.414 Tuition Tax Deduction
• 1.425 Student Loan Interest Deduction
• 3.408 Exemption for Textbooks
• 1.035 Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan
Meeting Minutes:
Chairperson Forter welcomed Commission members, and a quorum was recognized. The
meeting via teleconference was called to order at 1:01 PM. Chairperson Forter put the Commission and
public on notice that the meeting is recorded for the purpose of minutes. The recording of the meeting
will be kept for public record.
Page 308 of 367

Chairperson Forter noted a change in membership. Stephen Maher will no longer be serving the
Commission as the designee for Senator Susan L. Moran, Senate Chair, Joint Revenue Committee. Nicole
Manfredi will be serving as the replacement designee. Chairperson Forter welcomed Nicole and Nicole
introduced herself.
Chairperson Forter asked for any comments or changes on the October 1, 2024 draft meeting
minutes. Members did not provide any comment. Members voted to approve the October ‘24 meeting
minutes as drafted. The meeting minutes will be posted to the TERC website.
Lindsay Janeczek led a discussion on the Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1976 and has an annual revenue impact of $2.8 - $4.0 million per year for
corporate excise filers, and $0.4 million per year for personal income tax filers during FY22 - FY26 with no
sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, taxpayers in extractive industries such as mining or drilling for natural resources may deduct a
percentage of gross mining income as a depletion allowance ("percentage depletion") without regard to
their cost basis in the income producing property and may continue to claim the depletion allowance
even after the cost of the property has been reduced to zero. This method of cost recovery is often more
beneficial to taxpayers than the traditional cost recovery method applicable to natural resource property.
All states that impose an individual or corporate income tax adopt the depletion allowance unless they
decouple from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
States that adopt the exclusion include California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode
Island, and Vermont.
The Commission assumes that the tax expenditure is intended to stimulate extractive industries’
investment in natural resource property such as mines, wells, and other mineral deposits.
The administration of the depletion percentage method for recovering the cost of natural resource
property does not present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity with the federal system of cost
recovery for natural resources simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general
rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this
consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers and practitioners.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance evaluation template with a change from
Strongly Agree to Somewhat Agree on the question of whether the amount claimed per taxpayer is
meaningful as an incentive/benefit.
Page 309 of 367

Natasha Varyani led a discussion on the Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control Facilities. This
tax expenditure was adopted in 1969 and has an annual revenue impact of $0.3 million per year for
corporate excise tax filers and $0.0 for personal income tax filers during FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, taxpayers may elect to amortize the cost of a certified pollution control facility over a five-year
period, potentially allowing for accelerated recovery of these costs.
All states that impose an income tax adopt the amortization unless they decouple from the Code in that
regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled. States that adopt the amortization
include California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize the construction of pollution
control facilities by allowing accelerated recovery of the cost of such facilities.
The administration of the five-year, or seven-year, amortization of pollution control facilities does not
present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment simplifies tax
compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for
Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the
compliance burden for taxpayers and practitioners.
Members discussed why the group of claimants may be small. Members noted that this tax expenditure
was adopted in 1969 and that the types of pollution control facilities, and the technology used, has since
changed. Members also questioned the potential impact of Governor Healey’s ClimateTech Initiative on
this tax expenditure.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control Facilities evaluation template as presented.
Thomas Downes led a discussion on Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Savings ("529" plans). This
tax expenditure was adopted in 1996 and has an annual revenue impact of $15.9 - $37.3 million per year
during FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, Massachusetts allows an income exclusion for amounts earned by pre-paid tuition programs and
tuition savings accounts.
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes provide an exclusion for the earnings
of pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts unless they specifically decouple from the Code
in this regard. The Commission is not aware of any states that have decoupled.
Page 310 of 367

The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save for higher
education costs.
The administration of this exclusion does not present any special challenges for the Department of
Revenue (DOR). The consistency of treatment of pre-paid tuition programs and tuition savings accounts
for federal and Massachusetts purposes allows the DOR and taxpayers to rely on the federal rules and
definitions pertaining to such programs and accounts.
Members noted that this tax expenditure is mostly claimed by higher income earners and questioned
whether this tax expenditure produces savings or shifts the way in which people save. Members agreed
that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted to approve the
Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Savings ("529" plans) evaluation template with a change from Somewhat
Disagree to Somewhat Agree on the question of whether the tax expenditure is claimed by a broad group
of taxpayers.
Amar Patel led a discussion on the Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Deduction. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 2016 and has an annual revenue impact of $3.2 - $3.7 million per year during
FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Massachusetts allows taxpayers a deduction of up to $1,000 per individual or $2,000 per married couple
filing jointly for contributions to an account in a pre-paid tuition program or college savings program.
Many states allow a deduction for contributions to education savings accounts. The amount of the
deduction varies. States that allow a deduction include Connecticut (up to $5,000 for single filers and
$10,000 for joint filers), New York (up to $5,000 for single filers and $10,000 for joint filers), and Rhode
Island (up to $500 for single filers and $1,000 for joint filers). Vermont allows a credit for 10% of
contributions up to $2,500 of contributions by single filers and up $5,000 of contributions by joint filers.
California and Maine do not allow a deduction or a credit.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to encourage taxpayers to save for higher
education costs.
The administration of the deduction for contributions to pre-paid tuition programs and college savings
accounts presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR) as it is not based on any current
federal deduction. However, plan sponsors are required to report contributions, earnings and
withdrawals with respect to such programs and plans for both state and federal purposes. Such reporting
assists the DOR in monitoring the deduction and helps taxpayers comply with the rules pertaining to the
deduction.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
discussed the similarities between this tax expenditure and the Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Savings
Page 311 of 367

("529" plans) and agreed to reconcile evaluation template ratings. Members voted to approve the
Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Deduction evaluation template with a change from Strongly Agree
to Somewhat Agree on the question of whether the tax expenditure’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost and a
change from Somewhat Agree to Somewhat Disagree on the question whether the tax expenditure is
primarily beneficial to lower income taxpayers.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Tuition Tax Deduction. This tax expenditure was
adopted in 1996 and has an annual revenue impact of $17.4 - $17.7 million per year during FY22 - FY26
with no sunset date.
A deduction is allowed for tuition payments made by taxpayers, for themselves or their dependents, for
programs that would lead to a degree or certificate from a two or four-year college. The deduction is
equal to the amount by which the net tuition payments exceed 25% of the filer's Massachusetts adjusted
gross income.
Few states offer a deduction for tuition payments. New York allows a credit of up to $400 or an itemized
deduction of up to $10,000 for tuition payments, with no income limitations. Maine allows a credit of up
to $3,500 for student loan repayments made by low-income taxpayers. No deduction is available in
California, Connecticut, Rhode Island, or Vermont.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to decrease the financial barriers to higher
education by helping students and their parents defray tuition costs.
The administration of the tuition deduction presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue
(DOR). As there is no corresponding federal deduction, the DOR cannot rely on federal enforcement
measures to monitor the deduction. However, there are federal credits for tuition. Educational
institutions must provide most students with a US Form 1098-T (tuition statement) for purposes of
reporting these credits. Form 1098-T includes a box for payments received for qualified tuition. This
information can be used to monitor compliance with the Massachusetts tuition deduction.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Tuition Tax Deduction evaluation template as presented.
Sue Perez led a discussion on the Student Loan Interest Deduction. This tax expenditure was
adopted in 1999 and has an annual revenue impact of $15.6 - $17.5 million per year during FY22 - FY26
with no sunset date.
Massachusetts allows two alternative deductions for student loan interest. The first is the deduction for
student loan interest allowed under the Internal Revenue Code (Code), to which Massachusetts
conforms. The Code allows a deduction of up to $2,500 of interest paid on loans used to pay for
undergraduate or graduate education, subject to income limitations. The second deduction is a
Page 312 of 367

Massachusetts deduction that applies to interest on undergraduate student loans. This deduction is not
limited in amount and is not subject to income limitations. Taxpayers cannot take both deductions for
the same interest payments.
Most states that adopt the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal deduction of up to
$2,500 for student loan interest. California, Connecticut, Maine, Rhode Island, and Vermont allow such a
deduction. New York allows an uncapped deduction for interest on undergraduate student loans similar
to the second Massachusetts deduction summarized above.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to decrease the financial barriers to higher
education by helping students defray interest expenses related to student loans.
The administration of this expenditure does not present any special challenges for the Massachusetts
Department of Revenue (DOR). Conformity with the federal deduction simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and
federal purposes. Although the second Massachusetts deduction is not based on the Code, it poses no
particular administrability challenge. Educational institutions must provide students with a US Form 1098-
E, which includes a box for student loan interest. DOR can use this information to monitor compliance
with both deductions.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Student Loan Interest Deduction evaluation template with an additional comment noting
that it may be worthwhile to evaluate the state and federal expenditures separately when this tax
expenditure is revisited by the Commission during the next evaluation cycle.
Thomas Downes led a discussion on the Exemption for Textbooks. This tax expenditure was
adopted in 1968 and has an annual revenue impact of $10.2 - $12.2 million per year during FY22 – FY26
with no sunset date
Sales of textbooks and other books required for instructional purposes at educational institutions are
exempt from sales and use tax.
States vary in their sales and use tax treatment of textbooks required for courses at educational
institutions. The Massachusetts exemption is broader than similar exemptions in most other states. For
example, Connecticut, New York, and Rhode Island generally limit the exemption to college-level
textbooks. A substantial number of states, including California, Maine and Vermont do not provide any
exemption for textbooks.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to help defray the cost of course materials that
students are required to purchase for classes at educational institutions.
Page 313 of 367

The administration of the exemption for textbooks and other books required for courses at educational
institutions presents some challenge for the Department of Revenue (DOR). Vendors of textbooks at the
retail level are likely to have a variety of exempt and non-exempt sales. The only way to monitor the
exemption is by auditing vendors. However, vendors are generally aware of the exemption for textbooks
and take steps to collect sales and use tax appropriately. Thus, although audits are necessary to monitor
compliance with the exemption, the DOR does not view non-compliance as a widespread problem.
Vendors should maintain adequate records to demonstrate that exempt sales were properly classified in
the case they are audited.
Members discussed that reducing the cost of textbooks for low-income students, and thus reducing the
cost of attending college, is a reasonable goal. But that this exemption is a blunt tool to do that. At the K-
12 level, most public schools do not require students to purchase books. Any benefits to consumers go
disproportionately to higher-income families. Private schools are more likely to require purchases. At the
college level, attendees tend to have higher lifetime incomes. Further, given that demand for textbooks
has become increasing elastic, a significant portion of benefits goes to textbook publishers and, to a lesser
extent, authors. Nevertheless, an important group of lower-income students find textbooks prohibitively
expensive. With the growth of electronic books, a better strategy to support those students may be to
provide the libraries of public colleges and universities with the resources to make electronic versions of
textbooks available for students.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Exemption for Textbooks evaluation template as presented.
Chairperson Forter led a discussion on the Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan.
This tax expenditure was adopted in 1984 and has an annual revenue impact of $0.0 - $0.2 million per
year during FY22 - FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ conformity with the Internal Revenue Code (Code), Massachusetts adopts the
federal exclusion for qualified military base realignment and closure fringe benefits paid by the
Department of Defense (DOD) to military personnel, eligible civilian personnel, or their spouses. Such
benefits are paid to eligible individuals to compensate them for certain losses incurred on the sale of their
homes as a result of having to move because of base closures or injury related to military service.
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes allow the federal exclusion for
qualified military base realignment and closure fringe benefits, unless they decouple from the Code in
that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to allow the DOD to make tax-free payments to
military personnel, eligible civilian personnel, or their spouses, to compensate such individuals for loss of
home property values owing to relocation resulting from military base closures or because of injury from
military service.
Page 314 of 367

The administration of the exclusion for qualified military base realignment and closure fringe benefits
does not present any special challenges for the Department of Revenue (DOR) as it is based on a federal
exclusion that is monitored by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS). The Commission assumes that the
consistency of treatment of such payments for federal and Massachusetts purposes also eases the
compliance burden for taxpayers.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members voted
to approve the Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan evaluation template as presented.
Members agreed to reconvene in January. The purpose of the next meeting is to discuss the next
batch of tax expenditures. Chairperson Forter thanked members for their contributions to the
Commission and concluded the meeting at 2:09 PM.
Page 315 of 367

Tax Expenditure Review Commission Meeting
Thursday, January 30, 2025
1:00 PM
Via Zoom
Commission Members in Attendance:
• Chairperson Rebecca Forter, MA Department of Revenue
• Lindsay Janeczek, Designee, MA Auditor
• Chris Carlozzi, Designee, Senate Minority Leader
• Professor Natasha Varyani, Governor’s Appointee
• Professor Thomas Downes, Governor’s Appointee
• John Keeler on behalf of Representative Michael Soter, Designee, House Minority Leader
• Katie Verra, Designee, Senate Ways and Means Committee
Commission Members Absent:
• Tim Sheridan, Designee, House Ways and Means Committee
• Ryan Sterling, Designee, Joint Revenue Committee, House Co-Chair
• Sue Perez, Designee, MA Treasurer
• Vacant (House Chair, Joint Committee on Revenue)
• Vacant (Senate Chair, Joint Committee on Revenue)
List of Documents:
• Meeting Agenda
• Draft Minutes
• November 22, 2024 Meeting
• Presentation of January tax expenditure evaluation ratings, discuss and vote on ratings
• 1.311 & 2.313 Deduction and Seven Year Amortization for Reforestation
• 1.608 & 2.608 Brownfields Credit
• 3.412 Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and Supplies to be Used in
Connection with Certain Construction Contracts
• 3.608 Exemption for Gifts of Scientific Equipment
• 1.032 Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance
• 1.036 Survivor Annuities of Fallen Public Safety Officers
Meeting Minutes:
Chairperson Forter welcomed Commission members, and a quorum was recognized. The
meeting via teleconference was called to order at 1:03 PM. Chairperson Forter put the Commission and
public on notice that the meeting is recorded for the purpose of minutes. The recording of the meeting
will be kept for public record.
Page 316 of 367

Chairperson Forter noted changes in membership. Amar Patel, designee for Senate Ways and
Means, will be out on leave until April 7, 2025. Katie Verra (Deputy General Counsel) will attend on behalf
of Amar Patel while he is on leave. Commission members welcomed Katie Verra. TERC members include
the House and Senate chairs of the Joint Committee on Revenue. There are no members appointed in
the current General Court at the time of this meeting. The previous Senate chair was Susan Moran. The
previous House chair was Mark Cusack.
Chairperson Forter asked for any comments or changes on the November 22, 2024 draft meeting
minutes. Members did not provide any comment. Members voted to approve the November ‘24
meeting minutes as drafted. The meeting minutes will be posted to the TERC website.
Tom Downes led a discussion on the Deduction and Seven Year Amortization for Reforestation.
This tax expenditure was adopted in 1983 for purposes of the personal income tax, and 1980 for
purposes of the corporate excise and has an annual revenue impact of $0.2 million for personal income
tax and $0.2 million for corporate excise during FY22-FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) § 194(b) for purposes of
determining income, taxpayers may elect to deduct up to $10,000 of “reforestation expenditures”
incurred with respect to qualified timber property in the year in which expenditures are incurred. The
deduction applies to both the personal income tax and to the net income measure of the corporate
excise. See M.G.L. c. 62 §§ 1(c), 2(d)(1); M.G.L. c. 63, § 30.4. If reforestation expenditures exceed
$10,000, taxpayers may amortize the excess over a seven-year period. The amortization deduction has
no dollar limit. See Code § 194(a). Trusts are not eligible for the deduction but may elect seven-year
amortization for such expenses. See Code § (b)(1)(B)(iii).
Qualified timber property is a “woodlot or other site located in the United States” used for the
“planting, cultivating, caring for, and cutting of” a commercial volume of trees for the purpose of
producing timber products. See Code § 194(c). The property must be at least one acre in size.
Reforestation expenditures include the direct costs of forestation or reforestation, such as site
preparation, seeds, labor, and equipment. See Code § 194(c).
All states that impose an income tax based on federal adjusted gross income adopt the $10,000
deduction and seven-year amortization deduction for forestation or reforestation expenses unless they
decouple from the Code in that regard. States that adopt the deduction and seven-year amortization
include California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont. Note that
California limits its conformity to expenditures on timber property located within the state. New
Hampshire does not have a personal income tax but conforms to Code § 194 for the purpose of its
corporate income tax.
The Commission assumes the goal of the expenditure is to incentivize forestation and
reforestation.
The administration of the deduction and seven-year amortization of forestation and reforestation
expenses does not present any special challenges for the DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment
simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be
Page 317 of 367

used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. DOR assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases
the compliance burden for taxpayers and practitioners.
Members noted that to be eligible for the deduction, the taxpayer must be cultivating a
commercial volume of trees. Members discussed how this tax expenditure’s beneficiaries extend far
beyond the taxpayers claiming the deduction.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
voted to approve the evaluation template for the Deduction and Seven-Year Amortization for
Reforestation as presented.
Natasha Varyani led a discussion on the Brownfields Credit. This tax expenditure was adopted in
1998 and has an annual revenue impact of $2.3 - $2.8 million for personal income tax, and $22.2 - $26.4
million for corporate and business excise during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Massachusetts allows a credit for costs incurred in remediating contamination of real estate. See
M.G.L. c. 62, §6 (j); M.G.L. c. 63, § 38Q. The credit may be claimed by personal income taxpayers,
business corporations or non-profit corporations. The credit is available for expenses incurred to
remediate contaminated property in Massachusetts. To claim the credit a taxpayer must commence and
diligently pursue an environmental response action and achieve and maintain a permanent solution or
remedy operation status in compliance with M.G.L. c. 21E, § 2. The taxpayer must complete the cleanup
in compliance with standards set out by the Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection
(DEP). The contaminated property must be owned or leased for business purposes by the claimant and
must be located within an economically distressed area. The remediation must be commenced on or
before August 5, 2028 and eligible costs that qualify for the credit must be incurred before January 1,
2029.
The credit is equal to either 25% or 50% of the taxpayer’s net response and removal costs,
depending on whether any limitations on the use of the property remain after remediation. The
taxpayer’s net response and removal costs are the eligible costs less any reimbursement received by the
taxpayer. Unused credit may be carried forward for up to five years. Taxpayers may sell, transfer or
assign the credit. The credit may be carried forward for up to 5 years.
Few other states allow a credit similar to the Brownfields Credit. No credit is available in
California, Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, Rhode Island, or Vermont. However, New York allows a
similar credit.
The Commission assumes the goal of the credit is to promote clean-up of contaminated property
in Massachusetts in accordance with standards set out by the Massachusetts Department of
Environmental Protection (DEP).
The administration of the Brownfields Credit presents challenges for the Department of Revenue
(DOR). DOR is responsible for administering the credit. Verification of eligible expenses often raises
technical environmental matters that require specialized expertise. DOR audits the credit as part of its
personal income tax and corporate excise audit processes.
Members noted that (i) this credit has no cap and therefore the fiscal impact of the credit is
unpredictable, (ii) there is administrative complexity in the fact that DEP regulations determine eligibility
Page 318 of 367

for the credit but the statute tasks DOR with reviewing applications and granting credits, requiring DOR to
develop technical expertise.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should be flagged for legislative review. Members
voted to approve the evaluation template for the Brownfields Credit as presented. Chris Carlozzi
abstained.
Lindsay Janeczek led a discussion on the Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and Supplies to
be Used in Connection with Certain Construction Contracts. This tax expenditure was adopted in 1967
and has an annual revenue impact of $352.2 - $375.1 million during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Massachusetts allows a sales and use tax exemption for the sale of building materials and
supplies used by contractors in fulfilling construction contracts with federal and Massachusetts
government entities or with corporations, foundations, organizations or institutions that are exempt from
taxation under Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3). M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6(f). The exemption also applies to
construction equipment that contractors rent for exclusive use in such construction contracts.
For purposes of the exemption, a construction contract is an agreement that will result in the
construction, reconstruction, repair, or remodeling of certain building structures, public highways,
bridges, or other public works. Exempt building materials and supplies include materials that will be
incorporated into building structures (e.g., concrete or steel) and supplies that will be consumed in
fulfilling the contract (e.g., fuel used to operate construction equipment). The exemption does not apply
to items used by the contractor to administer the construction contract (e.g., telecommunications
services or office equipment).
With respect to construction contracts with the federal government, Massachusetts or any
political subdivision thereof, or their respective agencies, sales of building materials and supplies are
generally exempt if the building structure, public highway, bridge or other public works under
construction is owned by or held in trust for the benefit of the governmental entity and used exclusively
for public purposes. With respect to construction contracts with a corporation, foundation, organization
or institution that is tax-exempt under Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)(3), sales of building materials and
supplies are generally exempt if the building structure under construction is owned by or held in trust for
the benefit of the tax-exempt entity and used exclusively in the conduct of its religious, scientific,
charitable or educational purposes. Further, the property must be used for the owner’s governmental or
tax-exempt purposes.
Most states that impose a sales and use tax allow an exemption for sales of building materials and
supplies used in construction contracts with the federal government, their own state’s government and
tax-exempt organizations. Connecticut, Maine, New York, Rhode Island and Vermont allow such an
exemption. California allows exemption for federal construction projects but generally taxes building
materials and supplies used in state and local construction contracts and contracts with tax-exempt
organizations.
The Commission assumes that the expenditure is intended to reduce the cost of construction
projects funded by government entities and tax-exempt organizations, thereby increasing the resources
such entities and organizations have available to devote to their missions.
Page 319 of 367

The exemption for building materials and supplies used in construction contracts with
government entities and tax-exempt organizations is administered through the DOR audit function. To
facilitate the exemption the DOR issues Certificates of Exemption, Forms ST-2 to exempt organizations
and entities upon request. The Form ST-2 documents the organizations’ and entities’ exempt status.
Furthermore, the purchasing entities must generally complete either a Sales Tax Exempt Purchaser
Certificate, Form ST-5, or a Contractor’s Sales Tax Exempt Purchase Certificate, Form ST-5C and provide
the forms to vendors at the time of purchase in order to claim the exemption. However, DOR must audit
vendors and contractors to ensure that they are applying the exemption correctly.
Members noted this tax expenditure was adopted in 1967 which led to a discussion regarding the
age of some Massachusetts’ tax expenditures. Members agreed that age could be used as a factor for
deciding which expenditures are flagged for legislative review. Members also noted that higher
education institutions are eligible for the exemption.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and Supplies
Used in federal and Massachusetts Government Construction Contracts and Construction Contracts with
Tax Exempt Organizations as presented.
John Keeler led a discussion on the Exemption for Gifts of Scientific Equipment. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1983 and has an annual revenue impact of under $50,000 during FY22 –
FY26 with no sunset date.
Chapter 64H, Section 2 of the Massachusetts General Laws imposes a sales tax on retail sales of
tangible personal property. A sale is defined as any transfer of title or possession for consideration. G.L.
c. 64H, § 1(12)(a). Massachusetts provides a sales and use tax exemption for donations of scientific
equipment or apparatus by manufacturers to non-profit educational institutions, to the Massachusetts
Technology Park Corporation, or to the Bay State Skills Corporation. Although donations of tangible
personal property are not subject to the sales or use tax because donations are not “for consideration,”
without this exemption the sales tax would be imposed upon otherwise exempt inputs required to make
the tangible personal property. A manufacturer’s purchase of inputs such as materials, tools, fuel, and
machinery to be used in the manufacture of tangible personal property to be sold is exempt from the
sales and use tax under G.L. c. 64H, § 6(r) and (s). To claim the exemption the manufacturer presents an
exempt use certificate when purchasing the inputs and the sales and use tax is imposed upon the
subsequent sale of the manufactured products (in this case, scientific equipment or apparatus) by the
manufacturer, unless an exemption applies. However, if after presenting the certificate, the
manufacturer donates the manufactured products instead of selling them, the manufacturer is required
to pay sales tax on the cost of the inputs for which the manufacturer previously claimed an exemption.
M.G.L. c. 64H, §§ 8 (h). See also Letter Ruling 84-62. Donation of manufactured equipment would trigger
the sales tax if not for the exemption. The revenue foregone as a result of the exemption constitutes a
tax expenditure.
The Commission is not aware of any state that has a specific exemption for donations of scientific
equipment. However, several states, including California, Connecticut, Maine, New York, and Vermont
Page 320 of 367

allow broader exemptions for donations of any tangible personal property by vendors to tax-exempt
organizations.
The Commission assumes the goal of the exemption is to allow manufacturers to donate scientific
equipment to public and private nonprofit educational institutions without incurring sales and use tax.
The exemption for donations of scientific equipment presents some challenge to the Department
of Revenue (DOR) because no certificate or other documentation is required to claim the exemption, and
the recipient of the donation will be a tax-exempt entity with no sales and use tax filing requirement.
Thus, the exemption can be verified only by auditing manufacturers.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemptions for Gifts of Scientific Equipment with a
change from Strongly Disagree to Somewhat agree on the question of whether the tax expenditure is
easily administered.
Chris Carlozzi led a discussion on the Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance. Massachusetts
conformed to the federal expenditure as of 2022. This tax expenditure has an annual revenue impact of
under $50,000 during FY22 – FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to Massachusetts’ reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining
income, amounts received by employees through employer-sponsored adoption assistance programs are
excluded from Massachusetts gross income. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts Code § 137 (as amended
and in effect for the 2024 tax year), which allows the exclusion for federal tax purposes. M.G.L. c. 62, §§
1, 2(a). The maximum amount of employer-provided adoption benefits that can be excluded is $16,810
per child, with higher amounts excluded for the adoption of children with special needs. The exclusion
amount begins to phase out for taxpayers with income in excess of $252,150 and is completely phased
out when income reaches $292,150. The limitation amounts are adjusted annually for inflation. See
Code § 137(f). The exclusion applies to amounts used for reasonable and necessary adoption fees, court
costs, attorney fees, and certain other expenses. Adoption expenses related to surrogacy, or the
adoption of a spouse’s child are ineligible for the exclusion.
States that conform to the Internal Revenue Code for individual income tax purposes adopt the
exclusion for employer-provided adoption benefits, unless they have specifically decoupled from the
Code. The Commission is not aware of any state that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes that the goal of the exclusion is to ease the financial burden on
taxpayers who adopt children by excluding employer-provided adoption benefits from gross income.
The administration of the exclusion for employer-provided adoption assistance does not present
any special challenges for DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment simplifies tax compliance and
administration by allowing the same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and
federal purposes. The Commission assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance
burden for taxpayers and employers.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
vote to approve the evaluation template for the Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance as presented.
Page 321 of 367

John Keeler led a discussion on the Survivor Annuities of Fallen Public Safety Officers. This tax
expenditure was adopted in 1958 and has an annual revenue impact of under $50,000 during FY22 –
FY26 with no sunset date.
Due to its reliance on the Internal Revenue Code (Code) for purposes of determining gross
income for personal income tax purposes, Massachusetts excludes from income certain payments to
eligible survivors of public safety officers killed in the line of duty. Specifically, Massachusetts adopts
Code § 101(h), which allows a federal exclusion for annuities paid under a governmental plan. To be
treated as an eligible governmental plan, the plan must meet certain funding, participation and anti-
discrimination requirements. Public safety officers include law enforcement officers, firefighters,
members of rescue squads and members of ambulance crews. Eligible survivors are limited to the
spouses and children of public safety officers. See § 101(h)(1)(A). The federal and state exclusion is not
allowed in certain circumstances detailed in IRC § 101(h)(2), where the public safety officer was engaged
in misconduct or negligence when he or she was killed, or if the survivor contributed to the public safety
officer’s death.
States that conform to the Code for individual income tax purposes adopt the exclusion unless
they have specifically decoupled from the Code in that regard. The Commission is not aware of any state
that has decoupled.
The Commission assumes the goal of the exclusion is to ease the financial burden for survivors of
public officers killed in the line of duty.
The administration of the exclusion for annuity income paid under a governmental plan to the
survivors of public safety officers killed in the line of duty does not present any special challenges for
DOR. Conformity with the federal treatment simplifies tax compliance and administration by allowing the
same general rules and definitions to be used for Massachusetts and federal purposes. The Commission
assumes that this consistency of treatment also eases the compliance burden for taxpayers.
Members agreed that this tax expenditure should not be flagged for legislative review. Members
voted to approve the evaluation template for the Exemption for Survivor Annuities for Fallen Public Safety
Officers as presented.
Members agreed to reconvene in late February. The purpose of the next meeting is to discuss
and vote on the annual report. Chairperson Forter noted that the draft report will be circulated for
review in upcoming weeks and thanked members for their contributions to the Commission. The meeting
concluded at 2:02 PM.
Page 322 of 367

Appendix F
Economic Analysis and Its Use in TERC Reports
This appendix explains why the Commission uses a static economic impact analysis model for the
evaluation of a tax expenditure. A static model is used to measure only the direct impacts. A dynamic
model is used to measure the direct impacts and indirect impacts. As explained below, a tax expenditure
generates not only direct impacts, but also indirect impacts.
On one hand, a tax expenditure generates direct benefits to some taxpayers in the form of lower
production or capital cost, or higher disposable income, or lower consumer price, etc. On the other
hand, because the Commonwealth must balance its budget, spending on a tax expenditure means fewer
funds available to spend on other expenditure items if there is no increase in state revenues. Reduced
spending on other expenditure items means forgone benefits from those items. This is a direct cost1 to
the Commonwealth, which is ultimately borne by the Massachusetts residents or businesses that would
have benefitted from additional spending on those other expenditure items. The direct costs to the
Commonwealth in the form of other foregone benefits are equal to the direct benefits to taxpayers of
the particular tax expenditure.
Besides the direct costs and benefits, there are indirect and induced costs and benefits associated with a
tax expenditure. The indirect impact (cost or benefit) is felt by the chain of businesses that provide
intermediate products and services to the directly impacted businesses. The induced impact (cost or
benefit) is felt by the chain of businesses that benefit when the employees working for the directly
impacted businesses spend their wages and salaries to buy goods and services. Accordingly, the total
benefits and/or costs to the whole economy are larger than the initial direct impacts. This phenomenon
is called the “Multiplier Effect”.2 To measure indirect and induced costs and benefits, economists often
need to utilize complicated models, such as REMI (Regional Economic Models, Inc.) or IMPLAN (Impact
Analysis for Planning) models. The citation in footnote 2 provides a comparison of these three models.
DOR did not use such models given their complexity and data limitations present in this instance.
Besides the indirect and induced costs and benefits, there may also be externalities to consider when
evaluating a tax expenditure. A negative or positive externality occurs when the production and/or
consumption of a good or service exerts a negative or positive effect on a third party independent of the
transaction. Below are examples of negative and positive externalities associated with tax expenditures
that have been evaluated by the Commission.
1 Called “Opportunity Cost” in economics.
2 For an illustration of “Multiplier Effect”, see Slide 4 of: https://www.ilw.com/seminars/JohnNeillCitation.pdf
Page 323 of 367

Examples of Negative Externalities
1. 3.302 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels and Machinery Used in Manufacturing
• Manufacturing plants may cause noise and air pollution during the manufacturing
process. By encouraging manufacturing activities, this tax expenditure may aggravate
the problem of negative externality such as noise and pollution if there are no other
policies to offset the impact.
2. 3.108 Exemption for Certain Precious Metals
• In order to mint coins and bullion of precious metals, ore must first be extracted from
mines. The extraction process for these ores can create dust, land erosion, and possible
run-off to local waterways, all of which are detrimental to the environment. By
encouraging these activities, this tax expenditure may aggravate the problem of negative
externality such as noise and pollution if there are no other policies to offset such
negative externalities.
3. 3.609 Exemption for Vessels or Barges of 50 Tons or Over
• A shipyard involved in the building of large vessels may cause noise and air pollution
during the building process. By encouraging this activity, this tax expenditure may
aggravate these negative externalities if there are no offsetting policies to dampen the
impact.
4. 3.109 Exemption for Cement Mixers
• Water, sand, gravel (or crushed stone), and the binder of cement combine to produce
concrete. To acquire these aggregates involves quarrying, which in turn create large
amounts of dust, and the kilns that are used in the process that ultimately produces
cement require significant amounts of energy as they need to reach a temperature of
approximately 1,500 degrees centigrade. A by-product of this process is large amounts
of carbon dioxide (CO2). By encouraging these activities, this tax expenditure will
aggravate the problem of negative externality such as noise and pollution if there are no
other policies to offset the impact. On the other hand, by encouraging the construction
of infrastructure, such as roads, bridges, airports, and other products that are often
viewed as “public goods”, this exemption generates positive externalities.
3 REMI’s Tax-PI is a versatile tool for evaluating the total fiscal and economic impacts of tax policy changes. Tax-PI
is a ready-to-use dynamic fiscal and economic impact model which captures the direct, indirect, and induced
fiscal and economic impacts of taxation and other policy changes over multiple years. The model integrates
input-output, computable general equilibrium, econometric and economic geography methodologies. For an
introduction of Tax-PI, please see the following linked file: https://www.remi.com/wp-
content/uploads/2020/07/Estimating-Economic-Fiscal-Impacts-in-Tax-PI.pdf
Page 324 of 367

5. 3.304 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Furnishing Power, Water,
and Steam
• According to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, nearly all parts of the electricity
system can affect the environment, and the size of these impacts will depend on how
and where the electricity is generated and delivered. In general, the environmental
effects can include air and water pollution, solid waste, use of land and water resources,
etc. Similarly, burning natural gas emits carbon dioxide. Constant introduction of carbon
dioxide into atmosphere will lead to climate change and global warming. In addition,
some of the potential problems associate with natural gas pipelines and infrastructure
include destruction of thousands of acres of vital habitat, forest, and pristine lands. Loss
of the valuable water and air filtering that forests provide.
6. 3.418 Exemption for Fuels, Supplies, and Repairs for Vessels Engaged in Interstate or
Foreign Commerce
• A greater movement of vessels engaged in interstate and foreign commerce may impact
the life of some aquatic (endangered) species and may create some water and air
pollution during the repairing and fueling process. By encouraging this activity, this tax
expenditure may aggravate these negative externalities if there are no offsetting policies
to dampen the impact.
7. 3.306 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Newspaper Printing
• The newspaper publishing industry may produce significant amounts of volatile organic
compounds (VOCs) along with heavy metals from ink which may cause air and soil
pollution. By indirectly encouraging this activity, this tax expenditure may aggravate
these negative externalities if there are no offsetting policies to dampen the impact.
8. 3.411 Exemption for Certain Sales by Typographers, Compositors and Color Separators
• The printing industry may produce significant amounts of volatile organic compounds
(VOCs) along with heavy metals from ink which may cause air and soil pollution. By
indirectly encouraging this activity, this tax expenditure may aggravate these negative
externalities if there are no offsetting policies to dampen the impact.
9. 2.101 Deferral of Tax on Certain Shipping Companies
• A shipyard involved in the building or repairing of vessels may cause noise and air
pollution during the building/repairing process. By encouraging this activity, this tax
expenditure may aggravate these negative externalities if there are no offsetting
policies to dampen the impact.
10. 3.419 Exemption for Fuel Used in Operating Aircraft and Railroads
• Airplanes/aircrafts and rails operations may cause noise and air pollution during the
process. By encouraging aviation and rail operation, this tax expenditure may
aggravate the problem of negative externality such as noise and air pollution if there
are no other policies to offset the impact.
11. 3.401 Exemption for Electricity
• Electricity generation, transmission, and distribution operations may cause noise and
air pollution during the process. By encouraging the usage of electricity, this tax
expenditure may aggravate negative externalities such as noise and air pollution if
there are no other policies to offset the impact.
12. 3.402 Exemption for Fuel Used for HeaPtaingeg 3P2u5r opfo 3s6e7s

• Heating fuel production, storage, and distribution operations may cause water, noise and
air pollution during the process. By encouraging the usage of heating fuel, this tax
expenditure may aggravate negative externalities such as water, noise and air pollution if
there are no other policies to offset the impact.
13. 3.403 Exemption for Gas
• Natural gas exploration, drilling, production, storage, and distribution operations may
cause water, soil, noise and air pollution during the process, though probably less
compared with the production, storage, distribution of other types of fuel. By
encouraging the usage of natural gas, this tax expenditure may aggravate negative
externalities such as water, soil, noise and air pollution if there are no other policies to
offset the impact.
14. 3.404 Exemption for Steam
• By encouraging the usage of steam, this tax expenditure may aggravate the problem of
negative externality such as noise and air pollution if there are no other policies to offset
the impact.
Examples of Positive Externalities
1. 3.303 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels and Machinery Used in Research and
Development
Research and development conducted by a company can have positive externalities.
o
Research and development increases the private profits of a company but also has the
added benefits of increasing the general level of knowledge within a society and
promoting economic growth through its positive effect on innovation and productivity.
Since positive externalities cannot be paid for through the market, government
intervention, such as subsidy (or public funding to research and development), is often
viewed as necessary.
2. 1.423 Commuter Deduction
In addition, by encouraging use of public transportation, this expenditure helps create a
o
cleaner environment through fewer vehicle emissions and reduced stress on
infrastructure (i.e., highways, bridges, etc.), which would generate positive
externalities1, or benefits to each member of the society.
3. 3.417 Exemption for Commuter Boats / 3.420 Exemption for Sales of Certain New and Used
Buses
By encouraging use of public transportation, this expenditure helps create a cleaner
o
environment through fewer vehicle emissions and reduced stress on infrastructure (i.e.,
highways, bridges, etc.), which would generate positive externalities, or benefits to
each member of the society.
4. 3.605 Exemption for Certain Summer Camps from Sales Tax on Meals
the usage of summer camps by children and developmentally disabled individuals will
o
promote the physical and mental health of the users of such summer camps, which will
indirectly benefit people around them and the society as a whole.
5. 1.606 Septic System Credit
By encouraging the repair or replacement of a failed septic system, the expenditure
o
assists to protect public health and environment, which would generate positive
externalities, or benefits to each member of the society.
Page 326 of 367

6. 3.310 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Radio and TV Broadcasting
Radio and television broadcasting firms produce and broadcast comprehensive coverage
o
of news and current affairs, sports, and other entertainments, the benefits of which
extend beyond individual consumers. Hence, the society at large could benefit from a
thriving radio and television broadcasting sector. Please note, this exemption would
apply to traditional broadcasters and to cable broadcasters, but presumably not to
Internet streaming or other Internet services.
7. 3.405 Exemption for Certain Energy Conservation Equipment
By encouraging the use of clean energy, this expenditure seeks to support a cleaner
o
environment, curb climate change, and enhance public health, which would generate
positive externalities. Such positive externalities are often difficult to quantify.
8. 3.601 Exemption for Casual or Isolated Sales
This expenditure results in a positive externality because it incentivizes the sale of used
o
items, which may reduce the demand for new goods and therefore pollution associated
with the manufacturing of such new goods, especially for textiles. In addition, resale of
used items may reduce solid waste if the used items would otherwise be disposed.
9. 3.610 Exemption for Rental Charges for Refuse Containers
By encouraging proper refuse disposal, including the re-use of refuse containers, this
o
expenditure helps create a cleaner and safer environment, which would generate
positive externalities.
10. 3.417 Exemption for Commuter Boats, 3.420 Exemption for Sales of Certain New and Used
Buses, 1.423 Commuter Deduction
By encouraging use of public transportation, these expenditures help create a cleaner
o
environment through fewer vehicle emissions and reduced stress on infrastructure
(i.e., highways, bridges, etc.), which would generate positive externalities, or benefits
to each member of the society.
11. 3.605 Exemption for Certain Summer Camps from Sales Tax on Meals
The usage of summer camps by children and developmentally disabled individuals
o
will promote the physical and mental health of the users of such summer camps,
which will indirectly benefit people around them and the society as a whole.
Page 327 of 367

Appendix G
Background: Current and Previous Studies of
Massachusetts Tax Expenditures
There has been considerable interest in the last decade regarding the Commonwealth’s tax expenditures.
The current TERC, which was created by the Acts of 2018, follows up on the work of an earlier ad hoc Tax
Expenditure Commission, formed pursuant to Acts 2011, section 160, that issued an extensive report to
the Legislature on April 30, 2012. Indeed, the formation of the current TERC may be seen as an
implementation of certain recommendations of the previous Commission, which advocated for the
periodic review of tax expenditures to ensure their continued relevance and effectiveness. The current
TERC represents an institutionalization of such an ongoing review process.
The 2012 Report, along with its multiple appendices, provides a wealth of information regarding state and
federal tax expenditures. Additionally, the Tax Expenditure Budget, published annually by the
Commissioner of Revenue, provides current cost estimates associated with tax expenditures applicable to
the particular fiscal year. Readers are referred to these sources for background information related to
Massachusetts tax expenditures. The 2012 Report, with associated materials, is available at:
https://www.mass.gov/lists/2011-2012-tax-expenditure-commission-materials. The annual Tax
Expenditure Budget is available at: https://www.mass.gov/lists/tax-expenditure-budget.
The current Tax Expenditure Review Commission was created under Chapter 207 of the Acts of 2018 to
review each tax expenditure in the Tax Expenditure Budget every five years; to consider the purpose,
goal, and effectiveness of each Tax Expenditure in this review; and to report its findings biennially to the
Legislature. The full text of Chapter 207, which is now codified at Chapter 14, section 14 of the General
Laws, is reproduced at Appendix A.
The TERC is chaired by the Commissioner of the Department of Revenue or designee. Other members
include the State Auditor; the State Treasurer; the chair of the House Committee on Ways and Means;
the chair of the Senate Committee on Ways and Means; the House and Senate chairs of the Joint
Committee on Revenue; the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives; the Minority Leader of the
Senate; and 3 members to be appointed by the governor, who have expertise in economics or tax policy.
The 3 members appointed by the governor will serve 4-year terms. The statutory TERC members listed
above may appoint designees. Recent participating members of the Commission, including designees, are
identified in Appendix B.
In 2021, the Tax Expenditure Review Commission released its first report to the legislature. The report
provided the Commission’s review of certain tax expenditures pertaining to commerce, energy and
research & development.
In 2022, the Tax Expenditure Review Commission released its second report to the legislature. The report
provided the Commission’s review of certain tax expenditures pertaining to agriculture, transportation,
housing, income security, employment and social services.
Page 328 of 367

In 2023, the Tax Expenditure Review Commission released its third report to the legislature. The report
provided the Commission’s review of certain tax expenditures pertaining to agriculture, transportation,
housing, income security, employment and social services.
In 2024, the Tax Expenditure Review Commission released its third report to the legislature. The report
provided the Commission’s review of certain tax expenditures pertaining to agriculture, commerce,
regional development, employment & social services, health, housing, and income security.
Page 329 of 367

Appendix H
Legislative Changes to Tax Expenditures
Fiscal Year 2025
The following tax expenditures have been revised or created due to recent law changes.
Personal Income Tax Changes:
“An Act Making Appropriations for the Fiscal Year 2023 for Supplementing Certain Existing
Appropriations and for Certain Other Activities and Projects,” “An Act Making Appropriations for
the Fiscal Year 2024 to Provide for Supplementing Certain Existing Appropriations and for Certain
Other Activities and Projects,” the Fiscal Year 2025 (FY25) Budget, “An Act Relative to the
Affordable Homes Act”, “An Act Honoring, Empowering, and Recognizing Our Servicemembers
and Veterans”, and “An Act Relative to Strengthening Massachusetts’ Economic Leadership”
enacted various changes to the personal income tax.
Repeal of the deduction of interest and dividends from Massachusetts banks (TE Item 1.413)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, personal income taxpayers can no
longer deduct interest and dividends from savings deposits, savings accounts, shares or share
savings accounts that are in a Massachusetts bank. Prior to the repeal, taxpayers could deduct
such interest and dividends in the amount of $100 for a single person, head of household or a
married person filing a separate return, or $200 for a husband and wife filing a joint return.
Expansion of wagering loss deduction to sports wagering losses (TE Item 1.428)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the wagering loss deduction has been
expanded to allow personal income taxpayers to deduct losses from sports wagering that are
incurred from wagers placed through a licensed sports wagering operator. Taxpayers may claim
this deduction for sports wagering losses incurred in a calendar year only if they had wagering
winnings from any such sports wagering operator, gaming establishment, racing meeting
licensee, or simulcasting licensee in the same calendar year. The deduction allowed for sports
wagering losses may not exceed the amount of any wagering winnings included in gross income
for the calendar year. See TIR 24-6 for more information.
Increase of the annual cap for and extension of the Massachusetts historic rehabilitation credit
(TE Item 1.610)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the Massachusetts historic rehabilitation
credit’s annual cap has been increased from $55 million to $110 million. The credit was due to
expire on December 31, 2027, but has been extended to taxable years ending on or before
December 31, 2030.
Page 330 of 367

Increase of the annual cap for and extension of the community investment credit (TE Item 1.617)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the community investment credit’s
annual cap has been increased from $12 million to $15 million. The credit was due to expire on
December 31, 2025, but has been made permanent.
Increase to the Qualified Veterans Hire Tax Credit (TE Item 1.620)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the amount of credit a business can
claim for each qualified veteran it hires has been increased from $2,000 to $2,500.
Cranberry Bog Renovation Credit (TE Item 1.623)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, taxpayers primarily engaged in
cranberry production may claim a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to 25% of expenses
incurred in the renovation, repair, replacement, regrading or restoration of a cranberry bog for
the cultivation, harvesting or production of cranberries. The Secretary for Energy and
Environmental Affairs determines eligible costs and the amount of the credit. The amount of
credit that can be claimed by a taxpayer for a taxable year cannot exceed $100,000. The annual
total cap amount is $2 million. The credit is no longer available for taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2030.
Temporary authorized training tax credit for emergency assistance (New TE Item 1.629)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, partnerships, limited liability
corporations, or other legal entities subject to the personal income tax that provide training to a
qualified trainee through an authorized training program may claim a temporary authorized
training tax credit for emergency assistance. A qualified individual is an individual receiving
benefits through the emergency housing assistance program pursuant to G.L. c. 23B, § 30. To
qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must (1) have a place of business in the Commonwealth; (2)
conduct an authorized training program in the Commonwealth that is in compliance with
recommendations of the Executive Office of Labor and Workforce Development (“EOLWD”); (3)
enroll the qualified trainee in an authorized training program on or after April 30, 2024; and (4)
meet any additional requirements determined by the Executive Office for Administration and
Finance and EOLWD. The credit is equal to $2,500 for each qualified trainee that receives the
training from the entity. The amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year
may be carried forward to the subsequent taxable year. The credit is subject to an annual cap of
$10 million. The credit may no longer be claimed as of (1) January 1, 2026; or (2) the taxable
year in which the end of the capacity limitation on the emergency shelter assistance program
occurs, whichever is sooner. See TIR 24-7 for more information.
Massachusetts homeownership credit (New TE Item 1.630)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, personal income taxpayers
may claim a Massachusetts homeownership tax credit in relation to a qualified homeownership
development project to the extent authorized by the Executive Director of the Massachusetts
Housing Finance Agency (“MHFA”). The credit is non-refundable but is transferrable. The amount
of the credit authorized by MHFA cannot exceed the maximum credit amount, which is 35% of
the lesser of either: (1) the project’s total qualified project expenditures calculated on a per
Page 331 of 367

single-family dwelling basis; or (2) 80% of the area median new single-family dwelling sales price,
subject to further limitations established by MHFA. A sponsor cannot claim the credit before the
first taxable year stated on the eligibility certificate issued to the sponsor by MHFA. Any amount
of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward for the duration
of the qualified homeownership development project’s affordability period, which is a 10-year
period that begins as of the date of the first sale of a single-family dwelling that was constructed
as part of the project. The credit is subject to recapture.
The amount of credits that MHFA can authorize annually cannot exceed the sum of (1) $10
million; (2) any credit amounts not authorized in the preceding taxable year; and (3) any credits
returned to MHFA by a sponsor. Effective January 1, 2030, the amount of credits that can be
authorized annually is the sum of (1) any credit amounts not authorized in the preceding taxable
year; and (2) any credits returned to MHFA by a sponsor.
Qualified conversion credit (New TE Item 1.631)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, personal income taxpayers
may claim a refundable, non-transferable qualified conversion credit in relation to a qualified
conversion project that has been certified by the Executive Office of Housing and Livable
Communities (“EOHLC”). To claim the credit, a sponsor must submit a project proposal to EOHLC
requesting the certification of a housing development project as a qualified conversion project.
After certifying the project, EOHLC determines the amount of credit awarded to the sponsor,
which cannot exceed 10% of the qualified conversion’s project’s development costs.
The credit is allowed for the taxable year in which EOHLC notifies the Commissioner of the
certified qualified conversion project’s completion. Any amount of the credit that exceeds the
tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the 10 taxable years subsequent to
the taxable year that the credit was allowed. The credit is subject to recapture.
The credit is no longer available for taxable years ending after December 31, 2029.
Climatetech Tax Incentive Program (New TE item 1.632)
Massachusetts provides a climatetech tax incentive program, which is administered by the
Massachusetts clean energy center (“CEC”), in consultation with DOR. The tax incentives consist
of three tax credits, the climatetech capital investment tax credit, a refundable climatetech jobs
tax credit, and a climatetech qualified research expenses tax credit; as well as a sales and use tax
exemption for purchases of tangible personal property to be used for the construction of
research, development or manufacturing or other commercial climatetech facilities. The
incentives all share an annual cap of $30 million and are effective for taxable years beginning on
or after January 1, 2024.
The climatetech capital investment tax credit is a refundable tax credit available to personal
income and corporate excise taxpayers who make capital investments in a climatetech facility.
The amount of the credit is determined by the CEC, but cannot exceed 50% of the owner’s total
capital investment in the facility.
The refundable climatetech jobs tax credit is a refundable tax credit available to personal income
taxpayers who commit to creating at least 5 net new jobs in Massachusetts. The amount of
credit is determined by the CEC. Where the credit exceeds the taxpayer’s liability, 90% of excess
credit amount is refunded to the taxpayer.
Page 332 of 367

Live Theater Tax Credit (New TE item 1.633)
The live theater tax credit program is administered by the Massachusetts Office of Business
Development, in consultation with DOR. The credit is available to personal income and corporate
excise taxpayers. The amount of the credit cannot exceed $7 million and is equal to (1) 35% of
the total in-state payroll costs; (2) 25% of production and performance expenditures; and (3)
25% of transportation expenditures. The credit is not refundable, but is transferrable. Any
unused amount of credit may be carried forward to the next 5 taxable years. The annual amount
of credits that can be authorized cannot exceed $7 million.
The credit is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and expires on
January 1, 2030.
Qualified Internship Tax Credit (New TE item 1.634)
The qualified internship tax credit is available to personal income and corporate excise taxpayers
who hire a qualified intern. The credit is equal to the lesser of $5,000 or 50% of the wages paid
to the intern. The annual amount of credits that can be authorized cannot exceed $10 million. A
single employer cannot claim more than $100,000 in credits in a taxable year.
The credit is effective starting for the taxable year beginning on or after January 1 of the first
calendar year following the next fiscal year that closes after November 20, 2024 with a
consolidated net surplus of at least $400 million. The credit expires on January 1 of the sixth tax
year following the effective date of the credit.
Corporate Excise Changes:
“An Act Making Appropriations for the Fiscal Year 2024 to Provide for Supplementing Certain
Existing Appropriations and for Certain Other Activities and Projects”, “An Act Relative to the
Affordable Homes Act”, “An Act Honoring, Empowering, and Recognizing Our Servicemembers
and Veterans”, and “An Act Relative to Strengthening Massachusetts’ Economic Leadership”
enacted various changes to the corporate excise.
Economic Development Incentive Program Credit (TE Item 2.605)
Under the Economic Development Incentive Program (EDIP), the Economic Assistance
Coordination Council (EACC) may award tax credits to taxpayers that participate in a "certified
project" (as defined in G.L. c. 23A, §§ 3A and 3F). The amount of credit allowed in each case is
determined by the EACC based on numerous factors set forth in G.L. c. 23A, § 3D, including the
number of jobs expected to be created, the amount of capital to be invested, and the net new
economic benefit expected to be created. The EACC may designate the credit as refundable for
any certified project. Prior to January 1, 2024, the EACC could not annually designate more than
$5 million in refundable credits. This limitation is eliminated effective January 1, 2024.
Increase of the cap for and extension of the Massachusetts historic rehabilitation credit (TE Item
2.610)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the Massachusetts historic rehabilitation
credit’s annual cap has been increased from $55 million to $110 million. The credit was due to
expire on December 31, 2027, but has been extended to taxable years ending on or before
December 31, 2030.
Page 333 of 367

Life Sciences Tax Incentive Program (TE Item 2.617)
Effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the Angel Investor Tax Credit is
no longer available. In addition, the annual amount of life science tax incentives that can be
authorized has been increased from $30 million to $40 million.
Increase of the cap for and extension of the community investment credit (TE Item 2.621)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the community investment credit’s
annual cap has been increased from $12 million to $15 million. The credit was due to expire on
December 31, 2025, but has been made permanent.
Increase to the qualified veterans hire tax credit (TE Item 2.623)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the amount of credit a business can
claim for each qualified veteran it hires has been increased from $2,000 to $2,500.
Cranberry Bog Renovation Credit (TE Item 2.625)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, taxpayers primarily engaged in
cranberry production may claim a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to 25% of expenses
incurred in the renovation, repair, replacement, regrading or restoration of a cranberry bog for
the cultivation, harvesting or production of cranberries. The Secretary for Energy and
Environmental Affairs determines eligible costs and the amount of the credit. The amount of
credit that can be claimed by a taxpayer for a taxable year cannot exceed $100,000. The annual
total cap amount is $2 million. The credit is no longer available for taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2030.
Temporary authorized training tax credit for emergency assistance (New TE Item 2.629)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, business corporations taxable
under G.L. c. 63 that provide training to a qualified trainee through an authorized training
program may claim a temporary authorized training tax credit for emergency assistance. A
qualified individual is an individual receiving benefits through the emergency housing assistance
program pursuant to G.L. c. 23B, § 30. To qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must (1) have a place
of business in the Commonwealth; (2) conduct an authorized training program in the
Commonwealth that is in compliance with recommendations of the Executive Office of Labor
and Workforce Development (“EOLWD”); (3) enroll the qualified trainee in an authorized training
program on or after April 30, 2024; and (4) meet any additional requirements determined by the
Executive Office for Administration and Finance and EOLWD. The credit is equal to $2,500 for
each qualified trainee that receives the training from the entity. The amount of the credit that
exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to the subsequent taxable year.
The credit is subject to an annual cap of $10 million.
The credit may no longer be claimed as of (1) January 1, 2026; or (2) the taxable year in which
the end of the capacity limitation on the emergency shelter assistance program occurs,
whichever is sooner. See TIR 24-7 for more information.
Page 334 of 367

Massachusetts homeownership credit (New TE Item 2.630)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, taxpayers subject to tax under
G.L. c. 63 may claim a Massachusetts homeownership tax credit in relation to a qualified
homeownership development project to the extent authorized by the Executive Director of the
Massachusetts Housing Finance Agency (“MHFA”). The credit is non-refundable but is
transferrable. The amount of the credit authorized by MHFA cannot exceed the maximum credit
amount, which is 35% of the lesser of either: (1) the project’s total qualified project expenditures
calculated on a per single-family dwelling basis; or (2) 80% of the area median new single-family
dwelling sales price, subject to further limitations established by MHFA. A sponsor cannot claim
the credit before the first taxable year stated on the eligibility certificate issued to the sponsor by
MHFA. Any amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried
forward for the duration of the qualified homeownership development project’s affordability
period, which is a 10-year period that begins as of the date of the first sale of a single-family
dwelling that was constructed as part of the project. The credit is subject to recapture if MHFA
determines that a sponsor or qualified homeownership development project does not qualify for
the credit, ceases to qualify for the credit, or did not qualify for the credit at the time they
claimed the credit.
The amount of credits that MHFA can authorize annually cannot exceed the sum of (1) $10
million; (2) any credit amounts not authorized in the preceding taxable year; and (3) any credits
returned to MHFA by a sponsor. Effective January 1, 2030, the amount of credits that can be
authorized annually is the sum of (1) any credit amounts not authorized in the preceding taxable
year; and (2) any credits returned to MHFA by a sponsor.
Qualified conversion credit (New TE Item 2.631)
Starting with taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, taxpayers subject to tax under
G.L. c. 63 may claim a refundable, non-transferable qualified conversion credit in relation to a
qualified conversion project that has been certified by the Executive Office of Housing and
Livable Communities (“EOHLC”). To claim the credit, a sponsor must submit a project proposal to
EOHLC requesting the certification of a housing development project as a qualified conversion
project. After certifying the project, EOHLC determines the amount of credit awarded to the
sponsor, which cannot exceed 10% of the qualified conversion’s project’s development costs.
The credit is allowed for the taxable year in which EOHLC notifies the Commissioner of the
certified qualified conversion project’s completion. Any amount of the credit that exceeds the
tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the 10 taxable years subsequent to
the taxable year that the credit was allowed. The credit is subject to recapture.
The credit is no longer available for taxable years ending after December 31, 2029.
Climatetech Tax Incentive Program (New TE Item 2.632)
Massachusetts provides a climatetech tax incentive program, which is administered by the
Massachusetts clean energy center (“CEC”), in consultation with DOR. The tax incentives consist
of three tax credits, the climatetech capital investment tax credit, a refundable climatetech jobs
tax credit, and a climatetech qualified research expenses tax credit; as well as a sales and use tax
exemption for purchases of tangible personal property to be used for the construction of
research, development or manufacturing or other commercial climatetech facilities. The
Page 335 of 367

incentives all share an annual cap of $30 million and are effective for taxable years beginning on
or after January 1, 2024.
The climatetech capital investment tax credit is a refundable tax credit available to personal
income and corporate excise taxpayers who make capital investments in a climatetech facility.
The amount of the credit is determined by the CEC, but cannot exceed 50% of the owner’s total
capital investment in the facility.
The climatetech qualified research expenses tax credit is available to corporate excise taxpayers.
The credit amount is based on the taxpayer’s qualified research expenses in a manner similar to
the standard research expense tax credit. The credit is not refundable, but unused amounts of
the credit may be carried forward to the next subsequent 15 taxable years.
Live Theater Credit (New TE Item 2.633)
The live theater tax credit program is administered by the Massachusetts Office of Business
Development, in consultation with DOR. The credit is available to personal income and corporate
excise taxpayers. The amount of the credit cannot exceed $7 million and is equal to (1) 35% of
the total in-state payroll costs; (2) 25% of production and performance expenditures; and (3)
25% of transportation expenditures. The credit is not refundable, but is transferrable. Any
unused amount of credit may be carried forward to the next 5 taxable years. The annual amount
of credits that can be authorized cannot exceed $7 million.
The credit is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025 and expires on
January 1, 2030.
Qualified Internship Credit (New TE Item 2.634)
The qualified internship tax credit is available to personal income and corporate excise taxpayers
that hire a qualified intern. The credit is equal to the lesser of $5,000 or 50% of the wages paid
to the intern. The annual amount of credits that can be authorized cannot exceed $10 million. A
single employer cannot claim more than $100,000 in credits in a taxable year.
The credit is effective starting the taxable year beginning on or after January 1 of the first
calendar year following the next fiscal year that closes after November 20, 2024 with a
consolidated net surplus of at least $400 million. The credit expires on January 1 of the sixth tax
year following the effective date of the credit.
Sales and Use Tax Changes
The FY25 Budget and “An Act Relative to Strengthening Massachusetts’ Economic Leadership”
enacted the following changes to the sales and use tax.
Repeal of the sales tax exemption for certain publications of tax-exempt organizations (TE Items
3.607)
Effective September 27, 2024, the sales and use tax exemption for sales of publications of any
corporation, foundation, organization or institution that is an exempt organization pursuant to
Code § 501(c)(3) and described in G.L. c. 64H, § 6(e) is repealed, except in cases where such
publications are produced in an accessible format, including, but not limited to, braille, enlarged
print, audio or electronic text, for use by individuals unable to read other print due to disability.
Page 336 of 367

Exemption for Sales of Certain Tangible Personal Property Purchased for a Certified Climatetech
Company (New TE Item 3.006)
Effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, sales of tangible personal
property purchased for a certified climatetech company, to the extent authorized pursuant to
the climatetech tax incentive program, for use in connection with the construction, alteration,
remodeling, repair or remediation of research, development or manufacturing facilities and
utility support systems, are exempt from sales tax.
Qualified Data Center Sales and Use Tax Exemption (New TE Item 3.007)
A sales and use tax exemption is available to the owner or operator of a qualified data center for
the purchase of eligible data center equipment, software, electricity used in a qualified data
center, and construction costs incurred in the building, renovation, or refurbishment of a
qualified data center. For a data center to be qualified, it must meet certain criteria and be
certified by the Secretary of the Executive Office of Economic Development (“EOED”). However,
EOED will not accept applications for certification until it completes its development, in
consultation with DOR, of the required regulations and a standardized application form for the
certification of qualified data centers.
Fiscal Year 2024
The following tax expenditures have been revised or created due to law changes.
Page 337 of 367

The Personal Income Tax:
The Fiscal Year 2024 (FY24) Budget and “An Act to Improve the Commonwealth’s
Competitiveness, Affordability, and Equity” enacted various changes to the personal income tax.
Increase to the rental deduction (TE Item 1.411)
The rental deduction is equal to half of the rent paid for a principal residence located in
Massachusetts in a taxable year up to a certain amount. For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2023, the maximum amount of the rental deduction is increased to $4,000 ($2,000 if
married filing a separate return).
Expansion of the commuter deduction (TE Item 1.423)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the commuter deduction has been expanded
to include expenses incurred for all Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority (“MBTA”) fares,
Massachusetts regional transit authority fares, fares for any commuter boat owned, operated, or
contracted by a municipality, public or quasi-public entity, agency, or authority, bikeshare
memberships, and the cost of bicycles purchased for commuting (including electric bicycles and
bicycle improvements, repairs, and storage).
Deduction for employer-provided student loan payment assistance (New TE Item 1.430)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, employees may deduct employer payments
of principal or interest on a qualified education loan during the taxable year that have not
already been excluded from their federal gross income. Employees claiming the deduction may
not claim any other deduction, such as for student loan interest, for the same amounts paid by
their employer. See TIR 23-5 for more information on the federal exclusion of employer
payments of student loans.
Increase to the lead paint removal tax credit (TE Item 1.602)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the maximum amount of the lead
paint removal tax credit has been increased to $3,000 for each residential unit in which certain
accessible materials containing lead, including paint, were removed, contained, or replaced. In
addition, the maximum amount of the credit for residential units in which such materials were
partially covered or removed has been increased to $1,000.
Increase in the Massachusetts earned income tax credit – (TE Item 1.605)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the amount of the Massachusetts
earned income tax credit (“EITC”) an individual may claim is increased to 40% of the computed
federal credit. The credit cannot be claimed by married taxpayers that file separate
Massachusetts personal income tax returns. With respect to a taxpayer who is a non-resident for
part of the taxable year, the credit must be pro-rated. A taxpayer who is a non-resident for the
entire taxable year cannot claim the credit.
Increase to the septic tax credit (TE Item 1.606)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the maximum amount of the septic
tax credit taxpayers may claim per taxable year has been increased to $4,000. The maximum
Page 338 of 367

total credit amount that can be claimed with respect to a particular project is increased to
$18,000. In addition, the percentage of allowable septic system expenditures used to calculate
the credit is increased to 60%.
Increase to the low-income housing tax credit cap (TE Item 1.607)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the low-income housing tax credit’s annual
cap has been increased to $60,000,000.
Extension of the brownfields tax credit (TE Item 1.608)
The brownfields tax credit, previously scheduled to expire on August 5, 2023, has been extended
for five additional years. Under prior law, to qualify for a brownfields tax credit, the taxpayer
must have commenced the environmental response action on or before August 5, 2023, and
incurred net response and removal costs before January 1, 2024. Under the revisions made by
the FY24 Budget, the taxpayer must commence the environmental response action on or before
August 5, 2028, and incur net response and removal costs before January 1, 2029.
Increase to the circuit breaker tax credit (TE Item 1.609)
Taxpayers aged 65 or older who own or rent residential property located in Massachusetts are
allowed a credit equal to the amount by which their total real estate tax payments, or 25% of
their rent in the case of a renter, exceeds 10% of the taxpayer’s total income up to a certain
amount. Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the statutory base amount
has been doubled, resulting in an increase of the maximum credit to $2,590. For tax year 2023,
an eligible taxpayer’s total income cannot exceed $69,000 in the case of a single filer who is not
a head of household filer, $86,000 for a head of household filer, and $103,000 for joint filers. In
order to qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must be aged 65 or older and must occupy the
property as his or her principal residence. See TIR 23-11 for more information.
Increase to the dairy farm tax credit cap (TE Item 1.614)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the dairy farm tax credit’s annual cap has
been increased to $8,000,000.
Increase to the certified housing development tax credit cap (TE Item 1.619)
For the 2023 calendar year, the certified housing development tax credit’s annual cap has been
increased to $57,000,000. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the annual cap is
set at $30,000,000.
Child and family tax credit (New TE Item 1.628)
Starting with tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, individuals subject to the personal
income tax may claim a refundable, non-transferable child and family tax credit if they maintain
a household that includes an individual who is (1) under the age of 13 and who may be claimed
as a dependent for purposes of the dependent for exemption as a dependent for federal
purposes; (2) a dependent, or the taxpayer’s spouse, who is physically or mentally incapable of
taking care of himself or herself and principally lives with the taxpayer; or (3) a dependent who is
age 65 or over or disabled. For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the amount of
Page 339 of 367

the credit is equal to $310 for each such individual. The credit will be increased to $440 for each
such individual for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024.
Other changes:
Reinstatement of the Personal Income Tax Deduction for Charitable Contributions (TE Item
1.415)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, a deduction for charitable contributions is
available for M.G.L. c. 62 taxpayers. This deduction had been suspended since the 2002 tax year.
Pursuant to M.G.L. c. 62, § 1(c), Massachusetts conforms to certain Internal Revenue Code
(“Code”) provisions currently in effect, rather than as of a fixed date. Provisions of the Code that
Massachusetts will continue to apply on a current basis are those related to:
• Roth IRAs;
• IRAs;
• The exclusion for gain on the sale of a principal residence;
• Trade or business expenses;
• Travel expenses;
• Meals and entertainment expenses;
• The maximum deferral amount of government employees’ deferred compensation plans;
• The deduction for health insurance costs of self-employed taxpayers;
• Medical and dental expenses;
• Annuities;
• Health savings accounts;
• Employer-provided health insurance coverage;
• Amounts received by an employee under a health and accident plan; and
• Contributions to qualified tuition programs.
Any changes to those Code sections are automatically adopted in Massachusetts, and any tax
expenditure derived from those sections will reflect the impact of any such changes. DOR will
continue to review the impact of tax law changes at the federal level and will update future Tax
Expenditure Budgets as necessary.
Corporate excise changes:
The Fiscal Year 2024 (FY24) Budget and “An Act to Improve the Commonwealth’s
Competitiveness, Affordability, and Equity” enacted various changes to the corporate excise.
Extension of the Brownfields Credit (TE Item 2.608)
The brownfields tax credit, previously scheduled to expire on August 5, 2023, has been extended
for five additional years. Under prior law, to qualify for a brownfields tax credit, the taxpayer
must have commenced the environmental response action on or before August 5, 2023, and
incurred net response and removal costs before January 1, 2024. Under the revisions made by
the FY24 Budget, the taxpayer must commence the environmental response action on or before
August 5, 2028, and incur net response and removal costs before January 1, 2029.
Increase to the low-income housing tax credit cap (TE Item 2.609)
Page 340 of 367

For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the low-income housing tax credit’s annual
cap has been increased to $60,000,000.
Increase to the dairy farm tax credit cap (TE Item 2.618)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, the dairy farm tax credit’s annual cap has
been increased to $8,000,000.
Increase to the certified housing development tax credit cap (TE Item 2.622)
For the 2023 calendar year, the certified housing development tax credit’s annual cap has been
increased to $57,000,000. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the annual cap is
set at $30,000,000.
Fiscal Year 2023
Page 341 of 367

The following tax expenditures have been revised or created due to law changes.
The Personal Income Tax:
Pursuant to the Fiscal Year 2023 (FY23) Budget, for tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2022, Massachusetts generally conforms to the Internal Revenue Code (“IRC”) in effect as of
January 1, 2022 for personal income tax purposes. Prior to the FY23 Budget, the Massachusetts
personal income tax generally conformed to the IRC in effect as of January 1, 2005. The updating
of the IRC conformity date triggered changes in Massachusetts’ conformity with numerous
federal tax expenditures, as reflected in this Appendix. However, pursuant to M.G.L. c. 62, §
1(c), Massachusetts conforms to certain IRC provisions currently in effect, rather than as of a
fixed date. Provisions of the IRC that Massachusetts will continue to apply on a current basis are
those related to:
• Roth IRAs;
• IRAs;
• The exclusion for gain on the sale of a principal residence;
• Trade or business expenses;
• Travel expenses;
• Meals and entertainment expenses;
• The maximum deferral amount of government employees’ deferred compensation plans;
• The deduction for health insurance costs of self-employed taxpayers;
• Medical and dental expenses;
• Annuities;
• Health savings accounts;
• Employer-provided health insurance coverage;
• Amounts received by an employee under a health and accident plan; and
• Contributions to qualified tuition programs.
Any changes to those IRC sections are automatically adopted in Massachusetts, and any tax
expenditure derived from those sections will reflect the impact of any such changes.
Federal Tax Law Changes
The following is a list of Massachusetts tax expenditures that were affected by Massachusetts’
adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022. Note that although some of these expenditures
affect unincorporated business entities, they are not included in the “Corporate and Other
Business Excise” section, below, because they will only apply to business taxpayers subject to the
personal income tax (e.g., members of pass-through entities). For more information on the
Page 342 of 367

updated IRC conformity date in Massachusetts, please see Working Draft TIR: 23-1, Tax
Provisions in the Fiscal Year 2023 Budget, Including Massachusetts Personal Income Tax Code
Update.
Exemption of Premiums on Group-Term Life Insurance – IRC § 79(f) (TE Item 1.002)
In 2012, Congress expanded this exemption, allowing employers to transfer excess defined
benefit plan assets to group life insurance and allowing the cost of such transfers to be excluded
from the gross income of the employee. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on
January 1, 2022, these amounts will be excluded for Massachusetts personal income tax
purposes. See IRC § 79(f) (as amended by P.L. 112-141 § 40242(d)).
Exemption of Interest on Life Insurance Policy and Annuity Cash Value Interest – IRC § 101(a)(3),
(j) (TE Item 1.003)
Under the 2005 IRC, IRC § 101(a) generally excluded life insurance proceeds from federal gross
income. The scope of the federal exclusion was narrowed by legislation enacted after 2005. First,
starting in 2006, proceeds in excess of premiums (and other policyholder payments) from
employer-owned life insurance contracts were made taxable unless certain exceptions apply.
See P.L. 109-280, § 863(a), (c)(1) (adding IRC § 101(j)). Second, starting in 2017, the exclusion
was further limited in certain cases where the insurance policy was sold or transferred. See P.L.
115-97, § 13522(a) (amending IRC § 101(a)(2) and adding IRC § 101(a)(3)). Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, the Massachusetts personal income tax
conforms to the exclusion for insurance proceeds to the same extent it is allowed for federal tax
purposes.
Exemption of Workers Compensation Benefits – IRC §§ 101(h), 104(a)(6) (TE Item 1.010)
Beginning in 2015, certain federal and state death benefits paid on behalf of public safety
officers who die due to injuries received in the line of duty were excluded from federal gross
income. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, such benefits
will be excluded for Massachusetts personal income tax purposes. See IRC §§ 101(h), 104(a)(6).
Exemption of scholarships and fellowships – IRC § 117(c)(2) (TE Item 1.015)
Beginning in 2015, amounts received from a comprehensive student work-learning service
program were excluded from federal gross income. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in
effect on January 1, 2022, such benefits will be excluded for Massachusetts personal income tax
purposes. See IRC § 117(c)(2) (as amended by P.L. 114-113 § 301(a)).
Exemption of Certain Prizes and Awards – IRC § 74(d) (TE Item 1.016)
Page 343 of 367

Beginning in 2016, the value of any medal or prize awarded on account of competition in the
Olympics or Paralympics was excluded from federal gross income. Pursuant to the recent
adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, the value of such awards will be excluded for
Massachusetts personal income tax purposes. See IRC § 74(d) (as amended by P.L. 114-239
§2(a)).
Exemption of Benefits and Allowances to Armed Forces Personnel – IRC § 134(b)(6) (TE Item
1.024)
In 2008 Congress amended the IRC to exclude from federal gross income bonus payments made
by a state or subdivision to a soldier for the soldier’s service in a combat zone. Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, such amounts will be excluded for
Massachusetts personal income tax purposes. See IRC § 134(b)(6) (as amended by P.L. 110-245 §
112(a)).
Parking and Combined Commuter Highway Vehicle Transportation and Transit Pass (T-Pass)
Fringe Benefit – IRC § 132(f) (TE Item 1.030)
IRC § 132(f) excludes from an employee’s gross income employer-provided parking, transit pass,
and commuter highway vehicle transportation benefits, subject to monthly maximum exclusion
amounts. However, the monthly maximum amount for these exclusions differed for
Massachusetts and federal purposes because Congress increased the maximum amount after
2005, a change to which Massachusetts did not conform under prior law. Because
Massachusetts now adopts the IRC in effect as of January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to
this increase and the monthly maximum for these exclusions will be the same for Massachusetts
and federal purposes for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022. For the 2022 tax year,
the monthly maximum exclusion for both Massachusetts and federal purposes is $280 for
employer-provided parking and $280 for combined transit pass and commuter highway vehicle
transportation benefits. For the 2023 tax year, as noted in TIR 22-15, the monthly maximum
exclusion will be $300 for employer-provided parking and $300 for combined transit pass and
commuter highway vehicle transportation benefits. In addition, IRC § 132(f) also excludes from
an employee’s gross income employer-provided, qualified bicycle commuting reimbursements,
subject to monthly maximum exclusion amounts. See P.L. 110-343, § 211. IRC § 132(f)(8)
suspends this exclusion for tax years 2018 through 2025. Congress added the exclusion for
qualified bicycle commuting reimbursements after 2005 and Massachusetts did not conform to
it before the recent change to chapter 62’s conformity date. As a result of this change,
Massachusetts will exclude from employees’ Massachusetts gross income employer-provided,
qualified bicycle commuting reimbursements for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance – IRC § 137(f) (TE Item 1.032)
Page 344 of 367

Under the IRC in effect on January 1, 2005, to which Massachusetts previously conformed, the
federal exclusion for employer-provided adoption expenses was set to expire in 2010. Therefore,
under prior law, this expenditure was not available for Massachusetts tax purposes after 2010
even though Congress subsequently delayed IRC § 137’s expiration and then, in 2012, codified
IRC § 137 permanently. See P.L. 112-240, § 101(a). However, in adopting the IRC in effect as of
January 1, 2022, Massachusetts resumes the exclusion of these expenses from gross income. See
IRC § 137(f) (as amended by P.L. 111-148 § 10909(a)(2), (b)(2)(j)).
Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan – IRC § 132(a)(8), (n) (TE Item 1.035)
IRC § 132(n) excludes from federal gross income payments received under the United States
Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan for the compensation of military personnel
and certain civilian employees for a reduction in the fair market value of their homes resulting
from military or Coast Guard base closure or realignment. This exclusion was legislatively
expanded after 2005 to apply to wounded members of the Armed Forces and their spouses.
Massachusetts conforms to IRC § 132(n), as noted in TIR 05-16. However, because the later
expansion of this exclusion was enacted by Congress after 2005, Massachusetts did not
previously conform to this later change. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on
January 1, 2022, Massachusetts now conforms to the expansion of the exclusion provided by IRC
§ 132(n) for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.
Discharge of Indebtedness for Health Care Professionals – IRC § 108(f)(4) (TE Item 1.039)
In 2010, Congress expanded this expenditure to exclude from federal gross income amounts
received pursuant to a state student loan repayment or forgiveness program that was intended
to provide for increased availability of health care services in underserved or health professional
shortage areas. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, such
amounts will be excluded for Massachusetts personal income tax purposes. See IRC § 108(f)(4)
(as amended by P.L. 111-148 § 10908(a)).
Archer Medical Savings Accounts (MSA) – IRC § 220(d)(2)(A) (TE Items 1.040, 1.420)
In 2020, Congress expanded the definition of qualified medical expenses for the purposes of an
Archer MSA. Specifically, amounts paid, or expenses incurred, for certain medicine or drugs
without a medical prescription were classified as a qualified medical expense. Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts adopts this broadened
definition of qualified medical expenses for personal income tax purposes. See IRC § 220(d)(2)(A)
(as amended by P.L. 116-136).
Page 345 of 367

Exclusion of Qualified Small Business Stock Capital Gains (TE Item 1.042); Non-Qualified Small
Business Stock Capital Gains Tax Rate (TE Item 1.501) – IRC § 1202; M.G.L. c. 62, § 4(c)
IRC § 1202 excludes from federal gross income all of the gain from the sale or exchange of
qualified small business stock held for more than 5 years. See IRC § 1202(a)(4) (as amended by
P.L. 111-240 § 2011(a), (b)). The exclusion applies to gain on qualified small business stock
acquired on or after September 27, 2010. However, under the 2005 IRC, only 50% of the gain
was excluded. In adopting the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to the
100% exclusion with respect to sales or exchanges of qualified small business stock that occur on
or after January 1, 2022. In addition to the exclusion, Massachusetts taxes gain on the sale or
exchange of certain small business stock at a reduced rate of 3%. M.G.L. c. 62, § 4(c). The
reduced rate is no longer applicable to gain that is eligible for the 100% exclusion as such gain is
not included in Massachusetts gross income. However, the reduced rate continues to apply to
gain that is not eligible for the federal exclusion (e.g., gain on a sale or exchange of stock that
would otherwise qualify for the exclusion but for the fact that it was issued by an S corporation),
if all of the requirements for the reduced rate are met.
Treatment of Incentive Stock Options – IRC §§ 83(i), 421-424 (TE Item 1.102)
IRC § 421-424 provides rules for the exclusion of income from incentive stock options. In 2017,
Congress added IRC § 83(i), which affects certain stock options. Among other things, IRC § 83(i)
permits eligible employees to obtain qualified stock in exchange for the performance of services.
Employees were further permitted to defer the recognition of income on the stock for up to 5
years in certain instances. Prior to the adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022,
Massachusetts did not conform to IRC § 83(i), which was not a part of the 2005 IRC. Pursuant to
the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, taxpayers subject to the personal
income tax will be able to defer this income for Massachusetts personal income tax purposes in
the same manner as for federal purposes. See IRC §§ 83(i), 421-424 (as amended by P.L. 115-97
§ 13603(c)(1)).
Personal Exemption for Students Age 19 or Over – M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(b)(3) (TE Item 1.407)
A taxpayer may claim a $1,000 exemption for each individual who qualifies as a “dependent” as
defined by reference to IRC § 152. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(b)(3). IRC § 152 defines the term
“dependent.” In 2008, Congress (i) narrowed the definition of a dependent for purposes of the
federal income tax to exclude individuals who file joint returns, and (ii) permitted taxpayers who
are not the parent of a child to claim the child as a dependent, provided that the taxpayer’s
adjusted gross income is higher than that of the child’s parent. See IRC § 152(b)(2), (c)(4)(C).
Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts will
adopt these rules for personal income tax purposes.
Tuition Deduction (Over 25% of Income) – M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(11) (TE Item 1.414)
Page 346 of 367

Pursuant to M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(11), a deduction from Massachusetts gross income is allowed
for tuition payments made by a taxpayer to a two- or four-year college in which the taxpayer or a
“dependent” of the taxpayer is enrolled. The deduction is generally equal to the amount by
which the net tuition payments exceed 25% of the taxpayer’s Massachusetts adjusted gross
income. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(11). The term “dependent” in the tuition deduction is defined
by reference to IRC § 152. As a result, this expenditure will be affected by the changes described
above in TE Item 1.407.
Deduction for Clean-Fuel Vehicles and Certain Refueling Property – IRC § 62(a)(14) (TE Item
1.421)
The IRC provisions that this expenditure is tied to were repealed after 2005. Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts now conforms to the
repeal and will no longer offer this deduction for personal income tax purposes. See IRC §
62(a)(14) (as amended by P.L. 113-295 § 221(a)(34)(C)).
Self-Employed Health Insurance Deduction – IRC § 162(l) (TE Item 1.424)
IRC § 162(l) allows self-employed individuals to deduct the cost of health insurance for
themselves, a spouse, dependents and any children not yet age 27. Massachusetts conforms to
IRC § 162(l) on a current basis. However, under prior law, Massachusetts conformed to the 2005
IRC definition of “dependent.” Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1,
2022, this expenditure now includes the cost of health insurance for self-employed individuals,
their spouses, their “dependents” as defined by the 2022 IRC – see TE Item 1.407 (above) for a
discussion of changes to the IRC’s definition of “dependent” between 2005 and 2022 – and any
children not yet age 27.
Student Loan Interest Deduction – IRC §§ 127(c)(1) and 221(e); M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(12) (TE Item
1.425)
The federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (the “CARES Act”), P.L. 116-136, §
1102(a), and the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021 (“CAA 2021”), P.L. 116-260, excluded
payments made by an employer of certain student loans owed by an employee from the
employee’s gross income. See IRC § 127(c)(1). To the extent that the payments are excluded
from the employee’s gross income, the employee is not allowed to deduct student loan interest
that he or she might otherwise have been able to deduct pursuant to IRC § 221. The exclusion
and corresponding denial of the student loan interest deduction expire for tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2026. In addition to following these changes for personal income tax
purposes, Massachusetts also adopts the inflation adjustments affecting IRC § 221. See IRC §
221(f) (as amended by P.L. 116-136). Further, M.G.L. c. 62, § 3B(a)(12) allows a deduction from
Massachusetts gross income for interest payments on certain undergraduate student loans,
including those interest payments made on behalf of a taxpayer’s dependent. This expenditure
will be affected by the changes to the IRC definition of dependent described above in TE Item
1.407. A deduction from Massachusetts gross income may be taken under M.G.L. c. 62, §
3B(a)(12) or IRC § 221, but not both.
Page 347 of 367

Moving expense deduction and exclusion from gross income of qualified moving expense
reimbursement – IRC §§ 132(g) and 217 (TE Item 1.429)
IRC § 217 provides a deduction for moving expenses paid or incurred during the taxable year in
connection with the commencement of work by a taxpayer as an employee, or as a self-
employed individual at a new principal place of work. IRC § 132(g) provides an exclusion from
federal gross income for any qualified moving expense reimbursement. However, both the
exclusion and deduction are disallowed for tax years beginning on or before December 31, 2025,
and reinstated for subsequent tax years. The disallowance does not apply to qualifying members
of the Armed Forces. P.L. 115–97 §§ 11048, 11049. Because the suspension of IRC §§ 217 and
132(g) went into effect after January 1, 2005, Massachusetts continued to allow the moving
expense deduction and moving expense reimbursement exclusion to all taxpayers, as noted in
TIR 18-14. However, pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022 through tax years beginning on or before
December 31, 2025, Massachusetts will no longer allow most chapter 62 taxpayers to either (i)
exclude qualified moving expense reimbursements from their Massachusetts gross income or (ii)
deduct qualified moving expenses. During that period, the deduction and exclusion will be
available only to qualifying members of the Armed Forces.
Credit for Eligible Dependents – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(y) (TE Item 1.624)
M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(y) allows certain taxpayers to claim a credit for eligible dependents. In defining
who qualifies as an eligible dependent, M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(y) relies on the IRC § 152 definition of
“dependent.” As such, this expenditure will be affected by the changes to IRC § 152 described
above in TE Item 1.407.
Dependent Care Expenses Credit – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(x) (TE Item 1.625)
Massachusetts law converted this expenditure from a deduction to a credit, made available
pursuant to M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(x). The credit adopts the rules in IRC § 21, which in turn rely on the
IRC § 152 definition of “dependent.” Therefore, this expenditure will be affected by the changes
to IRC § 152 described above in TE Item 1.407. See IRC § 152(b)(2), (c)(4)(C).
Educator’s Expense Deduction – IRC § 62(a)(2)(D) (New TE Item)
IRC § 62(a)(2)(D) allows an eligible educator to deduct from federal gross income unreimbursed,
qualified expenses (e.g., expenses for books, supplies, and computer equipment used in the
classroom; expenses incurred during qualified professional development courses). Under the
2005 IRC the educator’s expense deduction was scheduled to expire on December 31, 2005. See
TIRs 05-16 and 07-4. Consequently, the deduction has not been allowed for Massachusetts tax
purposes subsequent to 2005. However, the federal deduction was made permanent after 2005.
See P.L. 114-113, Title VI, Part 1, § 104. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on
January 1, 2022, eligible educators may deduct qualified expenses under IRC § 62(a)(2)(D), as
Page 348 of 367

described above, for Massachusetts purposes for tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2022. The deduction is limited to an inflation-adjusted amount. See IRC § 62(d)(3). For the
2022 tax year, the deduction is limited to $300, and, if the educator is married and files a joint
return with another eligible educator, the limit rises to $600 with not more than $300 deducted
per spouse.
Deduction for Whistleblower Attorneys Fees – IRC § 62(a)(21) (New TE Item)
In 2006 and 2021, Congress expanded this expenditure to allow for the deduction of attorney’s
fees in relation to certain whistleblower lawsuits. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in
effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts adopts this expansion for personal income tax
purposes. See IRC § 62(a)(21) (as amended by P.L. 109-432 § 406(a)(3) and P.L. 115-123 §
41107(a)).
Exclusion from Gross Income of Discharged Qualified Principal Residence Indebtedness – IRC §
108(a)(1)(E) (New TE Item)
After 2005, Congress amended the IRC to exclude the discharge of indebtedness for a qualified
principal residence (i.e., a mortgage) that is discharged before January 1, 2026, or which will be
discharged subject to a written arrangement entered into before January 1, 2026. See IRC §
108(a)(1)(E) (as amended by P.L. 110-142 § 2; P.L. 116-260, Division EE, § 114). Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, such discharged indebtedness income
will be excluded for Massachusetts personal income tax purposes for tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2022 to the same extent as for federal purposes. The maximum amount
excludable from gross income as discharged qualified principal residence indebtedness is
$750,000 ($375,000 if married filing separately). See IRC § 108(h)(2).
Exclusion of Benefits Provided to Volunteer Firefighters and Emergency Medical Responders –
IRC § 139B (New TE Item)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, Congress excluded qualified state and
local tax benefits and qualified payments provided to any member of a qualified volunteer
emergency response organization in an amount up to $300 from gross income. Pursuant to the
recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts will exclude the amounts
from gross income for personal income tax purposes. See IRC § 139B (as amended by P.L. 116-
260).
Exclusion of Indian Healthcare Benefits – IRC § 139D (New TE Item)
In 2010, Congress added IRC § 139D which provides, in general, that federal gross income does
not include the value of “any qualified Indian health care benefit.” See P.L. 111-148, Title IX,
Subtitle B, § 9021(a). Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022,
Page 349 of 367

Massachusetts will also exclude from gross income the value of “any qualified Indian health care
benefit,” as defined by IRC § 139D, for taxable years beginning or after January 1, 2022.
Exclusion of Indian General Welfare Benefits – IRC § 139E (New TE Item)
In 2014, Congress added IRC § 139E, which excludes from federal gross income the value of
certain “Indian general welfare benefit(s)” if the requirements of IRC § 139E are satisfied.
See P.L. 113-168, § 2(a). Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022,
Massachusetts will also exclude from gross income the value of qualifying “Indian general
welfare benefit(s),” as defined by IRC § 139E, for taxable years beginning or after January 1,
2022.
Exclusion of Certain Amounts Received by Wrongfully Incarcerated Individual - IRC § 139F (New
TE Item)
In 2015, Congress added IRC § 139F, which excludes from gross income amounts received as civil
damages, restitution, or other monetary awards relating to the wrongful incarceration of an
individual. See P.L. 114-113, Div Q, Title III, Subtitle A, § 304(a). Pursuant to the recent adoption
of the IRC in effect on January 1, 2022, Massachusetts conforms to this exclusion for taxable
years beginning or after January 1, 2022.
Limitation on Non-corporate Taxpayers’ Deduction of Excess Business Losses – IRC § 461(l)
For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021 and ending before January 1, 2027, IRC §
461(l) prevents noncorporate taxpayers from deducting excess business losses. Excess business
losses generally include losses in excess of gross business income plus $250,000 (adjusted for
inflation). Disallowed excess business losses may be carried forward as net operating losses for
federal income tax purposes. Pursuant to the recent adoption of the IRC in effect on January 1,
2022, Massachusetts now conforms to the limitations under IRC § 461(l) for tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2022. However, losses disallowed because of the limitation may not be
carried forward for Massachusetts purposes because Massachusetts does not allow a chapter 62
tax deduction for net operating losses. See IRC § 146(l); see also, TIR 18-14, and TIR 20-9. The
limitation on deductions for excess business losses will reduce expenditures for this deduction.
Other Federal Tax Law Changes
Modified Accelerated Depreciation on Rental Housing - IRC § 168(g)
The Taxpayer Certainty and Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2020 (“TCDTRA”) reduced the depreciation
period for certain residential rental property from 40 years to 30 years under the alternative
depreciation system (“ADS”) provided by IRC § 168(g). See P.L. 116-260, Division EE, § 202. This
Page 350 of 367

federal tax law change is elective and applies retroactively to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2017. Massachusetts adopts these changes for purposes of both the personal
income tax and the corporate excise. See TIR 22-2 for more information.
Other Tax Law Changes
Circuit Breaker Tax Credit Increased – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(k) (TE Item 1.609)
A credit is allowed to certain qualified owners and renters of residential property located in
Massachusetts equal to the amount by which the real estate tax payment or 25% of the rent
constituting real estate tax payment exceeds 10% of the taxpayer’s total income, not to exceed
$1,200 (for tax year 2022). The amount of the credit is subject to limitations based on the
taxpayer’s total income and the assessed value of the real estate, which cannot exceed
$912,000. For tax year 2022, an eligible taxpayer’s total income cannot exceed $64,000 in the
case of a single filer who is not a head of household filer, $80,000 for a head of household filer,
and $96,000 for joint filers. In order to qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must be age 65 or older
and must occupy the property as his or her principal residence. See TIR 22-12 for more
information.
Income Exclusion for Forgiveness of Student Loans – IRC § 108(f)(5); M.G.L.
62, § 2(a)(2)(R) (Potential New TE Item)
The FY23 Budget added M.G.L. 62, § 2(a)(2)(R), which provides an exclusion from Massachusetts
gross income for income attributable to most discharges of student loans where such income is
otherwise not excluded from Massachusetts gross income. This exclusion is substantially
identical to the federal exclusion provided by IRC § 108(f)(5), which Massachusetts follows as in
effect for the taxable year. However, while the federal exclusion provided by IRC § 108(f)(5) only
applies to discharges of certain student loans for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2021 and ending on or before December 31, 2025, the new Massachusetts exclusion does not
have a sunset date. See TIR 23-1 for more information.
National Guard Employee Credit – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(aa) (New TE Item 1.627)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, a business subject to tax under Chapter 62
that employs not more than 100 employees may be allowed a credit equal to $2,000 for each
member of the Massachusetts national guard hired by the business after July 1, 2022. To be
eligible for a credit: (i) the primary place of employment and the primary residence of the
member of the Massachusetts national guard must be in Massachusetts; and (ii) not later than
the day an individual begins work, a business shall have obtained the applicable certification
from the office of the adjutant general that the individual is a member of the Massachusetts
national guard. A business that claims this credit is eligible for a second credit of $2,000 in the
subsequent taxable year with respect to such member of the Massachusetts national guard,
subject to certification of continued employment during the subsequent taxable year. The total
cumulative credits awarded for all taxpayers may not exceed $1,000,000 annually and shall be
authorized on a first-come, first-served basis. The credit is nontransferable and nonrefundable.
Page 351 of 367

Any amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to
any of the three subsequent taxable years. In the case of a pass-through entity claiming the
credit, the credit must be attributed on a pro rata basis to the owners, partners, or members of
the pass-through entity. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(aa).
Wind Power Incentive Jobs Credit – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(bb) (New TE Item 1.626)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and until tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2033, a business subject to tax under Chapter 62 may, to the extent authorized by the
offshore wind tax incentive program established in M.G.L. c. 23J, § 8A(d), be allowed a
refundable jobs credit in an amount determined by the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology
Center, in consultation with the Department of Revenue. A business taking this credit must
commit to the creation of a minimum of 50 net new permanent full-time employees in
Massachusetts. If the credit exceeds the taxpayer’s income tax liability for the taxable year, 90
percent of such excess credit may be refunded to the taxpayer. Excess credit amounts cannot be
carried forward to subsequent taxable years. In the event a taxpayer’s certification as an
offshore wind company is revoked, the recapture of credit may be required. In the case of a
pass-through entity claiming the credit, the credit must be attributed on a pro rata basis to the
owners, partners, or members of the pass-through entity. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(bb).
Wind Power Incentive Investment Credit – M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(cc) (New TE Item 1.626)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and until tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2033, a business subject to tax under Chapter 62 may, to the extent authorized by the
offshore wind tax incentive program established in M.G.L. c. 23J, § 8A(d), be allowed a
refundable credit in an amount, as determined by the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology
Center, of up to 50 percent of its total capital investment in an offshore wind facility. The total
amount of the credit awarded will be distributed in equal parts over five taxable years that
correspond to the period in which the business is certified. Eligibility requirements vary
depending on whether the business owns or leases the offshore wind facility, but, in general, the
business must (i) be a certified offshore wind company; (ii) have a total capital investment in an
offshore wind facility that equals not less than $35,000,000; and (iii) that offshore wind facility
must employ not less than 200 new full-time employees by the fifth year of the business’
certification. A business claiming this credit may not also claim the Wind Power Incentive Jobs
Credit, M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(bb), or the Economic Development Incentive Program Credit, M.G.L. c.
62, § 6(g), in the same taxable year. In the event a taxpayer’s certification as an offshore wind
company is revoked, the recapture of credit may be required. In the case of a pass-through
entity claiming the credit, the credit must be attributed on a pro rata basis to the owners,
partners, or members of the pass-through entity. See M.G.L. c. 62, § 6(cc).
The Corporate and Other Business Excise:
Massachusetts generally follows the IRC as currently in effect for corporate excise purposes.
However, Massachusetts has expressly decoupled from certain provisions of the IRC. The
Page 352 of 367

following is a summary of the federal and state tax law changes which affect business
corporations subject to the corporate excise, as well as unincorporated business entities doing
business in Massachusetts.
Federal Tax Law Changes
Depreciation of Certain Residential Rental Property over 30-year period – IRC § 168(g)
The Taxpayer Certainty and Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2020 reduced the depreciation period for
certain residential rental property from 40 years to 30 years under the alternative depreciation
system (“ADS”) provided by IRC § 168(g). See P.L. 116-260, Division EE, § 202. This federal tax
law change is elective and applies retroactively to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2017. Massachusetts adopts these changes for purposes of both the personal income tax and
the corporate excise. See TIR 22-2 for more information.
Expansion of disallowance of deduction for certain compensation paid by publicly traded
corporations (New TE Item)
The American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (“ARPA”), P.L. 117-2, expanded the limitation on the
ability of publicly traded corporations to deduct executive compensation. Prior law limited the
deduction to $1,000,000 for the three highest paid corporate officers. ARPA amended IRC §
162(m) to apply the limitation to the next five highest compensated employees, in addition to
the top three. The additional disallowance is set to take effect for tax years beginning after
December 31, 2026. See TIR 22-2 for additional information.
Other Tax Law Changes
National Guard Employee Credit – M.G.L. c. 63, § 38KK (New TE Item 2.628)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, a corporation subject to tax under Chapter
63 that employs not more than 100 employees may be allowed a credit equal to $2,000 for each
member of the Massachusetts national guard hired by the corporation after July 1, 2022. To be
eligible for a credit: (i) the primary place of employment and the primary residence of the
member of the Massachusetts national guard must be in Massachusetts; and (ii) not later than
the day an individual begins work, the corporation shall have obtained the applicable
certification from the office of the adjutant general that the individual is a member of the
Massachusetts national guard. A corporation that claims this credit is eligible for a second credit
of $2,000 in the subsequent taxable year with respect to such member of the Massachusetts
national guard, subject to certification of continued employment during the subsequent taxable
year. The total cumulative credits awarded for all taxpayers may not exceed $1,000,000 annually
and shall be authorized on a first-come, first-served basis. The credit is nontransferable and
nonrefundable. Any amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be
carried forward to any of the three subsequent taxable years. For corporations subject to a
minimum corporate excise, the credit cannot reduce the corporation’s excise liability below the
minimum corporate excise amount. See M.G.L. c. 63, § 38KK (St.2022, c.154, § 8).
Page 353 of 367

Wind Power Incentive Jobs Credit – M.G.L. c. 63, § 38LL (New TE Item 2.627)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and until tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2033, a corporation subject to tax under Chapter 63 may, to the extent authorized by
the offshore wind tax incentive program established in M.G.L. c 23J, § 8A(d), be allowed a
refundable jobs credit in an amount determined by the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology
Center, in consultation with the Department of Revenue. A corporation taking this credit must
commit to the creation of a minimum of 50 net new permanent full-time employees in
Massachusetts. If the credit exceeds the taxpayer’s income tax liability for the taxable year, 90
percent of such excess credit may be refunded to the taxpayer. Excess credit amounts cannot be
carried forward to subsequent taxable years. In the event a taxpayer’s certification as an
offshore wind company is revoked, the recapture of credit may be required. The credit is subject
to the offshore wind tax incentive program’s annual cap of $35,000,000. See M.G.L. c. 63, § 38LL
(St. 2022, c.179, § 45).
Wind Power Incentive Investment Credit – M.G.L. c. 63, § 38MM (New TE Item 2.627)
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and until tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2033, a corporation subject to tax under Chapter 63 may, to the extent authorized by
the offshore wind tax incentive program established in M.G.L. c. 23J, § 8A(d), be allowed a
refundable credit in an amount, as determined by the Massachusetts Clean Energy Technology
Center, of up to 50 percent of its total capital investment in an offshore wind facility. The total
amount of the credit awarded is distributed in equal parts over five taxable years that
correspond to the period in which the business is certified. Eligibility requirements vary
depending on whether the corporation owns or leases an offshore wind facility, but, in general,
the corporation must (i) be a certified offshore wind company; (ii) have a total capital investment
in an offshore wind facility that equals not less than $35,000,000; and (iii) that offshore wind
facility must employ not less than 200 new full-time employees by the fifth year of the business’
certification. A corporation claiming this credit may not also claim the Wind Power Incentive Jobs
Credit, G. L. c. 63, § 38LL, or the Economic Development Incentive Program Credit, M.G.L. c. 63,
§ 38N, in the same taxable year. In the event a taxpayer’s certification as an offshore wind
company is revoked, the recapture of credit may be required. The credit is subject to the
offshore wind tax incentive program’s annual cap of $35,000,000. See M.G.L. c. 63, § 38MM (St.
2022, c.179, § 45).
Page 354 of 367

Fiscal Year 2022
The following tax expenditures have been revised or created due to recent law changes.
On December 22, 2017, Public Law 115-97, commonly known as the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (TCJA)
was signed into law. On March 27, 2020, Public Law No. 116-136, the federal “Coronavirus Aid,
Relief and Economic Security Act,” also known as the CARES Act was signed into law. Most
recently, the Federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 and the American Rescue Plan Act
of 2021 were enacted. These Acts provide for federal changes to a variety of provisions in the
Internal Revenue Code (“Code”) that affect the personal income tax and corporate excise.
As a general rule, Massachusetts does not adopt any federal personal income tax law changes
incorporated into the Code after January 1, 2005. However, certain specific Massachusetts
personal income tax provisions, as set forth in G.L. c. 62, § 1(c), automatically conform to the
current Code. Provisions of the Code that Massachusetts adopts on a current basis are:
• The exclusion for income earned by Roth IRAs;
• The exclusion for income earned by IRAs;
• The exclusion for gain on the sale of a principal residence;
• Trade or business expenses;
• Travel expenses;
• Meals and entertainment expenses;
• The maximum deferral amount of government employees’ deferred compensation plans;
• The deduction for health insurance costs of self-employed taxpayers;
• Medical and dental expenses;
• Annuities;
• Health savings accounts;
• Employer-provided health insurance coverage;
• Amounts received by an employee under a health and accident plan; and
• Contributions to qualified tuition programs.
Since Massachusetts automatically conforms to any change in the above tax items, any existing
tax expenditures in the state’s Tax Expenditure Budget (TEB) that are calculated based on
Federal estimates will reflect the impact of those changes. DOR will continue to review the
impact of tax law changes at the federal level and will update future TEBs as necessary.
The following is a summary of the recent federal tax law changes, as well as other legislative and
regulatory measures that modify Massachusetts personal income tax expenditures.
On March 27, 2020, Public Law 116-136, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act
(the CARES Act), was signed into law. The CARES Act provides for federal changes to a variety of
Page 355 of 367

provisions of the Internal Revenue Code (IRC) that affect personal income taxpayers. In response
to the CARES Act, the Department of Revenue (DOR) issued written guidance addressing the
impact of the CARES Act in Massachusetts. See TIR 20-9: Massachusetts Tax Implications of
Selected Provisions of the Federal CARES Act. More recently, the Federal Consolidated
Appropriations Act, 2021 and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 were enacted. For their
impact on Massachusetts personal income tax and corporate excise, See Working Draft TIR 21-
XX: Massachusetts Tax Implications of Selected Provisions of the Federal Consolidated
Appropriations Act, 2021 and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
Eligible 529 Plan Expenses, IRC § 529 (TE Item 1.041)
MGL allows a deduction for contributions to a Massachusetts 529 college savings plan or a
prepaid tuition program, up to $1,000 per individual or $2,000 per married couple filing jointly.
This deduction was available to taxpayers for tax years beginning January 1, 2017 through
January 1, 2021. The deduction was scheduled to expire, however, the FY22 Budget made the
deduction permanent.
Parking, Combined Commuter Highway Vehicle Transportation, and T-Pass Fringe Benefit — IRC
sec. 132(f) (TE Item 1.030)
Massachusetts follows Code § 132(f) as amended and in effect as of January 1, 2005. For taxable
years beginning in 2022, the Massachusetts monthly exclusion amounts are $280 for employer-
provided parking and $150 for combined transit pass and commuter highway vehicle
transportation benefits. Under Massachusetts law, these numbers reflect an inflation adjustment
but do not include the increase in the federal monthly exclusion amount for the combined
transit pass and commuter highway vehicle transportation benefits that was signed into law on
December 18, 2015. See TIR 21-12 for more information.
Favorable Tax Treatment of Qualified Small Business Stock (QSBS) Gain — IRC § 1202; M.G.L. c.
62, § 4(c) (TE Item 1.042).
For federal tax purposes IRC § 1202 allows individuals to exclude 50% of their gains derived from
the sale of qualified small business stock (“QSBS”). Because Massachusetts generally follows the
IRC as in effect in 2005 for personal income tax purposes, Massachusetts allows an income
exclusion for 50% of such gains.
Massachusetts also provides a reduced rate for such gains that are included in income if certain
statutory requirements are met. Specifically, gains on the sale of qualified small business stock
are taxed at a reduced rate of 3%, instead of the generally applicable long-term gain rate of 5%.
To qualify for the 3% rate, the stock that is sold (i) must have been acquired within five years of
the corporation's date of incorporation (ii) must be held for three years or more prior to the sale,
and (iii) must have been issued by a C corporation or S corporation which (a) is domiciled in
Massachusetts, (b) was incorporated on or after January 1, 2011, (c) has less than $50 million in
assets at the time of investment, and (d) complies with certain of the “active business”
requirements of IRC § 1202.
Charitable Deduction — IRC § 170; M.G.L. c. 62, §3B (a)(13) (TE Item 1.415)
Page 356 of 367

Beginning in calendar year 2023, Massachusetts personal income taxpayers will be allowed to
deduct an amount equal to the amount of the charitable contribution deduction allowed or
allowable to the taxpayer under § 170 of the Code, as in effect on January 1, 2005 (i.e., the
deduction shall be limited to 10% of taxpayers’ federal taxable income). However, no deduction
is allowed for contributions of household goods or used clothing. See 830 CMR 62.3.2, TIR 21-4,
and the FY22 Budget (St. 2021, c. 24, s. 99) for more information.
Health Savings and Flexible Spending Accounts — IRC §§ 62(a)(19) and 223 (TE Item 1.422)
The CARES Act amended Code §§ 106(f), 220(d)(2)(A), and 223(d)(2) to allow amounts paid or
expenses incurred for medicine or drugs without a medical prescription to be covered by an HSA
or FSA. These changes apply to amounts paid or expenses incurred after December 31, 2019.
The Act also amended Code § 223(c)(2) to allow, for plan years beginning on or before
December 31, 2021, high-deductible health plans with an HSA to cover telehealth and other
remote care services, notwithstanding whether the plan allows for such a deductible. For
Massachusetts personal income tax purposes, payments for such services from HSAs or FSAs will
similarly be allowable. This change became effective upon the enactment of the Act on March
27, 2020. See TIR 20-9 for more information.
Circuit Breaker Tax Credit Increased — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (k) (TE item 1.609)
A credit is allowed to certain qualified owners and renters of residential property located in
Massachusetts equal to the amount by which the real estate tax payment or 25% of the rent
constituting real estate tax payment exceeds 10% of the taxpayer’s total income, not to exceed
$1,170 (for tax year 2021). The amount of the credit is subject to limitations based on the
taxpayer’s total income and the assessed value of the real estate, which cannot exceed
$884,000. For tax year 2021, an eligible taxpayer’s total income cannot exceed $62,000 in the
case of a single filer who is not a head of household filer, $78,000 for a head of household filer,
and $93,000 for joint filers. In order to qualify for the credit, a taxpayer must be age 65 or older
and must occupy the property as his or her principal residence. See TIR 21-11 for more
information.
Film (or Motion Picture) Credit — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (l) (TE item 1.611)
Motion picture companies subject to tax under G.L. c. 62 or G.L. c. 63 may claim credits with
respect to certain payroll expenses and certain production expenses. The credits were due to
expire on January 1, 2023. However, the FY22 Budget amends “An Act Providing Incentives to
the Motion Picture Industry,” which created the film incentive credits, to make them permanent.
The FY22 Budget also amends credit eligibility with respect to production expenses. For taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, a taxpayer must incur at least 75% of its production
expenses in Massachusetts for a film project to qualify for the credit. A 50% threshold applies to
prior taxable years.
Disability Hire Credit — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (z) (TE item 1.622)
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, employers that hire disabled
employees may claim a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to (i) the lesser of $5,000 or
30% of the wages paid to a disabled employee in the employee’s first year of employment, and
Page 357 of 367

(ii) the lesser of $2,000 or 30% of the wages paid to a disabled employee in each subsequent
year of the employee’s employment.
Cranberry Bog Renovation Credit — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (w) (TE item 1.623)
Beginning in calendar year 2020, taxpayers primarily engaged in cranberry production may claim
a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to 25% of expenses incurred in the renovation, repair,
replacement, regrading or restoration of a cranberry bog for the cultivation, harvesting or
production of cranberries. The amount of credit that can be claimed by a taxpayer for a taxable
year cannot exceed $100,000.
Credit for Eligible Dependents — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (y) (TE item 1.624)
The parameters of the credit are substantially the same as the former deduction. To claim the
credit, a taxpayer must furnish over half of the cost of maintaining a household. The household
must include a dependent that qualifies as a dependent under IRC § 152 and who is (1) under
the age of 12; (2) age 65 or over; or (3) disabled. The credit is equal to $180 if the taxpayer
claims one dependent, or $360 if the taxpayer claims two or more dependents. A taxpayer
claiming this credit may not also claim the credit for dependent care expenses allowed under
G.L. c. 62, § 6(x).
Credit for Dependent Care Expenses — M.G.L. c. 62, § 6 (x) (TE item 1.625)
The parameters of the credit are substantially the same as the former deduction. The credit is
equal to “employment-related expenses” allowed for purposes of determining the credit
provided under Internal Revenue Code (“IRC”) § 21. A qualifying individual is (1) a dependent of
the taxpayer who is younger than 13 years old; or (2) a dependent of the taxpayer, including a
spouse, who is physically or mentally incapable of taking care of himself or herself and principally
lives with the taxpayer.- [1] The credit cannot exceed $240 if the taxpayer claims expenses for one
qualifying individual, or $480 if the taxpayer claims expenses for two or more qualifying
individuals. A taxpayer claiming the credit may not also claim the dependent credit allowed
under G.L. c. 62, § 6(y).
The Corporate and Other Business Excise:
New Cranberry Bog Renovation Credit
The Economic Development Act and the FY22 Budget adopt new credits for expenses incurred in
renovating cranberry bogs. Specifically, the Economic Development Act adds G.L. c. 62, § 6(w)
and the FY22 Budget adds G.L. c. 63, § 38II. These provisions allow taxpayers primarily engaged
in cranberry production to claim a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to 25% of expenses
incurred in the renovation, repair, replacement, regrading or restoration of a cranberry bog for
the cultivation, harvesting or production of cranberries. The Secretary for Energy and
Environmental Affairs (the “Secretary”) determines eligible costs and the amount of the credit.
The amount of credit that can be claimed by a taxpayer for a taxable year cannot exceed
$100,000. The annual total cap amount is $2 million.
Page 358 of 367

To receive the credit, a taxpayer must file a summary of renovation expenditures with the
Secretary, who will notify the Commissioner of the amount of credit awarded. The Commissioner
will allow the amount of the credit determined by the Secretary on the taxpayer’s return for the
tax year in which the qualified renovation expense was incurred. Further guidance from the
Commissioner and the Secretary regarding the credit is anticipated. The credit is available for
taxpayers subject to G.L. c. 62 (“c. 62 taxpayers”) and taxpayers subject to the corporate excise
(“c. 63 taxpayers”) for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
New Disability Hire Credit
The FY22 Budget adds a new credit for employers that hire disabled employees. Specifically, the
FY22 Budget adds G.L. c. 62, § 6(z) and new G.L. c. 63, § 38JJ. These provisions allow employers
subject to tax under G.L. c. 62 or G.L. c. 63 to claim a nontransferable, refundable credit equal to
(i) the lesser of $5,000 or 30% of the wages paid to a disabled employee in the employee’s first
year of employment, and (ii) the lesser of $2,000 or 30% of the wages paid to a disabled
employee in each subsequent year of the employee’s employment. The credit is available to
employers subject to tax under G.L. c. 62 or G.L. c. 63 provided that:
(1) the employee is certified by the Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission as having a
disability as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12102;
(2) the employee is capable of working independently;
(3) the employee has a mental or physical disability that constitutes or results in a substantial
impediment to employment;
(4) the employee is hired after July 1, 2021;
(5) the employee’s primary place of employment and primary place of residence is in
Massachusetts;
(6) the employer must obtain certification from the Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission
that the employee is qualified no later than the employee’s first day of work; and
(7) the employer employs the employee for at least 12 consecutive months prior to and in the
taxable year in which the credit is claimed.
For employers subject to tax under G.L. c. 62, the credit will be attributed on a pro rata basis to
the owners, partners, or members of the legal entity that hires eligible employees. For
employers subject to an excise under G.L. c. 63, the credit cannot reduce the excise due below
the minimum excise.
The FY22 Budget requires that the Secretary of Health and Human Services, in consultation with
the Commissioner, promulgate regulations establishing an application process for the credit.
Further guidance from the Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Commissioner
regarding the credit is anticipated.
The credit is available for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.
Changes to the Film Incentive Credits
Motion picture companies subject to tax under G.L. c. 62 or G.L. c. 63 may claim credits with
respect to certain payroll expenses and certain production expenses. The credits were due to
expire on January 1, 2023. However, the FY22 Budget amends “An Act Providing Incentives to
the Motion Picture Industry,” which created the film incentive credits, to make them permanent.
The FY22 Budget also amends credit eligibility with respect to production expenses. For taxable
Page 359 of 367

years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, a taxpayer must incur at least 75% of its production
expenses in Massachusetts for a film project to qualify for the credit. A 50% threshold applies to
prior taxable years.
Changes to the Low-Income Housing Credit
Under G.L. c. 62, § 6I and G.L. c. 63, § 31H, a low-income housing credit is available to eligible c.
62 or c. 63 taxpayers that invest in affordable rental housing (“Qualified Massachusetts
Projects”) to the extent authorized by the Department of Housing and Community Development
(“DHCD”). The credit may be claimed in the year that the Qualified Massachusetts Project is
placed in service and for each of the four subsequent taxable years.
DHCD ultimately allocates the amount of credit a taxpayer can claim based on an annual
aggregate statewide limit, which, prior to the Economic Development Act, was $20 million.
Effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2021 and ending on or before December
31, 2025, the Economic Development Act raises the credit’s annual limit from $20 million to $40
million. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the credit’s annual limit will revert to
$20 million.
Extension of the Massachusetts Historic Rehabilitation Credit
The Massachusetts historic rehabilitation credit, which allows c. 62 and c. 63 taxpayers to claim a
credit for certain expenditures made to rehabilitate certain qualified historic structures, was due
to expire on December 31, 2022. The FY22 Budget amends G.L. c. 62, § 6J and G.L. c. 63, § 38R to
extend the credit to tax years ending on or before December 31, 2027.
Repeal of Certain Deductions and Credits
Repeal of Deduction for Energy Patents
Under the law in effect for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2022, G.L. c. 62, § 2(a)(2)(G)
and G.L. c. 63, § 30.3 allow taxpayers to deduct income from certain patents that are useful for
energy conservation or alternative energy development. The FY22 Budget repeals the deduction
effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.
Repeal of Medical Device User Fee Credit
Under the law in effect for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2022, G.L. c. 62, § 6½ and
G.L. c. 63, § 31L allow taxpayers that develop or manufacture medical devices in Massachusetts
to claim a transferable credit equal to 100% of the user fees they pay when submitting certain
medical device applications and supplements to the Food and Drug Administration. A taxpayer
claiming the credit cannot carry forward the credit, but can transfer unused portions of the
credit. The transferee may carry over the credit, but must use it within five years of the credit’s
transfer.
The FY22 Budget repeals the credit effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2022. However, taxpayers will still be able to transfer previously awarded credits, and
transferees will be able to apply unused amounts of the credit within five years of the credit’s
transfer.
Page 360 of 367

Repeal of Harbor Maintenance Credit
Under the law in effect for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2022, G.L. c. 63, § 38P
allows taxpayers subject to the corporate excise to claim a nonrefundable, nontransferable
credit equal to certain harbor maintenance taxes paid to the federal government to the extent
the taxes are attributable to the shipment of break-bulk or containerized cargo by sea and
ocean-going vessels through one of three designated Massachusetts ports. Unused portions of
the credit may be carried forward for up to five years. The FY22 Budget repeals the credit
effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022. However, unused portions of
the credit claimed in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2022 may continue to be carried
forward.
Sales and Use Tax
Sales Tax Holiday Weekend — M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6A (TE Item 3.612)
Pursuant to M.G.L. c. 64H, § 6A, a 2-day weekend in August of each year shall be designated as
the annual “sales tax holiday.” During the annual sales tax holiday, no tax shall be imposed
upon otherwise taxable non-business retail sales of tangible personal property. Retail sales
eligible for the exemption must occur during one of two days during the holiday weekend, i.e.,
transfer of possession of or original payment in full for the property shall occur on such days.
However (i) transactions where a deposit, prepayment or binding promise to pay is made before
the designated days; (ii) prior sales; and (iii) layaway sales do not qualify for the exemption.
Page 361 of 367

Appendix I
Cumulative Distribution of TERC’s Ratings
Below is the cumulative distribution of TERC’s ratings for all tax expenditures evaluated to date.
Strongly Somewhat Somewhat Strongly Not
Total
Disagree Disagree Agree Agree Applicable
We can measure the overall benefit
18 50 63 18 1 150
toward achieving the goal(s)
The TE’s benefit justifies its fiscal cost 9 25 79 36 1 150
The TE is claimed by its intended
6 9 52 83 0 150
beneficiaries
The TE is claimed by a broad group of
47 35 36 32 0 150
taxpayers
The TE amount claimed per taxpayer
16 24 84 25 1 150
is meaningful as an incentive/benefit
The TE is relevant today 12 10 49 79 0 150
The TE is easily administered 8 20 60 62 0 150
The TE is beneficial to smaller
12 16 44 19 59 150
businesses
The TE is benefits lower income
27 36 36 5 46 150
taxpayers
Page 362 of 367

Appendix J
All Tax Expenditures Evaluated by Year
Below is the list of all tax expenditures that TERC has evaluated to date. The Commission has reviewed a
total of 150 Massachusetts tax expenditures pertaining to (i) Agriculture, (ii) Commerce and Housing, (iii)
Community and Regional Development, (iv) Education, Training, Employment and Social Services, (v)
Energy, (vi) General Purpose Fiscal Assistance, (vii) General Science, Space and Technology, (viii) Health,
(ix) Housing, (x) Income security, (xi) Commerce and Housing, (xii) Natural Resources and Environment,
(xiii) Transportation, (xiv) Veterans' Benefits.
2021
• 1.019 Exclusion from Employee Income of Business-Related Meals and Entertainment
• 1.020 & 2.002 Exemption of Income from the Sale, Lease, or Transfer of Certain Patents
• 1.201 Capital Gains Deduction for Collectibles
• 1.413 Exemption of Interest on Savings in Massachusetts Banks
• 1.421 Deduction for Clean Fuel Vehicles and Certain Refueling Property
• 1.601 Renewable Energy Source Credit (tax credit)
• 2.001 Small Business Corporations
• 2.203 Net Operating Loss Carryover
• 2.401 Unequal Weighting of Sales, Payroll, and Property in Apportionment Formula
• 2.502 Exemption for Property Subject to Local Taxation
• 2.602 Investment Tax Credit
• 2.604 Research Credit
• 2.607 Harbor Maintenance Tax Credit
• 2.701 Exemption of Credit Union Income
• 3.106 Exemption for Newspapers and Magazines
• 3.201 Exemption for Alcoholic Beverages
• 3.202 Exemption for Motor Fuels
• 3.302 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Manufacturing
• 3.303 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Research and
Development
• 3.309 Exemption for Vessels, Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in
Commercial Fishing
• 3.602 Exemption for Vending Machine Sales
• 1.603 & 2.605 EDIP/Economic Development Incentive Program
• 1.610 & 2.610 Credit Massachusetts Historic Rehabilitation Tax Credit
• 1.613 & 2.615 Medical Device User Fee Credit
• 2.617 & 3.005 Life Sciences Tax Incentive Program
• 1.611 & 2.611 & 3.004 Film Production Incentives
Page 363 of 367

2022
• 1.018 Exemption of Meals and Lodging Provided at Work
• 1.022 Exemption for Capital Gains at Time of Death
• 1.102 Treatment of Incentive Stock Options
• 1.103 Exemption of Earnings on Stock Bonus Plans or Profit-Sharing Trusts
• 1.106 Exemption for Capital Gains at Time of Gift
• 1.202 Deduction of Capital Losses Against Interest and Dividend Income
• 1.501 Favorable Tax Treatment of Qualified Small Business Stock (QSBS) Gain
• 2.101 Deferral of Tax on Certain Shipping Companies
• 2.205 Deduction for Certain Dividends of Cooperatives
• 2.312 Expensing of Certain Expenditures for Alternative Energy Sources
• 2.501 Nontaxation of Certain Energy Property
• 2.703 Exemption for Regulated Investment Companies
• 3.108 Exemption for Certain Precious Metals
• 3.109 Exemption for Cement Mixers
• 3.112 Exemption for Aircraft & Aircraft Parts
• 3.301 Exemption for Items Used in Making Clothing
• 3.304 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Furnishing Power,
Water, and Steam
• 3.306 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Newspaper
Printing
• 3.310 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Radio and TV
Broadcasting
• 3.405 Exemption for Certain Energy Conservation Equipment
• 3.410 Exemption for Containers
• 3.411 Exemption for Certain Sales by Typographers, Compositors and Color Separators
• 3.418 Exemption for Fuels, Supplies, and Repairs for Vessels Engaged in Interstate or
Foreign Commerce
• 3.421 Exemption for Films
• 3.601 Exemption for Casual or Isolated Sales
• 3.604 Exemption for Certain Bed and Breakfast Establishments from Sales Tax on
Meals and Room Occupancy Excise
• 3.606 Exemption for Trade-in Allowances for Motor Vehicles and Trailers
• 3.609 Exemption for Vessels or Barges of 50 Tons or Over
• 3.610 Exemption for Rental Charges for Refuse Containers
• 3.611 Exemption for Honor Trays
• 1.303 & 2.307 Modified Accelerated Depreciation on Buildings (other than Rental Housing)
• 1.304 & 2.305 Modified Accelerate Cost Recovery System (MACRS) for Equipment
• 1.305 & 2.306 Expense Deduction for Excess First-Year Depreciation
• 1.306 & 2.304 Election to Deduct and Amortize Business Startup Costs
• 1.308 & 2.309 Expensing of Exploration and Development Costs
• 1.309 & 2.308 Expensing of Research and Development Expenditures in One Year
Page 364 of 367

2023
• 1.014 Exemption of Rental Value of Parsonages
• 1.021 Exemption of Capital Gains on Home Sale (formerly only for Persons 55 and
over)
• 1.030 Exclusion from Gross Income of Parking, T-Pass and Vanpool Fringe Benefits
• 1.412 Nontaxation of Charitable Purpose Income of Trustees, Executors or
Administrators)
• 1.423 Commuter Deduction
• 2.303 Expenditures to Remove Architectural and Transportation Barriers to the
Handicapped and Elderly
• 2.603 Vanpool Credit
• 3.003 Exemption for Sales to Tax-Exempt Organizations
• 3.308 Exemption for Materials, Tools, Fuels, and Machinery Used in Agricultural
Production)
• 3.406 Exemption for Funeral Items
• 3.409 Exemption for Books used for Religious Worship
• 3.417 Exemption for Commuter Boats
• 3.419 Exemption for Fuel Used in Operating Aircraft and Railroads
• 3.420 Exemption for Sales of Certain New and Used Buses
• 3.603 Exemption for Certain Meals
• 3.605 Exemption for Certain Summer Camps from Sales Tax on Meals
• 3.607 Exemptions for Publications of Tax-Exempt Organizations
• 1.204 & 2.206 Abandoned Building Renovation Deduction
• 1.301 & 2.301 Modified Accelerated Depreciation on Rental Housing
• 1.415 & 2.201 Charitable Contributions and Gifts Deduction
• 1.604 & 2.606 Credit for Employing Former Full-Employment Program Participants
• 1.621 & 2.624 Apprentice Tax Credit
Page 365 of 367

2024
• 1.002 Exemption of Premiums on Group-Term Life Insurance
• 1.003 Exemption of Interest on Life Insurance Policy and Annuity Cash Value
• 1.004 Exemption of Employer Contributions to Accident and Health Plans and Certain
Benefits Received
• 1.006 Exemption of Distributions from Certain Contributory Pension and Annuity Plans
• 1.008 Exemption of Public Assistance Benefits
• 1.01 Exemption of Workers' Compensation Benefits
• 1.012 Exclusion of Certain Foster Care Payments
• 1.023 Exemption of Interest from Massachusetts Obligations
• 1.029 Exemption for Retirement Pay of the Uniformed Services
• 1.039 Discharge of Indebtedness for Health Care Professionals
• 1.101 Net Exemption of Employer Contributions and Earnings of Private Pension Plans
• 1.104 Exemption of Earnings on IRA and Keogh Plans
• 1.312 Expensing of Certain Capital Outlays of Farmers
• 1.411 Rent Deduction
• 1.424 Self-Employed Health Insurance Deduction
• 1.426 Expenses of Human Organ Transplant
• 1.602 Credit for Removal of Lead Paint
• 1.606 Septic System Credit
• 1.618 Farming and Fisheries Tax Credit
• 2.702 Tax-Exempt Organizations
• 3.103 Exemption for Clothing
• 3.105 Exemption for Water
• 3.401 Exemption for Electricity
• 3.402 Exemption for Fuel Used for Heating Purposes
• 3.403 Exemption for Gas
• 3.404 Exemption for Steam
• 3.407 Exemption for Certain Motor Vehicles
• 1.607 & 2.609 Low Income Housing Tax Credit
• 1.614 & 2.618 Dairy Farmer Tax Credit
• 1.617 & 2.621 Community Investment Tax Credit
• 1.619 & 2.622 Certified Housing Development Tax Credit
• 3.104 & 3.113 Exemption for Medical and Dental Supplies and Devices Including Breast Pumps
Page 366 of 367

2025
• 1.007 Exemption of Railroad Retirement Benefits
• 1.009 Exemption of Social Security Benefits
• 1.011 Exemption of Dependent Care Expenses
• 1.013 Exemption of Payments Made to Coal Miners
• 1.015 Exemption of Scholarships, Fellowships, and Tuition Reductions
• 1.016 Exclusion of Certain Prizes and Awards
• 1.017 Exclusion of Payments Received Under Government Conservation, Reclamation
and Restoration Programs (previously Exemption of Cost-Sharing Payments)
• 1.024 Exemption of Benefits and Allowances to Armed Forces Personnel
• 1.025 Exemption of Veterans' Pensions, Disability Compensation and G.I. Benefits
• 1.026 Exemption of Military Disability Pensions
• 1.027 Exemption of Compensation to Massachusetts-Based Nonresident Military
Personnel
• 1.028 Exemption of Income Received by Persons Killed in Military Action or Terrorist
Activity
• 1.032 Employer-Provided Adoption Assistance
• 1.033 Employer-Provided Education Assistance
• 1.035 Department of Defense Homeowners Assistance Plan
• 1.036 Survivor Annuities of Fallen Public Safety Officers
• 1.041 Earnings of Pre-paid and Tuition Savings ("529" plans)
• 1.407 Personal Exemption for Students Aged 19 or Over
• 1.414 Tuition Tax Deduction
• 1.419 Business Exp of National Guard and Reserve Members
• 1.425 Student Loan Interest Deduction
• 1.427 Prepaid Tuition or College Savings Plan Deduction
• 3.001 Exemption for Sales to the Federal Government
• 3.002 Exemption for Sales to the Commonwealth
• 3.107 Exemption for the American Flag
• 3.408 Exemption for Textbooks
• 3.412 Exemption for Sales of Building Materials and Supplies to be Used in Connection
with Certain Construction Contracts
• 3.608 Exemption for Gifts of Scientific Equipment
• 1.031 & 1.422 Health Savings Accounts (exemption & deduction)
• 1.040 & 1.420 Archer Medical Savings Accounts (exemption & deduction)
• 1.203 & 2.204 Excess Natural Resource Depletion Allowance
• 1.310 & 2.311 Five-Year Amortization of Pollution Control Facilities
• 1.311 & 2.313 Deduction and Seven Year Amortization for Reforestation
• 1.608 & 2.608 Brownfields Credit
Page 367 of 367